_	"When a president talks about his business elite as chickens sitting on eggs... what is the nature of the understanding that they have? …
_	The programme’s establishment centred on the understanding that in light of these seismic changes, Europe would need to strategically re-think its relationships with its Middle Eastern neighbours in order to be on “the right side of history”.
_	After the Second Battle of El Alamein, the 1st Infantry Division was withdrawn to Quassasin with the understanding that its 1st Brigade would return to South Africa to regroup with the 7th Infantry Brigade (at this time the 7th Infantry Brigade was in Madagascar) to form the 1st South African Armoured Division.
_	The prince locates the tree in the territory of an evil dwarf, who offers to give him the enchanted tree, on the understanding that, if the princess still rejects him, he will be in the dwarf's power and will be turned into a bear.
_	Parents have been increasingly vocal about advertainment in children’s movies and programs, arguing that children do not have the understanding that adults do regarding the product that their favorite star is using.
_	To reinforce the understanding that mixed-age groupings were not simply split classes, the school’s first students were encouraged to establish names for their classes that did not make reference to conventional grades.
_	As their skills developed, many students adopted a figurative approach with the understanding that an artist was not a reporter.
_	White Bus Family Production's had obtained the resource consent for the recovery and gave Uc369 and Uc370 to the Trust on the understanding that should the Trust fold then ownership would return to it.
_	He resigned the position after one year, citing the fact that the role took too much time away from his business interests in Calgary, but reversed his decision on the understanding that he would not always be available to serve the NHL post.
_	Jakie Astor negotiated to sell West Ilsley to Sobell and his son-in-law Arnold Weinstock on the understanding that both Hern and Mercer were kept in place as trainer and stable jockey respectively.
_	Defeated, the Kohr-Ah were sent in the opposite direction of the galaxy as the Kzer-Za, with the understanding that when the two species met again, they would fight The Doctrinal Conflict once more, with the victor claiming the Sa-Matra.
_	This model of CE is based on the understanding that it is necessary to narrow the gap between practical enforcement of the economic, social and political rights granted by the constitution and the annual (or mid-term) economic policy, budget legislation and administrative policies conducted by the government.
_	This includes educating people of faith to the understanding that a serious commitment to God, religion and spirit should manifest in social activism aimed at peace, universal disarmament, social justice with a preferential option for the needs of the poor and the oppressed, a commitment to end poverty, hunger, homelessness, inadequate education and inadequate health care all around the world, and a commitment to nuclear non-proliferation, environmental protection and repair of the damage done to the planet by 150 years of environmentally irresponsible behavior in industrializing societies.
_	The basic engineering for all the German half-tracks was developed during the Weimar-era by the Reichswehr's "Military Automotive Department", but final design and testing was farmed out to commercial firms with the understanding that production would be shared with multiple companies.
_	The Union was initially reluctant to enlist additional regiments, because of the expense, the understanding that training an effective cavalryman could take as long as two years, and the conventional wisdom that the rough and forested terrain of the United States, being so different from that of Western Europe, would make the deployment of Napoleonic-style cavalry forces ineffective.
_	This affirmation arises in part from the understanding that while medical intervention can improve the health issues inherent in certain forms of disability, it does not address societal issues that prevail regardless of the extent or success of medical intervention.
_	Half of the cost of £500 was paid by Richard Bethell, the owner of the Leven Canal, on the understanding that tolls for passing under the bridge would be reduced, and the new crossing was completed by April 1804.
_	At the 2002 national convention in Montreal, he was elected leader, with the understanding that the post would be filled on a more permanent basis in early 2003 via mail-in ballots.
_	The theory is based on the understanding that Ru(II) complexes are generally more reactive than Ru(III) complexes.
_	On February 4, 1860, two members of the company's board of directors wrote a letter requesting Helm's resignation; they claimed they had voted for his re-election as president of the company with the understanding that he would resign when the main line between Louisville and Nashville was finished.
_	In 1936, at the age of twenty-three Zhu started translating "The Tempest" into Chinese, with the understanding that the World Book Company would publish his complete translations of Shakespearean plays.
_	Following Radlov's acrimonious resignation from the Kirov in June 1934, a new agreement was signed with the Bolshoi Theatre in Moscow on the understanding that Piotrovsky would remain involved.
_	He was initially allowed to compete in the trial on the understanding that his citizenship papers would be finalized before the games.
_	Following her disappointment, Rachel agreed to a childless marriage with the understanding that she would be free to pursue a career.
_	In fact it would be more realistic to call them candidates for the position of African philosophy, with the understanding that more than one of them might fit the bill.
_	Partly paid shares in a company are ones in respect of which only a partial payment (or deposit) has been made, with the understanding that as the company requires more funds, calls will be made from time to time until the shares are fully paid, when no further calls can be made.
_	Hearing this, Griswold and Buxton were angered by the Court's ruling and, with the understanding that the law had never been significantly challenged, decided to test it.
_	To accept the terms of the Mandates Article as given below with reference to Palestine, on the understanding that there was inserted in the procès-verbal an undertaking by the Mandatory Power that this would not involve the surrender of the rights hitherto enjoyed by the non-Jewish communities in Palestine; this undertaking not to refer to the question of the religious protectorate of France, which had been settled earlier in the previous afternoon by the undertaking given by the French Government that they recognized this protectorate as being at an end.
_	The conference subcommittee on seals resolved, "The subject should be postponed on the understanding that the whole question should be left for further discussion between Governments should occasion arise".
_	Carnarvon appointed Frere to the position on the understanding that he would work to enforce Carnarvon's confederation plan and, in return, Frere could then become the first British governor of a federated southern African dominion.
_	With the understanding that "kukkuta" means rooster or cock, Dr. Iravatham Mahadevan, in a paper presented at the World Classical Tamil Conference 2010, brought forth the literal meaning of "Kukkutarma", as "the ruined city of the cock".
_	The Red Queen Hypothesis leads to the understanding that allelic recombination is advantageous for populations that engage in aggressive biotic interactions, such as predator-prey or parasite-host interactions.
_	Shelby resigns and her club dissolves, with the original defectors, plus a greatly improved Sugar, returning to New Directions with the understanding that they will be given more solos.
_	Eventually Rewi agreed to sell land to the government for the main trunk railway line on the understanding that his men would be paid to cut the bush for the surveyors and no alcohol was to be sold in the King Country.
_	These approaches begin with the understanding that a damaged mangrove area may be able to repair itself through the natural processes of secondary succession, without being physically planted, provided that its tidal and freshwater hydrology is functioning normally and there is an adequate supply of seedlings.
_	However, such conduct was unknown since 1701, and this, in his view, reflected the understanding that appointment to the Bench means that "the practice of law is abandoned forever".
_	This gave birth to the structural comparison between the starting materials, products, and the possible "stable intermediates" that led to the understanding that the most stable product is not always the one that is favored in a reaction process.
_	In 1965, he accepted an assistant coaching position at rapidly growing Indiana State University with the understanding that he would be named the head coach for the 1966 season.
_	The NHSS was developed with the understanding that achieving improved health security at the national level is a long term proposition.
_	This view contradicts the soteriology conveyed at the Council of Jerusalem (c. 50 AD), when Paul of Tarsus established the understanding that Christians are not required to be circumcised to attain salvation.
_	In a simplified model, at each clock cycle an instruction from one of the threads is executed and another memory request is queued with the understanding that by the time the next round of execution is ready the requested data has arrived.
_	on the understanding that formula_13.
_	Major Boyington and Major Stan Bailey were given permission to form the unassigned pilots into a squadron, with the understanding that they would have less than four weeks to have them fully trained and ready for combat.
_	This came despite the fact that the building itself was built and paid for by the Scouts, and given to the city with the understanding that the Scouts would be allowed to remain in it "in perpetuity."
_	By 1996 they made a secret agreement for Khun Sa to surrender to the Burmese government, under the understanding that he would receive government protection and that he would not be extradited.
_	The first of these stems from the understanding that sleep paralysis is a parasomnia resulting from dysfunctional overlap of the REM and waking stages of sleep.
_	His government, nominated by both the Czech major parties (Topolánek's Civic Democratic Party and Czech Social Democratic Party) was inaugurated on 8 May 2009 on the understanding that the early election would be in October; however unexpected development in the Constitutional Court and House of Deputies postponed them to May 2010.
_	The GCP facilitate access to original data with the understanding that the primary datasets will be referenced in future work (See Table).
_	In the physics literature the "v" are often suppressed and the primary field written Φ("z"), with the understanding that it is labelled by the corresponding irreducible representation of formula_5.
_	Their permission is given on the understanding that it can be withdrawn at any time for any reason.
_	Prior to a bout, both boxers agree upon the weight of gloves to be used in the bout, with the understanding that lighter gloves allow heavy punchers to inflict more damage.
_	These candidates were not opposed by the Liberal Party in the election and ran with the understanding that they would sit with and support the Liberals in the Parliament and attend Liberal caucus meetings.
_	He asked whether the "Ansar" would prefer that the land be given to the "Muhajirun", who would then be independent and able to leave the "Ansar" homes, or whether he should enrich the "Ansar" on the understanding that they would continue to host the "Muhajirun".
_	Governor Smith appointed Moran with the understanding that Moran was to become a candidate for the remaining year of the term as County Clerk at the November 1920 election.
_	The Fairweather Lodge model also includes an employment component, with the understanding that participation in gainful employment supports mental health recovery.
_	The docks were being used to a greater extent by the Army transports, than by Navy ships, and the Army was actually attempting to get possession of Quarantine Wharf (which was built by the Territorial Government on the Naval Reservation, with the understanding that it could be taken over at any time by the Navy Department upon the payment of its appraised value.)
_	William I of the Netherlands was persuaded to purchase some valuable items from Princess Gallitzin's estate with the understanding that the proceeds were to be sent to his old friend.
_	The results of their experimentation yielded the understanding that inoculation coupled with reactance-enhanced messages leads to "stronger resistance effects" (p. 148).
_	The first proposals for a line were made in 1863 with local grandees and businessmen supporting the project on the understanding that it would stimulate trade, as well as the wish not to become a backwater compared to other ports that had a rail connection.
_	This model of the constitutional economics is based on the understanding that it is necessary to narrow the gap between practical enforcement of the economic, social, and political rights granted by the constitution and the annual (or midterm) economic policy, budget legislation and administrative policies conducted by the government.
_	White Wolf needed someone with expertise in the legal and mechanical issues related to the d20 trademark license, which led to asking Necromancer Games for help in forming White Wolf's "Sword & Sorcery" imprint, with the understanding that it would publish not only the works of the Sword & Sorcery Studio, but the books of Necromancer Games as well.
_	R. Travers based his work on the understanding that the term refers to Jesus, and it was also the understanding of Joseph Klausner.
_	The Canadian Iroquois joined the expedition, which left Montreal on 29 February 1756 on the understanding that they would only fight against the British, not the League Iroquois, and they would not be assaulting a fort.
_	Venables spent £1,500 to sign striker Rachid Harkouk from Feltham, coming up with half of this sum out of his own funds on the understanding that he would receive 50% of any future transfer fee for the player.
_	Given the rate that current funds are being consumed and the catastrophic damage, the United States Senate almost doubled the requested amount to $15.3 billion, with the understanding that this would only be about 10% of what will be required for responding to Harvey.
_	When a landowner left England to fight in the Crusades, he conveyed ownership of his lands in his absence to manage the estate and pay and receive feudal dues, on the understanding that the ownership would be conveyed back on his return.
_	The genius of Eastern mystical theology lay, he contended, in its "apophatic" character, which he defined as the understanding that God is radically unknowable in human, thus philosophical, terms.
_	These are held with the understanding that they will keep them as long as space is available.
_	This was reluctantly agreed to by Hines with the understanding that those buried would be later disinterred and shipped home or to Arlington when permitted by the State health authorities.
_	Tomorrow, with the understanding that it was a talent contest based upon original material and artistry, quite
_	Since, however, she knows he would never sell the bottle to her knowingly, Kokua is forced to bribe an old sailor to buy the bottle for four centimes, with the understanding that she will secretly buy it back for three.
_	The day after the Nagasaki attack, the Japanese sent out a radio transmission saying that it was ready to accept the terms of the allies' Potsdam Declaration, "with the understanding that said declaration does not comprise any demand which prejudices the prerogatives of His Majesty as a sovereign ruler."
_	The sale was opposed by members of the museum as well as the descendants of Norman Rockwell (who donated work to the museum with the understanding that it would always remain at the museum).
_	The mission of the foundation is to "protect the diversity of nature and our quality of life, now and for the future" and their vision is "that within a generation, Canadians act on the understanding that we are all interconnected and interdependent with nature".
_	The honor system is also a system granting freedom from customary surveillance (as to students or prisoners) with the understanding that those who are so freed will be bound by their honor to observe regulations (e.g. prison farms are operated under the honor system), and will therefore not abuse the trust placed in them.
_	On May 25, 1738, after listening to a reading of Martin Luther's preface to Romans, John came to the understanding that his good works could not save him and he could rest in God's grace for salvation.
_	‘The Oruaiti Experiment’ as it became known, was approved, on the understanding that Richardson would write a yearly report and a serious document at the conclusion of the experiment.
_	The first record of a schoolmaster dates from 1407 when one Maurice Plank was given leave to study at Cambridge University for two terms on the understanding that he would appoint an usher to teach in his absence.
_	The studio bought the rights in 1995 with the understanding that The Samuel Goldwyn Company would be involved in creative decisions.
_	Instead of providing military support to the U.S and its military allies, Mexico would provide laborers to the U.S. with the understanding that border security and illegal labor restrictions would be tightened by the United States.
_	The two railroads raced to the meeting point, on the understanding that the first to arrive would not have to pay to maintain the crossing.
_	Doug Ford, in a later conversation with "The National Post", insisted that the brothers entered into the project with Sun with the understanding that "Ford Nation" was a "one-off" project, one that was not intended to evolve into prolonged status.
_	Wesley Rose, at this time acting as Orbison's agent, moved him from Monument Records to Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer (MGM) (though in Europe he remained with Decca's London Records) for $1 million, and the understanding that he would expand into television and films, as Elvis Presley had done.
_	They were hired on the understanding that they would be prepared, if necessary, to kill the tsar, about which they were sworn to secrecy.
_	The United States Congress passed the Act with the understanding that “it is important for the development of children and the family unit that fathers and mothers be able to participate in early childrearing … [and] the lack of employment policies to accommodate working parents can force individuals to choose between job security and parenting”.
_	Although the details remain in some dispute, the escape is suspected to have been arranged and financed by members of Nelson's newly formed gang, including Homer Van Meter, Tommy Carroll, Eddie Green, and John "Red" Hamilton, with the understanding that Dillinger would repay some part of the bribe money out of his share of the first robbery.
_	In order to aid the teams to select the final fifteen, teams were given the option to announce a thirty-man squad by mid-January, with the understanding that the final squad would be picked from within these thirty players.
_	The adverse finding was based on a media statement to The Australian which made the positive statement; "we agreed to assist with the airline bookings on the understanding that they would pick up the cost" when it was known at the time by the Minister that the possibility of the airfares being repaid was only mooted after the tickets had been booked.
_	In 1934, Rimmer became pastor of the First Presbyterian Church of Duluth, Minnesota, on the understanding that he would spend six months of the year writing and lecturing.
_	We also affirm the Nicene Creed, with the understanding that views may differ on baptism and the meaning of the word "catholic."
_	Unlike his earlier wives, Maria (who was formerly known as "Ria") accepted his lifestyle completely, and when they moved to Den Ilp it was in the understanding that they lived in complete "innocence" according to Anton's "System".
_	For citizens outside the nationalist right the period around the Oslo Accords represented a time when negotiation over territory became acceptable on the understanding that the alternative was the probability that Israel would have to lose either its liberal democracy or Zionist identity.
_	With the understanding that the dominance of the landowners in the rural areas was to continue under Liberal Alliance government, the Northeastern oligarchies were thus integrated into the Vargas alliance in a subordinate status via a new political party, the Social Democratic Party (PSD).
_	A compromise was then arranged, whereby Rous stood down on the understanding that room should be made for him in 1768 at the latest, and the 1761 election was uncontested.
_	Cognitive shift (in the development of psychology) is also a term that relates to the understanding that thoughts (i.e. cognitions) play a key role in a person's emotional state and actions (behaviour).
_	She felt unable to chair the meeting because it was not appropriate for an unmarried woman to do so, but persuaded a Mrs Thomas to take that position on the understanding that Dalrymple would do all the talking.
_	The painting was donated to the college by the widow of Thomas Combe, Printer to the University of Oxford, Tractarian and a patron of the Pre-Raphaelites, in the year following his death in 1872 on the understanding that it would hang in the chapel (constructed 1873–76) but the building's architect William Butterfield was opposed to this and made no provision in his design.
_	During the application process, Richardson-Merrell asked the FDA for quick approval of the drug, and distributed 2.5 million tablets of thalidomide to 1,200 American doctors with the understanding that the drug was under investigation, a preemptive marketing strategy that was permissible at the time under existing regulations.
_	Sadler was made chairman of the Committee, which allowed him to make his case by hearing evidence from witnesses of Sadler's selection, on the understanding that opponents of the Bill (or of some feature of it) would then have their innings.
_	As part of the Compromise of 1877, in which Southern Democrats would acknowledge Republican Rutherford B. Hayes as president, had the understanding that Republicans would meet certain demands.
_	The film starts with the understanding that the makers of the Benji films are going to various towns in the U.S. looking for the next dog to play Benji.
_	This is based on the understanding that indulging in such desires perpetuates the underlying craving.
_	Clairemont was established in 1892 to coincide with the organization of Kent County with the understanding that it would serve as the county's seat of government.
_	Underlying the foundation of light as therapy is the understanding that all living organisms have biological rhythms that repeat approximately in 24-hour cycles, in accordance with the cycle of sunlight.
_	It is based on the understanding that children must first be fed nutritionally before being able to grow through educational engagements.
_	The effectiveness of evaluative conditioning hinges on the understanding that implicit self-esteem is interpersonally associative in nature, and that there is a causal relationship between the self and positive/negative social feedback.
_	Sammy offers to sign the contract over to the Wang family: this would free Sammy from the contract and arrange a suitable wife for Ta. Sammy has taken the liberty of bringing the girl and her father with him; Wang is charmed ("A Hundred Million Miracles") and invites them to live in his home on the understanding that if the proposed marriage falls through, Fong will still be bound to marry Mei Li.
_	Whilst there are many variations on the critical theme in criminology, the term critical criminology has become a cynosure for perspectives that take to be fundamental the understanding that certain acts are crimes because certain people have the power to make them so.
_	The episode ends with Stella and Rob heading into a nearby town with the understanding that Taggart would call upon Stella for possible courtship.
_	Shanks' teaching philosophy emphasized the importance of gaining knowledge and training the student to "see" with the understanding that it takes years of concentration and practice to become a highly skilled painter.
_	Just as they know from the Torah that God created man and trees and the light on its way from the stars in their observed state, so too can they know that the world was created in its over the six days of Creation that reflects progression to its currently-observed state, with the understanding that physical ways to verify this may eventually be identified.
_	He said that one member of the party was only accepted by the appointments committee on the understanding that Herzog could send him away at any time.
_	His cooperation came with the understanding that Manon would be allowed to stay with him and his new wife, , at Dessau, where the Bauhaus had relocated.
_	The Court had always recognized Fourth Amendment rights in offices, he said, despite the understanding that it would be visited by others.
_	The Methodist presentation of sanctification includes the understanding that justification before God comes through faith.
_	Cowboy Frank Patterson "made some kind of a compromise" with Captain Hurst and persuaded the posse to withdraw with the understanding that the mules would be returned.
_	However, scholars usually submit their own considerations and findings to a public forum that evaluates criticisms on their merits and faults, with the explicit aim to contribute to the search for truth, and with the understanding that the criticism could be wrong.
_	Mzilikazi negotiated to settle in Mthwakazi and this gentleman's agreement is what led to the understanding that: "UMthwakazi wawubuswa ngobudlelwano bukaMambo loMzilikazi", loosely translated as Mthwakazi was governed by a coalition of Mambo and Mzilikazi.
_	Groundwork Neath Port Talbot (the government body responsible to Bridgend County Council for the regeneration of the Garw Valley) leased the trackbed from Network Rail for 125 years on the understanding that it found a companion railway company to oversee the 4 miles 56 chains of track from Pontycymer to Brynmenyn.
_	This goal is accomplished by promoting research, education and conservation with the understanding that social well-being and biological and cultural conservation are inextricably linked.
_	West presented James G. Blaine for nomination for President at the 1884 Republican National Convention, with the understanding that he would be appointed Attorney General if Blaine should be President.
_	The helpline was founded on the understanding that some students would be reluctant to approach outsiders for help and would find it easier to speak to another student.
_	In 1947, the Banco Urquijo group had revived the S.I.A.T. project and in the next year the talks ended successfully with the signing of a three-part contract, with the understanding that the INI would hold a 51% controlling interest as well as a ruling act in the new company preserving a focused approach of the enterprise in the 'national interest'.
_	As a part of the scheme, Douglas was released as well, with the understanding that he would strengthen Edward’s hand with military support.
_	Alcohol was considered an essential beverage, due to the understanding that water was not safe to drink.
_	With the understanding that the law provided for the formation of local committees to govern the use of church buildings, local authorities gathered residents in a public place to facilitate the devolution of church buildings, according to Ramirez, and priests
_	Due to a growing number of otherwise healthy players choosing to skip the All-Star Game to rest, the NHL began to enforce the understanding that players that are named to the event must participate in some capacity.
_	Westwood Studios co-founder and "Dune II" producer Brett Sperry said in 2008 that conceptualization for the game began when Virgin president Martin Alper approached him with the offer of using their "Dune" license to produce a game, with the understanding that Cryo's "Dune" had been cancelled.
_	When "General" Skandor Akbar entered the Mid-South and started to build a stable of heels, he presented Buddy Landel with a golden Rolex watch with the understanding that it wasn’t actually for Landel but for someone else Akbar was trying to recruit.
_	The loans were made with the understanding that they would be repaid once the players turned pro.
_	By this time, Bitar had begun discussions with Umran, which concluded with the understanding that Umran and Hafiz would act as the party's defenders against the Military Committee and their allies.
_	The further discussion concerns the differences between Anglian and West Saxon, with the understanding that Kentish, other than where noted, can be derived from Anglian by front-vowel merger.
_	Carnegie promised £10,000 to create such a library on the understanding that Keighley was also willing to help itself and invoke the Public Libraries Act of 1850.
_	Faith in Buddhism centers on the understanding that the Buddha is an Awakened being, on his superior role as teacher, in the truth of his Dharma (spiritual teachings), and in his Sangha (community of spiritually developed followers).
_	with the understanding that these are all "new" relative to the Mesozoic ("middle life" - the age of dinosaurs) and Paleozoic ("old life" - Trilobites, coal forests, and the earliest Synapsida) eras.
_	With the understanding that MFA had applications beyond structural isolation, Greg founded the Silicon Valley technology company, Arx Pax, and invented and patented (Patent No: US 9,126,487 B2) Magnetic Field Architecture (MFA) technology.
_	During the discussions he was able to negotiate for the seizure and disarmament of the French fleet by he British in exchange for protection for the city of Toulon, on the understanding that when the Republicans had been defeated and the French monarchy restored all would be returned to France.
_	The aircraft were purchased by the War and Navy Departments and leased back to Pan Am for a dollar, with the understanding that all would be operated by the Navy once four-engined replacements for the Army's four Clippers were in service.
_	Therefore, the only rational way to live is by fulfilling bodily needs and in the present with the understanding that death could come at any moment.
_	The anti-Federalists agreed to support ratification, with the understanding that they would put forth recommendations for amendments should the document go into effect.
_	The list of locations of the Jewish ghettos within the borders of pre-war and post-war Poland is compiled with the understanding that their inhabitants were either of Polish nationality from before the invasion, or had strong historical ties with Poland.
_	John Howard announced that Speedrail was the preferred party, and gave the go ahead for the project to move into the 'proving up' stage, on the understanding that if the project proceeded, it would be at "no net cost to the taxpayer".
_	The service began this job with the understanding that it could not be solely a Coast Guard operation.
_	The owners of Mells Park were Sir John Horner and his wife Frances, née Graham, who was Agnes Jekyll's sister, and they agreed to let the park to McKenna for a nominal rent, on the understanding that he would rebuild the house.
_	It was only following a lengthy telephone consultation with the desperate Himmler that Forster allowed the passengers to disembark, on the understanding that their residence in the Reichsgau would be temporary, though most did not, ultimately, leave the region.
_	Armed with only the understanding that the individual LED modules used on a "5050 strip" have package dimensions of 5.0mm x 5.0mm does not clue the buyer into the fact that most 5050s sold have 3 individual LEDs within that package, one each of red, green and blue.
_	After her father’s death in 1928, she cut her long hair into a business-like bob and applied for a reporter’s job with The Globe, on the understanding that she would not work on the Society or Women’s pages.
_	The purchase was on the understanding that the hall would remain in the possession of the previous owner until death, but Mrs Short did not die until 1831, when she was 84.
_	Blamey refused on the grounds that the brigade was not yet fully equipped, but eventually compromised, sending it on the understanding that it would soon be joined by the rest of the 6th Division.
_	The IRA agreed to the ceasefire in August 1994 on the understanding that Sinn Féin would be allowed to take part in peace negotiations, but resumed its campaign with the Docklands bombing when the British government demanded a full IRA disarmament as a precondition for talks.
_	Srikanta, according to Dikshitar, propagated his cult on the understanding that "sagunopasana" (Worship of name and form) is only the first step to "nirgunopasana" (Propitiation of the nameless and formless), and that it was the real intention of Srikanta that the final truth lies only in Shuddhadvaita.
_	Morocco had been re-admitted with the understanding that Western Sahara will remain a member of the AU.
_	His field of work is the science of design, or, as it also known, the area of design theories and methods (DTM), with the understanding that activities like planning, engineering, policy making are included as particular forms of design.
_	Many MS Centers provide additional resources with the understanding that some of the most immediate concerns of the newly diagnosed are not medical but social and psychological.
_	He confirmed some of J.J. Thomson's work, which eventually arrived at the understanding that cathode rays were streams of negatively charged energetic particles.
_	However, the legislative decree that formalized Brazilian’s adhesion to the NPT linked it to the understanding that Article VI of the Treaty – which stipulated negotiations in good faith to cease the nuclear arms race and achieve nuclear disarmament, and the outcome of a treaty on complete disarmament under strict and effective international controls - would be fulfilled.
_	Albert Einstein's development of the theory of relativity in 1905 led to the understanding that nuclear reactions could create new elements from smaller precursors, with the loss of energy.
_	argued, "the growth of the State giving the trustees of public authority more and means to abuse their power, the more the Government has to have force to contain the people, the more force the Sovereign should have in turn in order to contain the Government," with the understanding that the Sovereign is "a collective being of wonder" (Book II, Chapter I) resulting from "the general will" of the people, and that "what any man, whoever he may be, orders on his own, is not a law" (Book II, Chapter VI) – and furthermore predicated on the assumption that the people have an unbiased means by which to ascertain the general will.
_	Maisie also forgave him, on the understanding that he wouldn't hurt her mother again.
_	Under the command of Major-General William George Keith Elphinstone, 4,500 British and Indian soldiers plus 12,000 civilian camp followers, including wives and children, set out for Jalalabad on 6 January 1842, on the understanding that they had been offered safe passage.
_	This discovery eventually led to the understanding that neutron stars with extremely high magnetic field called magnetars are the soft gamma-ray repeaters.
_	Hired based on recommendations from general manager Joe Burke to owner Bob Short, Herzog had the understanding that he was to help develop the team's young prospects.
_	Initially, slavery in the colony was complicated by France's ethical stance on the matter: slave ownership in New France was not legally recognized (as per their free-soil doctrine), but it could still be justified with the understanding that only the act of enslaving people was deemed unethical and simply buying or receiving slaves was accepted.
_	Though he emerges as an Epicurean, it is on the understanding that philosophical preferences, like political and social choices, are a matter of personal taste.
_	The Polish-Lithuanian parliament had been urged by Anna Jagiellon, the sister of the recently deceased king Sigismund II Augustus, to elect him based on the understanding that Henry would wed Anna afterward.
_	He was relegated the office of Governor of Manu'a for the term of life and the understanding that the Tui Manu'a title would follow him to the grave.
_	On the other hand, the European Commission has privileged the understanding that the media sector should be regulated, as any other economic field, following the principles of market harmonization and liberalization.
_	She has also shown more tolerance towards Issei's dreams of becoming Harem King, even allowing everyone to make dates with Issei with the understanding that he will always return to her afterwards.
_	They however agreed to his idea to raise at least three multiracial battalions recruited from among the locals in Malaya and mooted the formation of the Federation Regiment with the understanding that each battalion would be balanced by an additional battalion of the Malay Regiment.
_	They made a separate peace with the British with the understanding that the British Army would withdraw from the Ohio Country.
_	Triggered by Townsend's gift, the Astronomical Society of Christchurch made its funds of NZ£420 available to the college on the understanding that an observatory would be built.
_	Whilst the contract between Christina and Ruaidhrí concerned the understanding that the Clann Ruaidhrí lordship should remain (at least temporarily) in the possession of the male line of the kindred, it recognised Christina's rights to the heritage, and accepted the somewhat looser marriage customs in this region of the realm.
_	In November that year he obtained an engagement with Murray's stock company at Edinburgh, at a salary of 30 shillings a week, on the understanding that he was to play "second heavy" parts.
_	Deputy Director of the PDC Keri Butler said of the bas-reliefs, “The Public Design Commission has reviewed the methods and materials for removing the artworks from the facade of the library and temporarily storing them, and has found these methods to be appropriate with the understanding that a proposal for relocating the artworks within the new development at 280 Cadman Plaza
_	Erekosë is released with the understanding that Ermizhad will be released in turn, but when he reaches Necranal he finds that she is still a prisoner.
_	Three members of the band signed the proposed contract on this date, with the understanding that Feargal Sharkey and Michael Bradley would discuss negotiations to the contract with Seymour Stein in person in London.
_	Before the Great Depression, the United States adhered to a social model that could be summarized by the term "rugged individualism": the understanding that because most people are capable of taking care of themselves, each person should be left to succeed or fail on their own, only fettered by the bounds of the law, and the government should be limited to protection of civil liberties.
_	Johnson, in fact, signed an exclusive three-year contract with the Robert Stigwood Organization, with the understanding that RSO would develop film and music projects for her.
_	But a person who lies to a neighbour to secure the loan of a power drill does not commit an offence because the benefit is not obtained on the understanding that it has been or will be paid for.
_	(Historic references to hermaphroditism have been superseded by the understanding that true hermaphroditism has never been observed in humans.)
_	But on November 2, some of the black men were released, if they could post a $1,000 bond, "with the understanding that they were to boost for [Fred] Mortimer," who was running for "the most important county office," State Attorney, in an election taking place the following day.
_	Francisco Portusach returned to Piti where his brother was waiting for him, and was informed that the Spanish officers were under arrest, but had been paroled with the understanding that they would deliver themselves on board the "Charleston" so they might be taken to Manila as prisoners of war.
_	Through rigorous testing, Kamara was found that it was not the case that his condition could cause concern, and he was cleared to continue in his professional career with full medical clearance and it was announced that Kamara intended to continue his career in Major League Soccer club D.C. United where he would be allowed to play, with the understanding that he would undergo tests for preventative measures at the end of each season.
_	In certain industries, goods are distributed to downstream members in the supply chain with the understanding that the goods may be returned for credit if they are not sold e.g., newspapers and magazines.
_	Roy Mason, at the time the President of the Board of Trade, gave the Government's preliminary approval to BOAC's proposed takeover of BUA, on the understanding that there were no realistic prospects of a merger with another independent airline as recommended in the Edwards report.
_	Whilst the exhibition was in London, it was announced that Orpen was donating all the works on display to the British government on the understanding that they should remain in their white frames and be kept together as a single body of work.
_	It was designated as a temporary burial ground with the understanding that the bodies would be reburied in another, permanent cemetery after the war.
_	At a hearing before the United States District Court for the District of Connecticut Macintosh explained that the moral principles of Christianity would allow him to take the Oath of Allegiance with the understanding that he was only swearing to take up arms in what he believed was a just war.
_	The Stone of Scone was returned to London, where it remained until 1996, when it was moved to Edinburgh Castle "on loan" with the understanding that it would be brought back to Westminster Abbey for the next Coronation.
_	The magazine was launched with the understanding that it would concentrate primarily on literary and cultural themes, thereby leaving "The New Masses" to pursue a heavier portion of political themes.
_	Deep ecology takes a more holistic view of the world human beings live in and seeks to apply to life the understanding that the separate parts of the ecosystem (including humans) function as a whole.
_	The Wikimedia Foundation's 2014 refusal to remove the pictures from its Wikimedia Commons image library was based on the understanding that copyright is held by the creator, that a non-human creator (not being a legal person) cannot hold copyright, and that the images are thus in the public domain.
_	The Commission on Narcotic Drugs did amend the Schedules to include stereoisomerisms, however, with the understanding that "specific isomers that did not have hazardous pharmacological activity and that posed no danger to society could be excluded from control, as dextromethorphan had been in the case of Schedule I of the 1961 Convention."
_	Offsetting the advantages of night bombing was the understanding that identifying the targets and attacking them accurately would be much more difficult.
_	In 1634 the issue of the "Graces" arose; generous taxation for Charles I (whose Queen Henrietta Maria was Catholic) was supported by Irish Catholic landlords on the understanding that the laws would be reformed, but once the tax was passed, Charles' viceroy refused two of the 51 Graces, and subsequent bills were blocked by the Catholic majority in the Irish House of Lords.
_	Of this amount Congress appropriated $300,000, with the understanding that the permanent buildings were to become, after the Export Exposition, the home of the Commercial Museum.
_	In 2002, a UK-based essay mill called Elizabeth Hall Associates required students purchasing essays to sign a disclaimer stating that "any material provided by Elizabeth Hall Associates [is] on the understanding that it is a guidance model only."
_	Hours before her death she was convinced by her final lover, John Rees, to sign a will leaving her entire estate to him, with the understanding that he would take care of her children.
_	Following the First World War the Republic of France granted Canada perpetual use of a portion of land on Vimy Ridge under the understanding that the Canadians were to use the land to establish a battlefield park and memorial.
_	The British did not believe that, under the circumstances obtaining in January 1955, the offer of an amnesty would be likely to bring in more surrenders than their current policy of encouraging the terrorists to surrender individually in the understanding that they would be fairly and humanely treated.
_	The Louisiana Board of Ethics later fined Faircloth $1,000 for not having waited for at least one year as required by state law but suspended payment with the understanding that Faircloth remain in accord with the law.
_	Correctly done, documentation can accentuate the effect of beautiful code, when it is clear, concise, explains the intent of the programmer, and expands the understanding that one can gain by simply looking at the code.
_	The rationale behind the Supreme Court decision revolves around the understanding that, as the opinion notes, "the exclusionary rule has its limitations."
_	He signed with the club on the understanding that Branfoot would teach him the ropes of coaching.
_	Ballantine reluctantly agrees to re-enlist, on the understanding that the enlistment paper will be torn up after the rescue.
_	Support for the understanding that the spirits in prison are angelic beings and not people is thought to be confirmed by II Peter 2:4–5 and Jude 6, which refer to rebellious angels, punished by God with imprisonment.
_	No one had the least suspicion of the understanding that existed between the trio."
_	Rustin and Walter Fauntroy negotiated some security issues with the government, gaining approval for private marshals with the understanding that these would not be able to act against outside agitators.
_	Both the Factory and Silk Factory bills were given unopposed second readings on the understanding that all issues would be discussed at committee stage, both were withdrawn before going into committee, the Whigs having been defeated on a motion of no confidence, and a General Election imminent.
_	Even medical problems related to female organs were disregarded with the understanding that only sexually active women could have them, and even so, help was difficult to find.
_	His analysis is based upon the understanding that the measurement beams travel within a boundary layer close to the Earth's surface, which behaves differently from the atmosphere at large.
_	Under the Butterfield-Douglas system, the General Land Office temporarily retained fifty percent of the real property within each land grant strip; but these sections were retained subject to the understanding that the railroad construction would open these sections for settlement and frontier farmers would eagerly buy them up when the time came.
_	The College operates with the understanding that the Church will not need the land and buildings for any other purpose.
_	The development of a sense of self and the understanding that one is separate and uniquely different from others is vital in the development of the self-reference effect advantage.
_	The Sasanians advanced to conquer San'a, however, Sayf was instated as King on the understanding that he would send taxes to Khosrau.
_	In July 1976, Gates was promoted to the post of Lecturer in Afro-American Studies with the understanding that he would be promoted to assistant professor upon completion of his doctoral dissertation.
_	For the First Transcontinental Railroad, the United States government had made extensive grants of public land to the railway's builders, inducing private financiers to fund the railway on the understanding that they would acquire rich farmland along the route, which could then be sold for a large profit.
_	Consideration must also be given to the understanding that the load bearing part of an ICF wall is the concrete, which, without special preparations, does not extend in any direction to the edge of the form.
_	Crisis Intervention Centres (CICs) are also managed under the understanding that fighting gender-based violence involves direct assistance as well as sensitization and mobilization of grassroots communities.
_	Fields, who was one of the first people to visit Exile Island in this season, had shared all the clues to the location of the Hidden Immunity Idol that she had gathered with Chan, with the understanding that the two of them would share the idol in a similar manner that Chan and Earl Cole did in "".
_	The Normans allowed an emir to remain in power with the understanding that he would pay an annual tribute to them in mules, horses, and munitions.
_	Austin donated it to Northwestern University in 1929 with the understanding that the income derived from it would "provide scholarships for the training of business executives".
_	Eventually she goads him into facing his accusers, and he initiates court proceedings on the understanding that if he loses he will be allowed to take gentlemen's way out with a pistol.
_	During the Second World War Walton was exempted from military service on the understanding that he would compose music for wartime propaganda films.
_	Specifically, although Feuerverger had factored into his calculations the understanding that Bovon had identified Mariamne as the most likely name of Mary Magdalene, Bovon did not hold that belief.
_	Franklin penned a retirement column on theplayerstribune.com in which he indicated that a recent conversation with his mother helped make the decision and the understanding that “his body has slowed down.
_	On the death of Jeremiah Milles in February 1784, King was elected his successor in the presidency of the Society of Antiquaries, though on the understanding that Lord De Ferrars would assume the office on the ensuing 23 April.
_	Knoblock wrote the play for Asche, with the understanding that Asche could revise it.
_	In February 2008, the Central Corridor Management Committee passed a resolution to include below-ground infrastructure for the Hamline, Victoria and Western stations "with the understanding that, if the CEI increases or other dollars are made available by mid-summer 2008, the first claim on those dollars would be one of the infill stations."
_	The film team signed on to make a film documenting the 1,000 mile journey from Biloxi, Mississippi to Washington DC with the understanding that Leapheart and the filming crew would be responsible for their own arrangements, finances, strategy, etc.
_	All compensation adjustments were predefined based on the bucket, and employees in the bottom bucket were ineligible to change positions since they would have the understanding that they might soon be yanked.
_	The cathedral chapter of Mainz Cathedral elected Lothar Friedrich von Metternich-Burscheid Coadjutor Archbishop of Mainz on 15 December 1670, with the understanding that he would succeed as Archbishop upon the death of Johann Philipp von Schönborn.
_	The order of the spectrochemical series can be derived from the understanding that ligands are frequently classified by their donor or acceptor abilities.
_	The move to Greenway was made with the understanding that it was only a one-year shift of location.
_	Instart was built with the understanding that 3rd-party cloud services make up approximately 75% of modern web applications.
_	Andrew at a gas station, tells him she can't be around him anymore, and gives him money and clothes with the understanding that he is now on his own.
_	They agreed to allow very limited use for member businesses already online, with the understanding that they discontinue use within three years.
_	In 1898 a shield was offered by Sir Thomas Dewar, the current Sheriff of London, with the understanding that it would pit the best professional side and amateur side against each other with proceeds going to charity.
_	Both claims were admitted by Charles on the understanding that if these families died out both territories should pass to the House of Luxembourg.
_	A bid of $39,975 from Schmidt Bros. was accepted on May 24, 1902, with the understanding that the courthouse would be ready for occupancy by December 1.
_	The Hongs donated the collection to St. Olaf College in 1976 with the understanding that it be made available as a center for research and publication.
_	The note read:"No. 76 HM Prison Perth""July 10th 1914""Prisoner's Name & Reg. No. Maude Edwards""I herewith beg to make an application to be liberated on licence on the understanding that I give an undertaking to refrain from militancy in the future.
_	However, he had become Quartermaster General on the understanding that he should retain the right to command troops in the field.
_	Keaton reportedly was cast as Jack Shephard in the series "Lost", with the understanding that the role of Jack would be a brief one.
_	As part of the Compromise of 1877, in which Southern Democrats would acknowledge Republican Rutherford B. Hayes as president, had the understanding that Republicans would meet certain demands.
_	His recent magazine writings have been selective and only on the understanding that he retains full copyright.
_	South Africa was provisionally invited to the Games, on the understanding that all segregation and discrimination in sport would be eliminated by the 1972 Games.
_	In July 1846, Col. Jonathan D. Stevenson of New York was asked to raise a volunteer regiment of 10 companies of 77 men each to go to California with the understanding that they would muster out and stay in California.
_	It has since become the understanding that the nature of these inconsistencies is a clear indicator of false confessions.
_	In these types of forced marriages, the marital union begins with the man's intense sense of control over the woman, combined with the understanding that the wife is the possession of her husband (Menjívar, 2016).
_	Min-jun is also overwhelmed by the understanding that he has met his match.
_	Level 2 perspective-taking, however, is defined as the understanding that another person can see things differently in physical space and how those objects are organized from that other person’s point of view.
_	Such intelligence might have been obtained through foreign security agencies on the understanding that the source and details would not be disclosed to an open court.
_	Financial responsibility was accepted by Queensland Railways on the understanding that Commonwealth subsidies would be available.
_	After World War II, amateur radio operators in the US started to receive obsolete but usable Teletype Model 26 equipment from commercial operators with the understanding that this equipment would not be used for or returned to commercial service.
_	"Sarvam khalvidam Brahman" (all this is Brahman) is "paroksha" knowledge, but the understanding that "Aham Brahman Asmi" (I am Brahman) is "aparoksha" knowledge.
_	Leszczyński received Lorraine with the understanding that it would fall to the French crown on his death.
_	The Broad-Based Black Economic Empowerment Act (Act 53 of 2003) essentially works on the understanding that years of systemic racism contribute to contemporary economic woes, and that government intervention can stem the results of past racist regimes.
_	It argues that anti-Zionism may become antisemitic when it adopts a view of Zionism as a "global force of unlimited power and malevolence throughout history," a definition that "bears no relation to the understanding that most Jews have of the concept: that is, a movement of Jewish national liberation ..."
_	With the understanding that James Milson's first employer in the colony had been Robert Campbell at Canterbury, this is the most likely scenario of Milson's second workplace at the "Field of Mars".
_	The others will then follow suit, raising or lowering their prices by the same amount, with the understanding that greater profits result.
_	In 1992, the Port San Luis Harbor District received the Point San Luis site from the Federal Government, with the understanding that the light station be a historical, educational, and recreational site, for the use and enjoyment of the public.
_	Having the understanding that a piece of paper could be torn apart but not a sculpture, held the idea of lasting permanence to the thought of creating.
_	This was derived from the understanding that certain memory operations – such as those conducted in a critical section - need not be seen by all processors – until after all operations in the critical section are completed for instance.
_	Compliance with §2302(c) certification provides federal employees with the understanding that:
_	Schools continued to be maintained by churches in instances where they failed to reach an agreement with government officials with the understanding that the government would provide support for capital costs.
_	Considering the prevalence of capital to be lent for a certain period of time, with the understanding that it will be returned to the investor, money-time relationships analyze the costs associated with these types of actions.
_	However, Smith maintains silence and is eventually released on the understanding that he will henceforth be operating under the paid protection of Rogerson and his colleagues.
_	Council made the runway available should Qantas need it, but only on the understanding that the Boeing may not be able to take off again.
_	Ellis' book was originally optioned by producer Marvin Worth for $7,500 before its publication in June 1985 with the understanding that 20th Century Fox would finance it.
_	The lease was just over £52 per annum and it was obtained on the understanding that he spend £3,500 on the construction of the villa.
_	The general principle behind the process of "qiyas" is based on the understanding that every legal injunction guarantees a beneficial and welfare satisfying objective.
_	At the same time we are committed to the understanding that knowledge is a means to a larger end.
_	He credited Darwin with establishing the understanding that "Nature abhors close fertilization".
_	The pair gave Aguilera the opportunity to use a recording studio and presented her with demo music with the understanding that they could use the material for their own purpose, but also claiming they would not commercially release the recordings.
_	In 1876, the British had annexed Fingoland, the Idutywa reserve and other Xhosa lands, on the understanding that the Cape government should take them over and provide for their government, however there was a serious rebellion by the Gcalekas and the Gaikas and a considerable force of imperial and colonial troops was required to put down the uprising.
_	His popularity within the army led many of its officers to petition on his behalf and eventually to placate them, all charges against Wilmot were dropped on the understanding that he would retire overseas.
_	In November 2012, Rahman overruled the recommendation of his councillors that Henry Moore's "Draped Seated Woman", donated by the artist on the understanding that it would be permanently available for public appreciation in a socially deprived area of London, should not be sold.
_	He would deal each partner a poker hand, with the understanding that the loser would serve as the other’s butler for an entire year.
_	Rees' lover, author Grace Metalious, was persuaded by him just before her death to sign a will leaving her entire estate to him, with the understanding that he would take care of her children.
_	Finally, permissions were received on the understanding that the proposed plaque was to be of an equal size and quality and placed directly below one already on the site.
_	With the understanding that ‘If I don’t compromise, someone else will have to suffer from the consequences’ in the players’ mind, they learn true friendship and respecting others through this sport.
_	The observation by Edwin Hubble in 1929 that the speed at which galaxies recede positively correlates with their distance, led to the understanding that the universe is expanding, and the formulation of the Big Bang theory by Georges Lemaître.
_	of propositional calculus (or the understanding that all tautologies of propositional calculus are to
_	(2) Dharma turns into the path is explained as:if there is the rational mind of loving kindness and compassion that cherishes other more than oneself-the fictional enlightenment mind-and then on top of that the understanding that all phenomena, outer and inner, appearing as the coming together of interdependency are illusory, then the primal dharma turns into the path.
_	She presented publicly the understanding that sexuality has a political component.
_	Soon afterwards, the adults appear in search of their children, and are finally united by the understanding that it was the unity of their children that helped them find water.
_	In their basic AmbiX file format proposal, Nachbar et al. (2009) deal with mixed-order signals by zeroing the unneeded components, with the understanding that any lossless compression algorithm used on an AmbiX file prior to transmission will deal with this situation efficiently.
_	According to one, the viceroy refused the surrender with the understanding that the British would, "pro forma", lob a few shells on his city so that his men could claim to have fought.
_	With the understanding that chronic hookworm infection can often lead to anemia, many people are now questioning if the treatment of hookworm could effect change in severe anemia rates and thus also on maternal and child health as well.
_	During the summit Nasser also attempted to convince Hussein to purchase Soviet weapons, but the Americans provided Hussein with tanks and jets instead, with the understanding that they would not be used in the West Bank at Israel's request.
_	The latter has become more common with the understanding that the B[e] phenomenon arises separately in a number of distinct types of stars, including some that are clearly just a phase in the life of supergiants.
_	An important contribution of ethnomusicology to clave theory is the understanding that the clave matrix is generated by cross-rhythm.
_	With the understanding that each member of the community has a responsibility to contribute, more experienced members support learners by providing suggestions for how to fulfill the task at hand while the learner's responsibility is to pay close attention.
_	Copernicus introduced our world to the understanding that other planets took similar paths around the sun; while each path differed, all served the same purpose and generated the same result: every planet makes a full path around our central star.
_	Also important to the decision to go hosted may be the understanding that a hosted institutional repository solution "frees a library from both hardware and software support, allowing staff resources to be directed to other publishing service functions such as consulting and workflow design."
_	This was on the understanding that Bismarck would immediately restore the duchy to Prussia; all he wanted was the status and privileges of a mediatized family for himself and his descendants.
_	Pete later joins the new agency formed by Sterling, Cooper, Draper, and Lane Pryce, with the understanding that he is to become a partner, bringing his Sterling Cooper clients with him to their new company.
_	Small quantities of sugar, especially specialty grades of sugar, reach the market as 'fair trade' commodities; the fair trade system produces and sells these products with the understanding that a larger-than-usual fraction of the revenue will support small farmers in the developing world.
_	Key to Franz’s interpretation is the understanding that peasants had benefited from the economic recovery of the early 16th century and that their grievances, as expressed in such documents as the Twelve Articles, had little or no economic basis.
_	The Normans allowed an "emir" to remain in power with the understanding that he would pay an annual tribute to them in mules, horses, and munitions.
_	Brunning was in the band on the understanding that he would leave if McVie agreed to join.
_	Having empathy can include having the understanding that there are many factors that go into decision making and cognitive thought processes.
_	Colonel Stevenson raised a volunteer regiment of ten companies of 77 men each or 770 men to go to California with the understanding that they would be muster out and stay in California.
_	On August 12, 1983, in keeping with Noriega's earlier deal with Paredes, Paredes handed over his position to Noriega, newly appointed a General, with the understanding that Noriega would allow him to stand for President.
_	There have been a host of scholarly works dealing with Sherlock Holmes, some working within the bounds of the Great Game, and some written with the understanding that Holmes is a fictional character.
_	In instances such as this, the Board sets Adequate Intakes (AIs) with the understanding that, at some later date when the physiological effects of biotin are better understood, AIs will be replaced by more exact information.
_	"Celebrity Babylon" agreed to issue a retraction and apology on the understanding that Ronson would drop the claim; Hilton's lawyers asked the judge to throw out the case as an assault on his free speech rights.
_	The portrait was owned by Robert Todd Lincoln's widow, Mary Harlan Lincoln, who bequeathed it to her daughter, Mamie Lincoln Isham, with the understanding that it would be given to the White House when Mamie Lincoln died.
_	American government has long operated under the legacy of "Worcester v. Georgia", which stated strongly that the history of relations with Indians had established the understanding that tribes were "distinct political communities, having territorial boundaries, within which their authority is exclusive".
_	The Texan was given a chance to address the convention with the understanding that it would be his farewell speech.
_	The disciple is asked to enter into a series of vows and commitments that ensure the maintenance of the spiritual link with the understanding that to break this link is a serious downfall.
_	Either this was the understanding that he had of civil society from the start or he later changed his mind for particular political and theoretical reasons and replaced civil society with the Prophet’s Medina.
_	The debates concluded with the understanding that a modified version of the "Agreement", approved by a committee chosen mainly from the ranks of the Army's officers would be the basis of any future constitutional settlement, and that it would be presented to the Army itself at a mass meeting.
_	Congregationalists, Presbyterians, Methodists, and Baptists, as well as many Episcopalians, have historically espoused the view of first-day Sabbatarianism, which teaches that the Lord's Day (Sunday) is the Christian Sabbath, in keeping with the understanding that the moral law contained in the Ten Commandments stands eternally.
_	(iii) "Intangible cultural heritage" is manifested "inter alia" in the following "domains", on the understanding that the expressions of intangible cultural heritage can simultaneously belong to several of these domains:
_	The agreement entailed a large payment of blood money from the Tuqans to the other clans, but with the understanding that Musa Bey would remain "mutasallim" of Nablus.
_	VC was created with the understanding that media and the arts are important vehicles to organize and empower communities, build connections between generations, challenge perspectives, and create an environment for critical thinking, necessary to build a more just and humane society.
_	He purchased an old British gunboat, the "Grappler", five Victoria waterfront lots and one of John Irving's sternwheelers, the "Glenora", with the understanding that Irving would stay away from the Stikine River.
_	In 1973, Johns met Beckett in Paris, where they agreed to work together on a version of "Fizzles", with the understanding that Beckett would translate his French texts into English.
_	He was allowed to return to Cuba for his father's funeral on April 22, 2013, with the understanding that he would return to Florida to fulfill his three years of probation, but on May 3 a federal judge ruled that he could remain in Cuba provided that he renounce his United States citizenship.
_	She herself had long wished to go abroad, and so, when she was offered a salary to begin upon the day of the preliminary offer—this was in April or May—with the understanding that the initial number of the magazine was not to appear until January, and freedom to spend the intervening time where and as she chose, she accepted the offer.
_	The Government paid for the installation of an electrified loop line on the understanding that the Board would buy back the materials at the conclusion of the exhibition.
_	He learns from the museum curator that Nicholas Chapman (Heflin), an American author of popular archaeology books, is eager to go along and work without pay, on the understanding that he will be able to publish his experiences in magazine articles and book form.
_	He owed this to his personal style in which duress, a high level of information, political leniency and diplomatic skills were combined with wit, gallant conversation and the understanding that diplomacy was a permanent process of negotiations in which a victory should never be celebrated too exuberantly at the cost of the loser.
_	Lord Bingham of Cornhill, who took over as Lord Chief Justice in 1996, made arrangements with Lord Mackay of Clashfern (Lord Chancellor under John Major) whereby Lord Justice Kennedy would become Vice-President of the Queen's Bench Division with the understanding that it would be made a statutory office at an early date.
_	King Albert of Sweden ceded Gotland to the Order as a pledge (similar to a fiefdom), with the understanding that they would eliminate the pirating Victual Brothers from this strategic island base in the Baltic Sea.
_	With reference to sub-paragraph (c) of the explanations set out above, I have the honour to inform you that His Majesty's Government in the United Kingdom have taken note of the reservation and recognise in the right therein set out, on the understanding that the 35:100 ratio will be maintained in default of agreement to the contrary between the two Governments.
_	German stamp dealer Hermann Sieger had arranged a deal, in which H. Walter Eierman convinced the Apollo 15 crew members to carry 100 cacheted covers to the moon and back, for the sum of US$7000 each, with the understanding that they would not be sold until after the end of the Apollo program.
_	In a brief battle, they killed 36 Spaniards, including Villasur and Naranjo, 10 Pueblo scouts, and Jean L'Archevêque, a Frenchman who had been brought as an interpreter on the understanding that the French were gaining influence on the plains.
_	Feeling that her duty is to her mother, although despising Grey, Mary breaks her engagement and consents to wed the capitalist with the understanding that affection will not enter into the marriage contract.
_	It can safely be argued that the military acquiesced to the assumption of Tejada to the presidency with the understanding that the latter would be far more malleable and agreeable to the wishes of the High Command than Salamanca had been.
_	The General Court then organized the election of delegates from each town to participate in a convention that would draft a constitution and submit their work to a popular vote with the understanding that its adoption would require approval by two-thirds of the voters.
_	Liberty is a multi-denominational Christian school, and welcomes students of any or no religious background, with the understanding that only basic Christian doctrine will be taught.
_	In the 1920s Mrs. Branham purchased the land that is now Bessie Branham Park and gave it to the city of Atlanta with the understanding that it would be developed as a public park.
_	In this agreement, the State was given the entire collection with the understanding that the State of Oklahoma would house, preserve and display the collection for the general public with no admission charge.
_	Under the copyright law of the Philippines, a "collective work" is a work which has been created by two or more natural persons at the initiative and under the direction of another with the understanding that it will be disclosed by the latter under his own name and that contributing natural persons will not be identified.
_	The Wilsons lent the money, which they had received from the sale of nautical clothing label Line7 in the mid-'90s, on the understanding that it was to be used to purchase a block of land in Rotorua for the construction of a church.
_	Jews in Southampton had donated to the committee on the understanding that the memorial would commemorate not only Christian casualties but Jewish ones as well: one in ten adult male Jews in Southampton died during the conflict, twice the proportion for Southampton as a whole.
_	The church voted to sell their building to the Midtown Plaza developers in January 1959 with the understanding that they could continue to occupy it until July 1961.
_	With the understanding that a technique that can only be put into real use if it remains backwards-compatible with existing technology, he (and his team) proposed and studied the use of optical amplifiers in WDM systems, which utilized the existing embedded base to create virtual fibers by putting more channels onto a single fibre.
_	Building on these insights, Koch explains that at the heart of MBM is the understanding that the role of business “is to help people improve their lives by providing products and services they value more highly than their alternatives, and to do so while consuming fewer resources.
_	The knowledge and technologies of MVAH are based on the understanding that the order displayed throughout the entire universe, including within the human physiology, is governed by a fundamental underlying intelligence.
_	When it became apparent that no prominent Republicans were going to challenge popular incumbent Tennessee governor Ned McWherter for re-election in 1990, Henry entered the fray, winning the primary election easily, apparently with the understanding that his chances of defeating McWherter in the general election were incredibly low, and that McWherter, a moderate who was also supported by many prominent Republicans, including many of their major contributors and fund raisers, would control the vast majority of all financial contributions made to the race.
_	The agreement to develop the board was made well in advance of the M2 console's planned release date, with the understanding that games using the arcade board would be ported to the home console, similar to the relationship between the PlayStation and Namco System 11.
_	During 1927, following the success of his M.18 airliner, Messerschmitt tried to gain funding from the Baverian government; because the latter was already subsidising BFW (Bayerische Flugzeug-Werke), they pressed for an arrangement whereby Willy Messerschmitt joined BFW on the understanding that the company produce only his designs.
_	A loan shark backs Caine's bet, with the understanding that his health and welfare will be riding on the outcome.
_	Frere was appointed on the understanding that he would work to enforce Carnarvon's confederation plan and, in return, he could then become the first British governor of a united southern African confederation.
_	It warned that Marxist-Leninist analysis because it rests on dubious assumptions and privileges action over the understanding that is the foremost aim of theological inquiry.
_	Another controversial scene in the episode "Tales of Terror" saw the Meldrews visit Ronnie and Mildred on the understanding that Mildred had gone upstairs during a game of Happy Families and not returned; Ronnie then shows her feet hanging outside of the window, revealing that she has committed suicide.
_	When the Theatre Arts teacher first broached the idea of a play honoring soldiers in Iraq, we supported exploring it with the understanding that there would be on-going communication between the teacher and administration.
_	As a result, Bowell and Aberdeen were forced to invite Tupper to join the 6th Canadian Ministry and on January 15 Tupper became Secretary of State for Canada, with the understanding that he would become prime minister following the dissolution of the 7th Canadian Parliament.
_	The Ogoni people will make representation to the World Bank and the International Monetary Fund to the effect that giving loans and credit to the Nigerian Government on the understanding that oil money will be used to repay such loans is to encourage the Nigerian government to continue to dehumanise the Ogoni people and to devastate the environment and ecology of the Ogoni and other delta minorities among whom oil is found.
_	Effectively, the PLO recognized Israel's right to exist within pre-1967 borders, with the understanding that the Palestinians would be allowed to set up their own state in the West Bank and Gaza.
_	The equipment service business was transferred as a single total entity to the GOI, on the understanding that they would continue to offer maintenance service to all existing users.
_	Joorabchian further stated that he paid West Ham £2 million to release Tevez's registration so that he could join Manchester United in August 2007 on the understanding that West Ham would return the money with legal costs amounting to £2.6 million.
_	In the end, West Ham received £2 million for the player's registration —the money Joorabchain claimed to have paid West Ham on the understanding that it would be returned.
_	In exchange for asylum, the Thai government allowed them to stay on the understanding that they would assist in policing the area against communist infiltration.
_	As above, sometimes one drops reference to the basepoint of the holonomy group, with the understanding that the definition is good up to conjugation.
_	Unable to fight any longer, Chief Joseph surrendered to the Army with the understanding that he and his people would be allowed to return to the reservation in western Idaho.
_	In the interim, the perfusion graduate is typically referred to as board-eligible, which is sufficient for employment in cardiac surgery with the understanding that achieving certified status is required for long-term employment.
_	The view that the NSC had been created to coordinate political and military questions quickly gave way to the understanding that the NSC existed to serve the President alone.
_	Gilbert gave information about his part of the fraud on the understanding that, if he paid back what he had stolen, he would not be prosecuted.
_	Even so, Jones was able to persuade Wood to part with the land for only £4,000 (well below its market value) on the understanding that it would always remain council property for public buildings guaranteed by Deed of Covenant.
_	Hobart, nicknamed "Hobo", accepted on the understanding that the 79th would be an operational division, not just a training and development one.
_	But the Czechoslovak Ambassador in Paris reached agreement with the French Government that Czechoslovak volunteers could join the French Foreign Legion for a five-year term, on the understanding that if war broke out they would be released to form a Czechoslovak army in exile.
_	Powell offered to get three reporters inside the walls under the understanding that they would not print a word of what they learned until the hostages were released.
_	Acting on the understanding that male participants who had verified a recent negative test for HIV would wear a color-coded tag, Chong had sex with some men without a condom.
_	Mediatrix of all graces is a title that Roman Catholics give to the Blessed Virgin Mary as the Mother of God; it includes the understanding that she mediates the Divine Grace.
_	In 1859 Campbell was made Lord Chancellor of Great Britain, possibly on the understanding that Bethell should succeed as soon as he could be spared from the House of Commons.
_	Peart states: "All those paeans to American restlessness and the American road carried a tinge of wistfulness, an acknowledgement of the hardships of the vagrant life, the notion that wanderlust could be involuntary, exile as much as freedom, and indeed, the understanding that freedom wasn't free.
_	We were encouraged to take part on the understanding that we were dealing with a group of people who genuinely wanted to embrace Christianity.
_	He accepted the assignment on the understanding that he had a free rein to create whatever music he wanted.
_	The problem with claiming that Remigius plagiarized is simply that at that time and in that place, most scholars were quite familiar with Eriugena’s work, and made use of his ideas in their own work with the understanding that his ideas would be easily distinguished from their own.
_	However, it can also be interpreted as the understanding that a rationally consistent worldview and theoretical way of life, as exemplified by Socrates, is superior to the life devoted to a moral (but merely practical) life.
_	Minnesota's coach, Henry L. Williams, said at the time, "We're giving it back with the understanding that we can have it again should we win from you next year."
_	He had much experience in Mesopotamia and had spent twenty years in the country as the advisor to King Faisal I. Cornwallis was highly regarded and he was sent to Iraq with the understanding that he would be able to hold a more forceful line with the new Iraqi government than had hitherto been the case.
_	He was given four months to write the piece with the understanding that the army would receive all of the royalties forever.
_	Francis was brought up in Vienna with Maria Theresa with the understanding that they were to be married, and a real affection arose between them.
_	In the following seasons they won the 1969 FA Cup, the 1970 League Cup and Cup Winners' Cup, with a team including Colin Bell, Mike Summerbee and Francis Lee. Allison turned down an offer to manage Juventus on the understanding that Mercer would move aside and let him become full-time Manchester City manager – however, Mercer steadfastly refused to stand down.
_	The Universal House of Justice goes on to say that peace must be founded on the understanding that mankind is essentially one human family.
_	The development of voice categorizations were made with the understanding that the singer would be using classical vocal technique within a specified range using unamplified (no microphones) vocal production.
_	The previous debate regarding the meaning of "wilderness" versus "pristine" land led to the understanding that cultural use of lands should not keep the area from being restored to a "secondary wilderness," with functioning natural processes similar to when the land was in a primary state.
_	After a lengthy search for a team, former Giro d'Italia winner and former Lampre team member Gilberto Simoni joined the team on January 13, with the understanding that the 2010 Giro would be his final race.
_	The philosophy of orthodox Marxism includes the understanding that material development (advances in technology in the productive forces) is the primary agent of change in the structure of society and of human social relations and that social systems and their relations (e.g. feudalism, capitalism and so on) become contradictory and inefficient as the productive forces develop, which results in some form of social revolution arising in response to the mounting contradictions.
_	These groups worked together under the understanding that "discussions would only take place while there was a total absence of all expressions of violence connected to the conflict".
_	Grounded in the understanding that economic security is critical to women's safety, Higher Ground educates and mobilizes advocates, community-members, and decision-makers to promote progressive policy solutions that champion women's economic autonomy.
_	As Bothamley did not have a legal qualification and was 65 years of age at the time of his appointment as Clerk of the House, he was appointed on the understanding that he would retire "within a reasonable time after the termination of [WWII] hostilities".
_	This form of fighting takes place primarily between two practitioners who agree to enter into a no-holds-barred match, with the understanding that they will be "friends at the end of the day", wearing very little protective gear and fighting with single or double sticks.
_	The two captains hired her husband, a fur trapper, as an interpreter, with the understanding that she would come along to interpret the Shoshone language, which she did.
_	She then joined Reddington's employ to protect Liz, on the understanding that she would always place Liz's interests ahead of his.
_	Two months before his death, Lucas bequeathed his art to Henry Walters with the understanding that it would ultimately go to the Maryland Institute for the Promotion of the Mechanic Arts (MICA), which had been destroyed in the Great Baltimore Fire of 1904.
_	The first proposal would allow the government to carry out the "full government program for radical economic recovery," aimed at "improving living conditions," on the understanding that this would require a "difficult" two-to-three-year period of "rapid changes."
_	When people interact, they do so with the understanding that their respective perceptions of reality are related, and as they act upon this understanding their common knowledge of reality becomes reinforced.
_	Cullen's emphasis on the importance of the nervous system was driven by the understanding that the nervous system controls the human body and therefore, "all diseases may, in some sense, be called affections of the nervous system, because, in almost every disease, the nerves are more or less hurt."
_	The government did their best to keep him from resigning his post, but Meredith declined their offers to accept leave of absence with the understanding that his full salary would be paid and his resignation subsequently accepted.
_	Myer Lyon was appointed "meshorrer" (choirboy) to Isaac Polack, hazzan at the Great Synagogue, London, in 1767 'at a salary of £40 per annum, on the understanding that he was to behave as a "Yehudi Kasher" (i.e. an observant Jew)'.
_	In what he described as a response to the $100,000 bounty offered by the Israeli family as described above, Saudi cleric Awad Al-Qarni offered his own bounty in the same $100,000 amount for the capture of any Israeli soldier, with the understanding that any soldier so captured would be used in a potential subsequent prisoner exchange to try to secure the release of some of the thousands of Palestinians who remain in Israeli prisons.
_	The adverse reactions are lesser known and rarely trained but exist from the understanding that nothing would exist if the mutual nourishment and restraint cycles existed alone, the adverse reactions are mutual over-restraint (overwhelming destructive interaction), mutual reverse restraint (reversal of the destructive cycle), and mutual burdening (unbalancing or reversal of the constructive cycle).
_	With the understanding that gentrification is a likely inevitable force for the beltline area: the Anne E. Casey Foundation along with land banks, churches, community leaders, and other organizations are working to ensure that neighborhoods in the Southwest do not experience the same level of community displacement as in the Eastern parts of Atlanta.
_	The insured person has full freedom of choice among the approximately 60 recognised healthcare providers competent to treat their condition (in their region) on the understanding that the costs are covered by the insurance up to the level of the official tariff.
_	Through the Compromise, Republican Rutherford B. Hayes was awarded the White House over Democrat Samuel J. Tilden on the understanding that Hayes would remove the federal troops whose support was essential for the survival of Republican state governments in South Carolina, Florida and Louisiana.
_	In mid-1951 they sold the property to Archbishop James Duhig, on the understanding that the homestead be retained.
_	Karpovich joined Bakhmetev with the understanding that his stay in the United States would be temporary and that he would be able to return home in time for Christmas of 1917.
_	“We purchased the pitch with the understanding that it would tell the creator’s real-life experience of being raised by a strong Filipina stepmother after the loss of her own mother...
_	The Malta declaration by the Third International Intersex Forum, in 2013, called for infants and children to be assigned male or female, on the understanding that later identification may differ:
_	In their analysis of the survey results, Snyderman and Rothman state that the experts who described themselves as agreeing with the "controversial" partial-genetic views of Arthur Jensen did so only on the understanding that their identity would remain unknown in the published report.
_	He trained to be an accountant and his transfer to Sheffield United was made on the understanding that he would be able to continue his studies.
_	This is based on the understanding that the term "church of Christ" is used in the New Testament as a descriptive phrase, indicating that the church belongs to Christ, rather than as a proper name.
_	In June 1950 the British government stated in the House of Commons that His Majesty's Government "have always been prepared to recognise Chinese suverainty over Tibet, but only on the understanding that Tibet is regarded as autonomous".
_	The Spanish ambassador in Washington D.C., Luis de Onis, on March 30, 1817 informed the Secretary of State, Pedro Cevallos Guerra, that on 26 February ""there are nine ships armed to arrive in the Santiago de Cuba port by an American captain who came from Cartagena to Cuba, had summoned the governor of that city, to hand him over 30 prisoners who belonged to the insurgents, and persuaded me that the Anglo Americans will be taken in by one of the pirates they had captured in that port, on the understanding that if they are not delivered, later they would hang in sight of the strong Spanish men they brought with them, and all who would be caught hereinafter.
_	Other Turks rented their lands, usually to dependable local Bulgarians, on the understanding that it would be handed back if and when the owners returned.
_	The "health of the helper" is considered crucial; that is, trainers or counselors ideally will "live in the understanding that allows them to enjoy life," and thereby continuously model their understanding of HR by staying calm and relaxed, not taking things personally, assuming the potential in others, displaying common sense, and listening respectfully to all.
_	The problem had resulted from the understanding that the president would be chosen by Congress; the decision to have the president be chosen instead by an electoral college reduced the chance of the president becoming beholden to Congress, so a shorter term with eligibility for re-election became a viable option.
_	An atheist believes that only in a knowledge of himself and a knowledge of his fellow man can he find the understanding that will help to a life of fulfillment.
_	In 1895 Chief White Calf of the Blackfeet authorized the sale of the mountain area, some , to the U.S. government for , with the understanding that they would maintain usage rights to the land for hunting as long as the ceded stripe will be "public land of the United States".
_	In 1861 Alexander undertook the editorship of the third edition of John Kitto's "Biblical Encyclopaedia", with the understanding that the whole work should be revised and brought up to date.
_	Kaiser allowed Gagliardi to take a five-month unpaid leave of absence each year to discharge her legislative duties with the understanding that she would return after the session.
_	Karishma's father saves Rajat on the understanding that he marries Karishma.
_	Moore, a well-known socialist, had sold the sculpture at a fraction of its market value to the former London County Council on the understanding that it would be displayed in a public space and might enrich the lives of those living in a socially deprived area.
_	Pratham agrees happily to this, with the understanding that this is best way to make Gauri's life a living hell.
_	This Crimesmith gave detailed plans for robberies to gangs of crooks with the understanding that they would give him a big percentage of the loot, and he would continue to direct them to other big scores in the future.
_	Other reasons why these terms were abandoned were to reflect the understanding that the disorder is not a figment of a person’s imagination.
_	In April 1916, Austria-Hungary allowed the Kingdom of Bulgaria to occupy the city with the understanding that a significant amount of the city's population were ethnic Bulgarians.
_	In August 2016, Dahoud's agent revealed that he had rejected a new contract with Gladbach based on the understanding that he would be allowed to leave the club at the end of the season.
_	Barton was able to form the Barton minority government with the support of the Labour Party led by Chris Watson, which held the balance of power with 14 seats, on the understanding that the Protectionists would implement a number of social reforms desired by Labour.
_	Subsequently, the organisation developed a coded warning system which was used until the 1960s whereby a patrolman would always salute the driver of a passing car that displayed a visible AA badge unless there was a speed trap nearby, on the understanding that their officers could not be prosecuted for failing to salute.
_	"The Times" noted: "one of her most important achievements has been to bring both to students and manufacturers the understanding that fashion design is not by any means restricted to "haute couture" and to the creation of ball gowns requiring a hundred yards of tulle and a box of sequins".
_	Some girls work for free on the understanding that they at least will be better fed in the home of their employer.
_	There is such strong quantitative support for the second that scientists regard common descent as being as factual as the understanding that in the Solar System the Earth orbits the Sun, although the examination of the fundamentals of these processes is still in progress.
_	Afterward, Clara gives the game to Fosdick, on the understanding that he send half the winnings to her charity.
_	In the 1930s, the Whitaker family gave the cemetery to the Daughters of the American Revolution on the understanding that any lineal descendants of William and Mary Whitaker and their spouses could be buried there as long as space remained.
_	Several copies of this resolution were made and distributed among the Free Soil members of Congress, with the understanding that whoever among them should catch the speaker's eye and get the floor should introduce it.
_	Anderson did not integrate Hoke's division with his attack plan and left him with the understanding that he was not to assault until the First Corps' attack was well underway, because the Union defenders were disorganized as well.
_	Resource efficiency reflects the understanding that global economic growth and development can not be sustained at current production and consumption patterns.
_	This ceasefire was backed by the United States and Russia, with the understanding that – if it held for one week – Russia and the United States could begin to plan a joint mission against ISIS and al-Nusra.
_	Construction of the railway line to Blackall began in 1905, based on the understanding that local businessmen would establish a woolscour.
_	In 1957 he gifted the house and 7,000-acre estate to the National Trust, on the understanding that he and his family would always be able to live at the property.
_	Despite this, Dangić's Chetniks collaborated with German forces in eastern Bosnia over a period of several weeks and with the understanding that Dangić and his forces would operate only inside Bosnia.
_	This case states that Lexmark can enforce the "single use only" policy written on the side of Lexmark printer cartridge boxes sold to certain large customers at a discount, with the understanding that the customers will return the cartridges to Lexmark after using them.
_	He added "But with the understanding that somebody like me is going to bring back jobs.
_	The land was granted with the understanding that a performing arts venue would be erected for the community's enjoyment under the direction of Penn State.
_	With no time for a leadership contest, the party agreed that Attlee should serve as interim leader, on the understanding that a leadership election would be held after the general election.
_	The WFM asked all mines not to sell ore to the ore mills in Colorado City, with the understanding that the union would call a strike at any mine not cooperating.
_	per tun on all wine sold by them, on the understanding that they might charge their customers an additional penny per quart.
_	Bishop Wall, with the understanding that the Church should be patron of the arts, has renovated a chapel which serves as part of the spiritual formation of local seminarians as they prepare to pastor churches in the future.
_	It recorded interviews with republicans and loyalists about their involvement in the conflict, on the understanding that the tapes would not be released until after their deaths.
_	The Board of Regents adopted the Common Core State Standards (CCSS) for Mathematics and CCSS for English Language Arts & Literacy in History/Social Studies, Science, and Technical Subjects on July 19, 2010, with the understanding that the state may add additional expectations.
_	The Company had accepted this obligation on the understanding that the Government would improve the little harbour to enable efficient working of mail and other shipping.
_	Some girls work for free on the understanding that they at least will be better fed in the home of their employer.
_	Hagar put the Waboritas on lifetime salary/vacation again, with the understanding that when he wanted to play with them they would be there ready to play, in 2009 following Hagar's involvement in the band Chickenfoot.
_	In around 1847 the Coilsfield estate was sold to William Orr who had agreed to become the heir of the architect of the house, John Paterson, on the understanding that he would change his name to Paterson but and also buy the Coilsfield estate, renaming it Montgomerie.
_	But Francis lent his support on the understanding that the ICA would have a strictly defensive role; he resigned when it became a military entity.
_	The saga of Factory Village really begins in the year 1786, when the property comprising two acres of land was leased to 10 local men with the understanding that they would build an iron foundry within two years.
_	In some Protestant theology, it is a hermeneutical rule of interpreting scripture by the understanding that scripture is to interpret scripture ("Sacra Scriptura sui interpres": sacred Scripture is its own interpreter).
_	Thus, the concept of PSA screening is advocated by some as a means of detecting "high-risk", potentially lethal prostate cancer, with the understanding that lower-risk disease, if discovered, often does not need treatment and may be amenable to active surveillance.
_	On 5 July 1949, the Ministry of Supply ordered five prototypes to this specification with the understanding that BOAC would contract for an additional 25 production examples.
_	Hybridity is the retention of an original identity and strong ties to an original country and tradition, but with the understanding that there is no unchanged, ideal nation of the past that they can return to.
_	Trump Jr. initially told the press that the meeting was held to discuss adoptions of Russian children by Americans, but after contrary media reports he added that he agreed to the meeting with the understanding that he would receive information damaging to Hillary Clinton.
_	Wild laws may be distinguished from laws based on the understanding that Earth is a conglomeration of objects which human beings are entitled to exploit for their exclusive benefit (e.g. most property laws).
_	[A]uthors of the materials being commented on [in Discussion Notes] may be given a right of reply (subject to the usual refereeing), on the understanding that timely publication of the Note will take priority over the desirability of including both Note and Reply in the same issue of the Journal.
_	4 years before the founding of the Smithsonian Institution, insufficient funding at the time led to the Smithsonian’s insect collection being distributed to collaborating scientists, with the understanding that the material could be reclaimed.
_	Edwards is grounded in the understanding that "the assertion of the right to counsel [is] a significant event," 451 U.S. at 451 U.S. 485, and that "additional safeguards are necessary when the accused asks for counsel." Id. at 451 U.S. 484.
_	The outcome suggests that the same law will be applied to both the main and the incidental questions on the understanding that the forum court is probably making a policy decision on which outcome is the more desirablein both cases, the courts seem to have been interested in upholding the validity of the second marriage reflecting a rebuttable presumption in both jurisdictions to recognise marriages valid under their "lex loci celebrationis" in default of any strong policy reason to the contrary.
_	When the Athenians were about to attack his city, Pittacus challenged their general to a single combat, with the understanding that the result should decide the war, and much bloodshed be thereby avoided.
_	I, on the understanding that this arrangement had been formally sanctioned by Elizabeth, confirmed it in the first year of his reign.
_	It was then sold to John Pearce with the understanding that it was being resold to the United States, but this sale was never completed.
_	In 1961 he was asked to guest on Shamrock Rovers tour of America on the understanding that he would sign for the club.
_	Benetton admitted that the filter was illegal and was let off, on the understanding that major changes would be made within the team.
_	Grand Vizier Talaat Pasha visited both Berlin, and Sofia, in September 1918, and came away with the understanding that the war was no longer winnable.
_	On May 25, 1738, after listening to a reading of Martin Luther's preface to Romans, John came to the understanding that his good works could not save him and he could rest in God's grace for salvation.
_	In many parts of the Anglican Communion, there is provision to bless civil marriages (on the understanding that a couple cannot be married twice).
_	In 1855 Flint, Bixby & Co bought the Rancho San Justo from Francisco Perez Pacheco with the understanding that William Welles Hollister would buy a one-half interest in the ranch in 1857.
_	She was assigned to the position with the understanding that she would take over the Communications Office in six months, which she did and became the first female Communications Director in 1975.
_	Key to this deal was the understanding that federal troops would no longer interfere in southern politics despite substantial election-associated violence against blacks.
_	By special agreement with the Bureau of American Ethnology, the expedition was placed under the direction of Cushing, a patient of Pepper's, with the understanding that the Smithsonian Institution should receive duplicates when such were found, and should publish the scientific results of the expedition, to be known as "The Pepper-Hearst Expedition."
_	He called his superiors and other border crossing officers along the Wall, who told him to turn people away from the Bornholmer Straße border crossing, but allow through those who yelled the loudest—on the understanding that they could never return.
_	The British Council contributed to the project on the understanding that preference would be given to students from the Commonwealth, or to those on British Council Scholarships.
_	This interpretation must be tempered by the understanding that GDP cannot be entirely devoted to debt repayment — some must be spent on survival, at the minimum, and in general only 5–10% will be devoted to debt repayment, even during episodes such as the Great Depression, which have been interpreted as debt-deflation — and thus actual "years to repay" is debt-to-GDP divided by "fraction of GDP devoted to repayment", which will generally be 10 times as long or more than simple debt-to-GDP.
_	Shewhart's work pointed out the importance of reducing variation in a manufacturing process and the understanding that continual process-adjustment in reaction to non-conformance actually increased variation and degraded quality.
_	On 3 August 1920 the Bolsheviks and the Young Bukharans agreed to act together on the understanding that the Young Bukharans would join the Communist Party.
_	He was given the private server location and password for the unfinished HarvardConnection website and code, with the understanding that he would finish the programming necessary for launch.
_	In the understanding that Scientology was a form of psychology, this law required anyone practising psychology to register with the newly established Victorian Psychological Council.
_	Following the receipt of a letter from the President of the Local Government Board the City agreed to resume tendering evidence in December on the understanding that the terms of reference could be modified.
_	The Nacionalistas controlled the now unicameral National Assembly for the entirety of the Commonwealth, with the understanding that the Americans would grant independence in the near future.
_	For non profit conservation organizations the agreement is good faith with the understanding that the organization will be transparent with the funds received through 1% for Orchid Conservation and update participants with their progress.
_	The club was said to have given the player £100 (£ today) to help him start his own business, on the understanding that he would repay the money after his benefit game.
_	This was specified as a "carriage dress", with the understanding that when taking the air in an open carriage, the bonnet provided some privacy—such a bonnet was in fact an "invisible" in Paris—and prevent wind-chapping, with its connotations of countrified rude health.
_	Laura abandons her medical studies, goes to work in a factory and accepts a marriage proposal from Felix Shaw on the understanding that he will also look after her sister.
_	A lease of 20 years was proposed on the understanding that such facilities were to be made available to all sections of the public.
_	An example is her work from 1974, "a portfolio of models", in which she creates a series of models through the understanding that one's self has itself the topic in question.
_	Two of the Beagles come to the understanding that humans and human wishes are different, bite off Joshua's hand and return it to the GrandDaughter (the Beagle Princess) as proof of his "death".
_	She gave particular praise on the differences between "Flic Story" and American films of the same genre, by the way Deray focuses on the intellects rather than the brawn of the two leading characters, as well as the understanding that grows between the two during "months of interrogation".
_	Property requirements for citizenship reflected the understanding that unless one was able to take care of one's biological necessities, one could not be free from them and hence could not participate in the public realm as a free person among equals.
_	Morosi was besieged by up to 800 Cape soldiers and 1,500 Sotho, who had been lured by Griffith on the understanding that they would not be subject to disarmament under the Cape Peace Preservation Act of 1878.
_	In 1910, the university charter of the college was granted and he agreed to accept a vice-chancellorship on a temporary basis, with the understanding that he would resume the chair of his department.
_	Cornwallis, being highly regarded, was sent to Iraq on the understanding that he would be able to hold a more forceful line with the new Iraqi government than had hitherto been the case.
_	Possibly the most important element of training for the use of chokeholds in law enforcement is the understanding that the subject should always be able to breathe freely.
_	With the understanding that war was the normal state of affairs, Finley observed that a ten-year war was out of the question, indicating Nestor's recall of a cattle-raid in Elis as a norm, and identifying the scene in which Helen points out to Priam the Achaean leaders in the battlefield, as "an illustration of the way in which one traditional piece of the story was retained after the war had ballooned into ten years and the piece had become rationally incongruous."
_	Hemings children grew up with the understanding that the girls would become house servants and that the boys would become butlers or valets, or perhaps artisans who worked in the many outbuildings on Mulberry Row.
_	The divisions were used for labour from St Nazaire in Normandy to St Pol in French Flanders, on the understanding that they would not be called upon to fight before they had completed their training.
_	Greene's appointment and confirmation to Treasurer was done on the understanding that he would not seek a full four-year term in 1988.
_	This is true even for infinite-dimensional complexes, with the understanding that the result of the infinite process is the direct limit of the skeleta: a set is closed in "X" if and only if it meets each skeleton in a closed set.
_	The lower layer improved on Roman practice in that it was based on the understanding that the purpose of this layer (the sub-base or base course) is to transfer the weight of the road and its traffic to the ground, while protecting the ground from deformation by spreading the weight evenly.
_	The hotel was built in 1877 by Trustee David Campbell with the understanding that when he had reimbursed himself from its income, the building would become the property of the association.
_	Innovations being that which changed the understanding that Christian communities had as the basis for the understanding and definition of their religion.
_	Looking at god while performing aarti reminds the performer (and the attendees of the aarti) to keep god at the center of all activities and reinforces the understanding that routine worldly activities are secondary in importance.
_	Anne and Amelia of Great Britain, who were considered with the understanding that they would convert to the Catholic faith upon marriage, were favored by the Duke of Bourbon and Madame de Prie because it was supported by their political financiers, the firm of Paris Brothers Joseph Paris Duverney.
_	Although that to the Queen's Hospital Cancer Appeal is known, the majority of their donations, running into millions of pounds, were always made on the understanding that they should remain anonymous.
_	Ryley stated: "Colonel McCaul, finding I was quick at writing songs and fixing up scenes, employed me at what is termed 'hack work,' on the understanding that my name was never to appear.
_	The most important result of developing of mathematical model of chemical engineering system is the understanding that is gained what really make the process tick.
_	"His unseen interrogator here is a Canadian intelligence officer, evidently the lead officer in a team, permitted by the Americans to question the prisoner on the understanding that a friendly seeming fellow countryman might cause Khadr to open up and give the US valuable intelligence.
_	By the Fourth Treaty of Prairie du Chien in 1831, the Omaha ceded their lands in Iowa to the United States, east of the Missouri River, with the understanding that they still had hunting rights there.
_	Proponents argue that the public has democratically allowed people to accumulate wealth only with the understanding that a portion of that wealth would be allocated for public use.
_	Poseidon sent Minos the bull, with the understanding that it would be sacrificed to the god.
_	There is also little historic evidence that points scholars towards the understanding that people from all levels of society were able to own slaves.
_	Their beliefs encompassed the understanding that the essential elements of the unity of Syria is the shari'a, which includes laws adequate to organize all aspects of life; at the level of the individual, the family, the nation and the state.
_	The MoU was signed with the understanding that major regions of the world have established effective regional tourism bodies, like the Pacific Asia Travel Association (PATA) and the Caribbean Tourism Organization (CTO) and that "Africa has yet to formally adopt as a continent an organization as such to service its tourism marketing, research and advocacy".
_	Limited production continued with non-union workers, and strike-breakers were hired with the understanding that their jobs were permanent.
_	In framing an order that was just and equitable, cognisance had to be taken of the fact that Minister of Transport Jeff Radebe (the second respondent, who also signed the proclamations, as required), together with the Fund, the courts and the claimants, had since July 31, 2006, operated on the understanding that sections 1 to 5 of the Amendment Act were in operation, and that a finding to the contrary would be devastating to all concerned.
_	During the last one, he ended a deadlock in discussions by personally advocating surrender with one condition, the preservation of the Kokutai, "with the understanding that the said declaration does not comprise any demand that prejudices the prerogatives of His Majesty as a sovereign ruler."
_	When the AEC was formed in 1947 it acquired custody of nuclear components from the Manhattan Project on the understanding that the matter would be reviewed.
_	The program advances students who excel in investigative research, with the understanding that delving into the natural sciences is not only a way to make a living, but also a tool for the deepening of the Torah, and the implementation of the Heavenly ideals in everyday life.
_	The joke involves a woman who asks a surgeon (in this case) to cure her from approaching blindness on the understanding that he would not be paid until she was cured.
_	The colonial government was granting 50-acre plots of land to settlers on the understanding that if the settler was able to clear twelve of the fifty acres within five years, the settler would be given free title to the entire plot.
_	Later the Cardiff Arms Park Company Limited was formed by Cardiff Athletic Club, Arms Park (Cardiff) Greyhound Racing Company Limited and the Welsh Rugby Union (WRU) acquired the land from the Bute Estate for £30,000 (GBP), but on the understanding that the Arms Park was only used for recreational purposes and was not sold for building.
_	A personal name or full name is the set of names by which an individual is known and that can be recited as a word-group, with the understanding that, taken together, they all relate to that one individual.
_	The organisation was founded in 2001 in response to the significant gap in scientific knowledge between rich and poor countries and with the understanding that “those who stand to benefit the most from modern science and technology are also those with the least access to information about it".
_	Finally, on the evening of the 19 February 1802, a mob assembled and raided the castle of La Sarraz, seizing and burning the archives listing the taxes due for the surrounding area, on the understanding that no taxes could be levied without the documents establishing what was due and by whom.
_	Colonel Stevenson raised ten companies or 770 men to go to California with the understanding that they would after their service muster out and stay in California.
_	The new act was passed "with the understanding that it would be accepted.
_	It handled tens of thousands of cases yearly on the understanding that it may keep a representative sample from any case.
_	Mr. Hare of Cobalt put up a security deposit for the franchise on the understanding that it would be transferred to Montreal French sportsmen as soon as possible.
_	Landau was billed as a "special guest star" during the first season; he had been cast as a guest star for the pilot with the understanding that he would be one of four or five rotating guest star agents.
_	Smyth patiently explained that anyone was free to publish it, but Princeton University Press was only willing to do so on the understanding that this would be "Smyth's edition".
_	The mainstream MDC did not field a candidate in this constituency on the understanding that Moyo's victory would be good in the fight to remove Mugabe from power.
_	Many studies have led to the understanding that tropomyosins perform essential functions and are required in a diverse range of species from yeast, worms, and flies to complex mammals.
_	On 25 February 2008, Boris Tadić met with Dmitry Medvedev and Sergei Lavrov in Belgrade where Medvedev stated that “We proceed from the understanding that Serbia is a single state with its jurisdiction spanning its entire territory, and we will adhere to this principled stance in the future, We have made a deal to coordinate together our efforts in order to get out of this complicated situation”.
_	In 1996, the first use of regenerative tissue was used to replace a small length of urethra, which led to the understanding that the technique of obtaining samples of tissue, growing it outside the body without a scaffold, and reapplying it, can be used for only small distances of less than 1 cm.
_	Rosemary King gave him the money, on the understanding that he would do her a favour in return at a later date.
_	He signed a new one-year contract at the end of the season, with the understanding that his role would include some coaching responsibilities as well as playing.
_	The process moves from using words in particular situation to the understanding that words can be used to refer to different instances of conceptual categories, which means objects, or action words can be used in similar situations.
_	The USSR Academy of Sciences came to the understanding that there was the need for fundamental science.
_	Daivari would later say he originally signed a two-year extension with the understanding that Jeff Jarrett would be his boss, but after Jarrett stepped down a month later, he could not see eye to eye with the new management and asked for his release.
_	It paved the way for the understanding that the electrical signaling event (action potential) causes a chemical event (release of neurotransmitter from synapses) that is ultimately the effector on the tissue.
_	Hence, in practice, both sides in a conflict attack civilians and civilian infrastructure, with the understanding that they are legitimate and lawful targets in war.
_	The school community elected to make this move, with the understanding that the school would eventually be situated in the Civic Center.
_	First, they purchased Anaconda Properties from Marcus Daly for $39 million, with the understanding that the check was to be deposited in the bank and remain there for a definite time (National City Bank was run by Rockefeller's friends).
_	In particular, the understanding that we may be aware of knowledge available only through the use of rational thought.
_	Madero and Ángeles returned to Mexico City, with the understanding that Ángeles would be placed in charge of the forces loyal to Madero.
_	In 2010, Soth flew to the United Kingdom but despite not having applied for a work visa was allowed into the country on the understanding that if he was "caught taking photographs" he could be put in prison for two years.
_	In the final agreement the land was purchased for $5,000, with the understanding that Crown Hill's ownership would ornament the burial plots.
_	Many different disagreements led to the fracture, for example; while at the Fourth SI Conference in London in December, 1960, in a discussion about the political nature of the SI, the Gruppe SPUR members disagreed with the core situationist stance of counting on a revolutionary proletariat; the accusation that their activities were based on a "systematic misunderstanding of situationist theses"; the understanding that at least one Gruppe SPUR member, sculptor Lothar Fischer, and possibly the rest of the group, were not actually understanding and/or agreeing with the situationist ideas, but were just using the SI to achieve success in the art market.
_	At an Ashfield Council meeting on 28 May 2013 the council passed a motion that a permanent outline of a rainbow be painted in Summer Hill Square, with the understanding that this may be periodically 'chalked in' by children, families and community members.
_	He came away with the understanding that the war was no longer winnable.
_	She says, "the project of decolonization begins with the understanding that the collective oppression of indigenous women results primarily from colonialism- a multidimensional force underwritten by Western Christianity, defined by white supremacy, and fueled by global capitalism."
_	The North Eastern Railway (NER) persuaded the original promoters to withdraw the scheme on the understanding that the NER would promote and build a similar line.
_	Behind this change was the understanding that passive networks of escape lines had little place in the cold war world and henceforth personnel behind the lines would be rescued by specially trained units.
_	Jack (Alec Baldwin) invites Liz (Tina Fey) to a Republican Party fundraiser as his "chum" with the understanding that she will keep her liberal politics to herself in exchange for access to the all-you-can-eat shrimp bar.
_	Stein wanted to see Germany reconstituted as a nation but was frustrated by Austrian diplomat Prince Klemens Wenzel von Metternich, who gained the alliance of the rulers of south and central Germany for his empire, on the understanding that they were to retain their old powers.
_	The United States built several airfields on Brazilian soil with the understanding that shortly after the war ended, they would be turned over to Brazil.
_	Stevenson saw the decimation as a donation of royal demesne to churches and laymen, with those grants which were made to laymen being on the understanding that there would be reversion to a religious institution.
_	The historical society was given the house in 1961, with the understanding that it would be moved across the street as part of a road straightening project.
_	Hepburn was assisted by Harry Nixon's Progressive bloc of MLAs who ran in this election as Liberal-Progressives on the understanding that they would support a Hepburn led government.
_	Caz laid his rhyme books on the bed and said, "Take whatever you want," with the understanding that Hank would compensate Caz at a later time.
_	For usually when one acquired servants, it was on the understanding that the servants drew the master's carriage.
_	It helps give the game a beginning because the audience only has the understanding that there is a history before the events of the game take place.
_	She was made Queen of Persia on the understanding that she would vacate the throne upon Yazdegerd III attaining majority.
_	He says the prisoners had given themselves up on the understanding that they would be allowed to go home if they gave up their weapons or – in the case of al-Qaeda and foreign fighters – that they would be treated in accordance with UN conventions.
_	This was done with the understanding that he would become a monk in the future.
_	Wythe arranged for Clay a position with the Virginia attorney general, Robert Brooke, with the understanding that Brooke would finish Clay's legal studies.
_	He also became Deputy Leader of the House of Commons, on the understanding that the latter job would be given to Neville Chamberlain after the election (in the event, it did not).
_	The initial detainees were to be people rescued by the "MV Tampa" (Tampa affair), with the understanding that they would leave Nauru by May 2002.
_	The "Comité" secretly received funds from the CIA, with the understanding that this fact could prove "very embarrassing" and that a new source would eventually need to be found.
_	In October 2012, the "Oxford American" and the University of Central Arkansas renewed its alliance for five years on the understanding that the magazine will repay its debt, currently at $700,000, to the university.
_	The name "Signalong" is derived from the understanding that wherever possible the sign is accompanied with speech, hence you "sign along with speech".
_	On 20 September 2008 and when the late 2000s recession had started to hit the well-being of Russia's top tycoons, the "Financial Times" said that "Putinism was built on the understanding that if tycoons played by Kremlin rules they would prosper".
_	However, there is always the understanding that a more skillful or technical logician could have produced successful modifications that would not be considered a "hack-job".
_	Upon having his child, she takes the baby, the young Orlene, to her Gypsy friend with the understanding that the woman would find her daughter the best possible home.
_	Victoria had previously dismissed Conroy from her household and the baronetcy was conferred on him with the understanding that he would not show himself at court in return.
_	Bradshaw integrated psychobiological and ethological principles, specifically the understanding that maternal and community loss lead to pathogenic right hemispheric neurological development, which often results in hyperaggression and socioemotional dysfunction.
_	They built a union church, for all denominations, with the understanding that the first one within it that built a congregation large enough to support its own building could have the union church.
_	In the list below, the convention of "1940s" developed by Anthology Film Archives in observed for the earlier films, though with the understanding that the late 1930s is more likely.
_	Metternich, worried that Napoleon would seize on this to demand harsher peace terms, instead agreed to become a minister of state (which he did on 8 July) and to lead negotiations with the French on the understanding that he would replace Stadion as Foreign Minister at a later date.
_	Frank Calder was elected President and Secretary-Treasurer at a salary of $800 (Eight Hundred Dollars) on the understanding that there could be no appeal from his decisions...
_	The members invested in many improvements (central heating and air, new shutters, new lighting, the addition of a Fellowship Hall etc.) with the understanding that the property had been deeded to them.
_	The voyages primarily comprised an "acquisitive exploratory expedition", with Mawson making proclamations of British sovereignty over Antarctic lands at each of their five landfalls—on the understanding that the territory would later be handed to Australia (as it was in 1933).
_	As the tensions mount amongst the three, a Coyotero raid traps them and takes Mailers son, Tim (Dandy Curran) and holds him as hostage with the understanding that Mailer will deliver hundreds of rifles within seven days to the Indians for their continued warfare against the white man.
_	They told us by signs that they would look for rabbits and hares for us to eat, with the understanding that we would give them "ñipas", which is what they call our clothes.
_	This was done by arrangement with the king, on the understanding that it would lead, inevitably, to marriage to a handsome prince.
_	The State Board of Education entered into a “Use Permit” with the City of Boston so that GLS could rent the property for classes until June 30, 1953 with the understanding that by 1955, “that some provision would be made for the housing of the school in other school property in the City of Boston”.
_	The old "minimum" demands had been raised by reformists on the understanding that they were acceptable to an expanding capitalism, and had been dropped when they were not.
_	Zheng chose the new regnal name of First Emperor ("Shǐ Huángdì", formerly transcribed as Shih Huang-ti) on the understanding that his successors would be successively titled the "Second Emperor", "Third Emperor", and so on through the generations.
_	Gilbert contributed additional information to John Currie's "The Works of Robert Burns" (eighth edition) in 1820 and was paid £250 on the understanding that he would not comment on the accuracy of the author's portrayal of his brother.
_	Their grants were originally obtained from the Darbar on the understanding that they kept the peace among the Bhils and other wild hill tribes.
_	After a brief encounter, the two part again with the understanding that Kavita will marry Joy Bose.
_	Under Heenan's leadership, the Labour MPPs joined with the United Farmers of Ontario to form a coalition government under E.C. Drury, with the understanding that Drury would support Edward Wellington Backus' plans for erecting a newsprint mill in Kenora.
_	Ammonas and Dioscorus the cooks have gone to the Oxyrhynchite "nome" on the understanding that they would return at once.
_	When the Minneapolis Central Library was torn down in 2002, the former planetarium was shuttered with the understanding that it would be rebuilt as part of the new library.
_	Somatic senses are sometimes referred to as somesthetic senses, with the understanding that somesthesis includes the sense of touch, proprioception (sense of position and movement), and (depending on usage) haptic perception.
_	Seisyll, along with all the other Welsh princes and leaders from the area, was invited to Abergavenny Castle at Christmas by William De Braose on the understanding that they could voice grievances, overcome differences and plan a period of relative peace following a period of conflict.
_	The second house was sold to a private interest on the understanding that it would be moved; however, during the attempted relocation, the structure fell through the ice and was destroyed.
_	The Greatest Hits wasn't our idea - we felt it was a few years too early - but agreed to do it on the understanding that we would release two new singles from the album.
_	Since Ilona does not have the financial means needed for such a venture, Sjöholm agrees to provide the capital for the restaurant to start operating with the understanding that Ilona will pay back the loan to Mrs Sjöholm.
_	The land would then be donated to the U.S. Army with the understanding that it would become the permanent home of the Engineering Division.
_	Humphrey Mackworth Praed, William's father, was said to have lent large sums to voters on the understanding that repayment would not be demanded if they voted for Praed and Drummond; but counsel for Praed and Drummond adduced evidence that Stephens had also resorted to bribery.
_	Orson left France with the understanding that the Spanish partner would act as intermediary with the Iranians in Paris …
_	According to William of Tyre, Tancred made Roger his successor "with the understanding that, at the demand of Bohemond or his heirs, he should not refuse to return it," suggesting that Roger was simply regent for the child Bohemond.
_	Shatner, Nimoy, and Kelley's salaries were cut with the understanding that they would share in box office profits.
_	According to "The Washington Post", Viet Dinh — who was then the Assistant Attorney General of the United States — started work on measures to increase the authority of Federal Agencies, reportedly based upon the understanding that "[t]he charge <nowiki>[</nowiki>from then Attorney General John Ashcroft<nowiki>]</nowiki> was very, very clear:
_	In 1974, the mill was donated to Hamilton Township with the understanding that it would be used for “historical, cultural, and governmental purposes.
_	Lindsey was hired by Fort Hays State in Kansas in 1982 to a four-year contract, with the understanding that he would be released from it if he was offered and accepted the University of Arizona head coaching job.
_	The Bill of Rights was not included in the Constitution submitted to the states for ratification, but many states ratified the Constitution with the understanding that a bill of rights would soon follow.
_	In his scenario, when someone states their degree-of-belief in something, one places a small bet for or against that belief and specifies the odds, with the understanding that the "other" party to the bet may then decide which side of the bet to take.
_	By November 1913, the Navy Department had assigned Cunningham (and Smith) to return to the Advanced Base School with the understanding that they would create an aviation section for the force.
_	Feminist pedagogy rejects this normative classroom dynamic, seeking to foster more democratic spaces functioning with the understanding that both teachers and students are subjects, not objects.
_	In 1969 Norman returned to Capitol Records, now headed by Mike Curb, to honor his original 1966 contract with the understanding that he would have complete artistic control.
_	The familiar rotation of the axis of "linear" polarization relies on the understanding that a linearly polarized wave can as well be described as the superposition (addition) of a left and right circularly polarized wave in equal proportion.
_	The City aldermen, to raise the tax base of the city, accepted a gift of land in 1829 from Peter Gerard Stuyvesant (1778–1847) with the understanding that it would remain a public space, and compensated other owners with $62,000 in city funds to set aside a residential square; transforming the muddy site took another $22,000 before Tompkins Square was opened in 1834.
_	Larry agreed and the two parted with the understanding that the relationship would remain and that each would visit the other until such a time that Ally was ready to move to Detroit.
_	In 1976, Goodwin replaced Gerry Conway to become the eighth editor-in-chief of Marvel Comics, with the understanding that it would only be temporary until a permanent replacement could be found.
_	For instance, the machinery of evolution may be described in terms of chemistry by the understanding that it is a mutation in the order of genetic base pairs in the DNA of an organism.
_	"Cerberus" was ordered on the understanding that if she operated in any role other than the defence of Victoria, she would revert to Admiralty control.
_	Although the two main characters do not realize it, the reader is left with the understanding that Cheryl will now permanently experience disturbing hallucinations, just as Martin does.
_	Similarly, his "The Zionist Idea: A Historical Analysis and Reader" (1970) pioneered the study of Zionism and provided generations of students with the understanding that modern Zionism was a secular movement to remake Jewish identity into one of the many modern secular nationalisms.
_	Operation Peter Pan was formed with the understanding that Baker would arrange the children's transportation, and Walsh would arrange for accommodations in Miami.
_	Mystique, in keeping with the words of the Destiny Diaries, placed the baby's face in direct contact with Rogue's, with the understanding that Rogue would awaken from her comatose state.
_	Pre-orders are offered at a discount to encourage people to commit to a game with the understanding that sufficient numbers of orders are needed before the game is produced.
_	Only one enantiomer of each subclass is depicted, with the understanding that the other enantiomer bears the same subclass name.
_	On 2 November 1963, Diệm and Nhu were assassinated in a "coup d'état" led by General Dương Văn Minh (Armed Forces Council) with the understanding that the United States would not intervene.
_	Afterward, Beren and Lúthien died, and were restored to life by the Valar with the understanding that Lúthien was to become mortal and Beren should never be seen by Men again.
_	When Sarah Stein began to slowly disperse her art collection in the years before her death in 1953, Elise Stern Haas, wife of Walter A. Haas, purchased a Matisse portrait of Sarah and convinced a Chicago collector, Nathan Cummings, to acquire a similar portrait of Michael, with the understanding that both would eventually become part of the collection of the San Francisco Museum of Modern Art.
_	5) Society members commit themselves to organise and participate in various workshops, conference or working groups, with the understanding that they will endeavour to lead at least one working group or workshop and participate in at least two others.
_	Thus, the philosophy of the Gĩkũyũ religion and life in general was anchored on the understanding that everything in the universe has an inner interlinked force that we do not see.
_	Judy Chicago donated "The" "Dinner Party" with the understanding that one of the school's buildings would be repaired to house it.
_	Frontier areas, such as Bosnia, might be exempted from these tax obligations (much as some pastoral groups in the marcher-land were given tax exemptions on the understanding that they would raid enemy territory).
_	Developed countries allow migrants to enter in order to fill labor shortages, but with the understanding that the settlement is not permanent, distinguishing it from immigration.
_	Thus, they often say they meet with "the church in [city name]" with the understanding that they are not the only church but belong to the same church as every believer in their city.
_	For simplicity, this article uses the model where the mother becomes the parent with custody of the children and the father makes child support payments, with the understanding that this model has become less typical.
_	Students have not always voted for working rectors; anti-apartheid activists Winnie Mandela (1987–1990) and Albert Lutuli (1962–1965) were elected on the understanding that they would be unable to undertake the position's responsibilities, while Mordechai Vanunu (2005–2008) was unable to fulfil his duties as he was not allowed to leave Israel and Edward Snowden (2014–2017) was not expected to fulfill his duties due to an ongoing self-imposed exile in Russia.
_	Following negotiations with the Social Democratic and Labour Party (SDLP) and secret talks with representatives of both the Irish and British governments, the IRA ultimately called a ceasefire in 1994 on the understanding that Sinn Féin would be included in political negotiations for a settlement.
_	When Niels Eriksen Gyldenstjerne, Danish Steward of the Realm during the period of 1453–1456, received the Kastelholm fief in 1485, he did so with the understanding that he was "faithfully to build and improve the walls and buildings of the said castle of Kastelholm, which are needful for the said castle, to the benefit and use of the crown of Sweden, as he has promised us willingly to do".
_	Jīvanmukti (liberation during life) can be achieved through Self-knowledge, the understanding that ātman within is same as ātman in another person and all of Brahman – the eternal, unchanging, entirety of cosmic principles and true reality.
_	Instead, in 1963, the decision was taken to purchase the General Dynamics F-111 swing-wing bomber "on the understanding that it could carry nuclear weapons".
_	A "k"-point of P, written ["a"...,"a"], is given by a sequence of "n"+1 elements of "k", not all zero, with the understanding that multiplying all of "a"..."a" by the same nonzero element of "k" gives the same point in projective space.
_	Lynch was arrested by the Free State forces but was allowed to leave Dublin, on the understanding that he would try and halt the fighting.
_	The board approved sterilizations with the understanding that patient's sexual behavior would be altered, therefore eliminating sexual deviancy, and also with the goal of stopping menstruation in women.
_	Hans branched out on his own with the understanding that he had his teacher's blessings, and continued teaching throughout the Indian sub-continent.
_	The photograph “A Father’s Care”, where a man was trying to help his daughter to get down from a large piece of rock, is deeply moving with the understanding that Yip was four when he lost his father.
_	Both sides clarified that these negotiations are premised on the understanding that the United States does not seek permanent military bases in Afghanistan, or a presence that was perceived as a threat to Afghanistan's neighbors.
_	The basic engineering for all the German half-tracks was developed during the Weimar-era by the Reichswehr's "Military Automotive Department", but final design and testing was farmed out to commercial firms with the understanding that production would be shared with multiple companies.
_	NOCIRC states that their position is based on the understanding that there is not a national or international health association in the world that recommends routine infant circumcision, yet declare that they hold the medical community accountable for "misconstruing the scientific database available on human circumcision in the world today".
_	Constantine I, who controlled Gaul, Spain and Britain; Maxentius, in Africa and Italy; Maximinus Daza in Roman Asia and Egypt; and Licinus in Macedonia, Greece and Illyricum; The expansionist ambitions of Maxentius and Maximin led to a bellicose alliance of these princes against Constantine and Licinus, with the understanding that Maxentius would conquer the western provinces of Europe, and Maximin the east.
_	The LIGO-Australia plan was approved by LIGO's US funding agency, the National Science Foundation, contingent on the understanding that it involved no increase in LIGO's total budget.
_	The Keweenaw Bay Ojibwa Community founded the College with the understanding that American Indian students, as members of sovereign nations, deserved an educational system responsive to their needs and concerns.
_	The Kitab-Verlag was founded in 1999 by Wilhelm Baum and Robert Gutounig, who had the intention of publishing books, that should contribute to the understanding that the human race should be taken in its entirety and that it has a common cultural legacy that ought to be preserved.
_	He passed the Civil Service entrance examination, but gained a deferment on joining the army in late 1914, on the understanding that a position would be reserved for him.
_	Cree leaders signed Treaty 6 with the understanding that they would receive medical help, protection from famine and assistance converting into an agricultural lifestyle.
_	In order to solidify the understanding that God had intended for humankind to use earths natural resources, environmental writers and religious scholars alike proclaimed that humans are separate from nature, on a higher order.
_	According to one account published in 1940, the name change came about when Tammany Hall gave $10,000 to writer Blakely Hall, "to run it with the understanding that he was not to get a nickel more.
_	It recommended that a new try be made to continue the sisters’ commitment to DSHA, with the understanding that a new and successful effort be made.
_	He held to the understanding that Revelation 15:8 teaches that the final generation will go through the time of trouble without a Mediator.
_	The multi-target approach entails the understanding that, although one drug compound might fit into a single target, diseases are associated with complex biological processes, and often multiple cellular targets, which are more difficult to unlock.
_	When he returned to Bombay, it was with the understanding that he would help Virendra Desai (son of Sagar Movietone boss, Chimanlal Desai).
_	As discussed in Lerner's 1978 book, "The Street Where I Live", Frederick Loewe, who initially had no interest in the project, agreed to write music, with the understanding that if things went badly, it would be his last score.
_	General Riedesel sailed for the Americas in 1776, with the understanding that Frederika would join him as soon as the new baby could travel.
_	The common grounds of these differing views and models are the understanding that underlying atypical processing and integration of sensory information contribute to atypical visible behavior and problems in occupational performance and participation.
_	On 19 Feb. 1624-5 he was granted a pension of 120l., vacant by the death of Sir William Button, assistant-master of the ceremonies, and on 18 March 1624-5 he was formally admitted into Button's office on the understanding that on Finet's promotion to Lewknor's place the office should be abolished.,
_	Two other justices also held that the physical evidence was constitutionally admissible, but did so with the understanding that the "Miranda" warnings must be accommodated to other objectives of the criminal justice system.
_	Similarly, literary critic Daniel Cristea-Enache argues that Lungu is separated from his generation by the understanding that prose is "in large measure written not for oneself, but for another.
_	Children sometimes grow up in such families with the understanding that such an arrangement is normal.
_	Starrett hadn't planned on making an entire career out of westerns, and agreed to make them for two years, with the understanding that his bosses would then cast him in plainclothes roles.
_	They advocate for an "ecology of practices" that explores how philosophical concepts formed in language can be "transduced" into other modes of experience in a way that furthers creative practice, and reciprocally, how the understanding that already imbues non-language based modes of experience can be brought to explicit expression in ways that further conceptual research.
_	It was, in addition, shown that a random low-rank tensor over the reals may not admit a rank-2 approximation with positive probability, leading to the understanding that the ill-posedness problem is an important consideration when employing the tensor rank decomposition.
_	A review of "A Mouth in California" in the "Oxonian Review" characterised Foust's work as "bleak, funny, curt, and self-effacing", informed by the understanding that "everyday speech, set slightly out of joint or context, can deliver both personal and collective revelation.
_	The wildlife area was created with the understanding that it would remain completely compatible with this primary flood control function.
_	Criticism that he lacked maturity and a commitment to physical fitness and to playing winning basketball had dogged Smith earlier in his collegiate career when he spent parts of three seasons at UCLA, and John Thompson III had suspended him the previous season for academic reasons after only 13 games with the Hoyas; that suspension had become an outright dismissal from the team shortly afterward when he continued to struggle in his classes, although the dismissal came with the understanding that he could return for the 2014–2015 season if his grades improved enough.
_	As they had written too much material, they had to choose between "Total Eclipse" and "Gangland" for the "Run to the Hills" single release, with the understanding that the other song would make it onto the album.
_	In 2018 Arias publicly denounced Swedish director Ruben Östlund in connection with his Oscar-nominated film "The Square", claiming that he had made a recording with her via Skype, with the understanding that she would appear in the film, but ended up cutting her scene and instead using her name for the author of the titular artwork (which she had no part in creating), something which she had not authorized.
_	One of the conditions of this alliance was that the rulers of Jodhpur and Jaipur should regain the privilege of marriage with the ruling Sesodia dynasty of Mewar, which they had forfeited by contracting alliances with the Mughal emperors, on the understanding that the offspring of Sesodia princesses should succeed to the state in preference to all other children.
_	The Bishop ultimately released him on bond in May 1634 with the understanding that he would immediately remove to the New World.
_	The Department was agreeable to the proposal on the understanding that goods traffic at the station would increase, and supplied the materials to the farmers who carried out the work, completed in 1959.
_	After a few years of operation, the AutoMecha building burned to the ground and the owner, a Mr. Brown, sold the vacant property back to the Church for $1.00 with the understanding that the Church would remove the remains of the building.
_	People must feel that troubles that evoke their feelings are serious, the understanding that sufferers' troubles are not self-inflicted, and ability to picture oneself with the same problems in a non-blaming and non-shaming manner.
_	In June 1950, the UK Government in the House of Commons stated that His Majesty's Government "have always been prepared to recognize Chinese suzerainty over Tibet, but only on the understanding that Tibet is regarded as autonomous."
_	The NY&H would pay the NY&A's expenses on surveying with the understanding that the NY&H would be extended to Greenbush.
_	On the understanding that the American government offered amnesty, Sakay and his officers came down from the mountains.
_	Learning that Robin has been staying at the YMCA they easily convince him to move in, on the understanding that it will be on a platonic basis.
_	An investigation revealed that his assailant was a young English traveller, Frank Walsh, who had spent most of his money, and who had been approached by Colin Ross to rob the customer on the understanding that the proceeds would be shared between them.
_	As far as the detractors are concerned, Martin's contract with them was for a story, their engagement with it offered on the understanding that he would provide them with a satisfying conclusion.
_	In the meantime, the company awarded a 15% pay rise to non-striking workers on the understanding that they would not join the union.
_	A sling may be offered for short-term comfort, with the understanding that undesirable shoulder stiffness can develop with prolonged immobilization.
_	Despite the lack of military action the episode had major consequences on the states' right to use military force on their own with the understanding that the main purpose was to address internal conflicts.
_	According to Rodgers, “the Valentine Memorial emerged as an expression of continuity and fulfillment as those of involved in it attempted to grasp the understanding that death completes life and that we as survivors retain within us something of the essence of the people with whom we spend our lives.
_	Both are used to describe the understanding that what exists is not nothing without needing to address the existence of everything.
_	By the tacit consent of mankind, they become a form of money (one accepts gold in exchange for apples with the understanding that someone else will accept that gold in exchange for wheat).
_	These workers were invitees of the governments and came to Europe initially on the understanding that they could at any point in time in the future be repatriated if and when economic circumstances changed.
_	It was recommended that an Engineering/Service Test [ET/ST] be carried out on this new load-carrying system design with the understanding that any design changes required be accomplished prior to testing and without another design review.
_	Fischer who, in his position as Curator of the Israel Museum during those years, encouraged these trends, in retrospect stated that “the understanding that conceptual activity was what was developing here was not yet fully focused.”
_	Raynal agreed to the proposition but on the understanding that he would not undertake the command of the vessel.
_	Overclocking techniques in general aim to trade this safety margin by setting the device to run in the higher end of the margin, with the understanding that temperature and voltage must be more strictly monitored and controlled by the user.
_	The programme emphasized greater state control of the economy with the understanding that government control assured greater welfare than private control.
_	RTÉ's guidelines state, "A cornerstone of our contract with television viewers is the watershed and the understanding that prior to 21.00 material broadcast should be suitable for a family audience.
_	Stevenson's troops were recruited with the understanding that they would be discharged in California.
_	This belief comes from the understanding that when the Hindu deity Krishna was incarnated on Earth, he came as a cowherd.
_	Emil's boss at the radio station is a Nazi sympathizer who offers him the job with the understanding that no one will bother him about his wife.
_	The Port of Bellingham purchased the G-P site for $10 with the understanding that the port would assume liability for the contamination.
_	Unless otherwise clear from the context, this article treats the case of Euclidean conformal geometry with the understanding that it also applies, "mutatis mutandis", to the pseudo-Euclidean situation.
_	Despite the sudden rupture of her engagement, Crystal‘s heart is by no means broken, but it is not St. Genis who in the end wins her love, for we are left with the understanding that it is Clyffurde, the English merchant who eventually overrides the prejudices of the old French count.
_	In 1985 the term post-traumatic stress disorder or PTSD was coined and the understanding that traumatic events of all kinds could cause PTSD started to evolve.
_	The name 'Bhomat' is based on the understanding that land tenures known as "bhum" were held by "jagirdars" in the region.
_	In 1978 however there had been a lot of opposition when Council arranged for Sir Campbell Adamson to stand for Council, on the understanding that he would stand for and become President the following year.
_	In July 1846, Colonel Jonathan D. Stevenson of New York was asked to raise a volunteer regiment of ten companies of seventy-seven men each to go to California with the understanding that they would be muster out and stay in California.
_	This was funded by the Ministry and IRC with the understanding that communities benefits when women actively participate in decision-making about community development priorities.
_	Marija Gimbutas states that she uses "the term matristic simply to avoid the term matriarchy with the understanding that it incorporates matriliny.
_	A1 corresponds to a parallel connection and A2 to a series connection, with the understanding that making a distinction corresponds to changing how two points in a circuit are connected, and not simply to adding wiring.
_	He buys a bill of exchange for 10 florins, with the understanding that the London branch will cash that bill at half a pound to the florin, for a total of 5 pounds.
_	Eventually, in the early 1970s, Moreton Bay College withdrew from QGSSSA sport on the understanding that it could return when numbers increased sufficiently.
_	This position is taken based on the understanding that no additional inspired interpreters (prophets) are due to the church until after the establishment of the kingdom.
_	The site, also known as the 'old rectory' and approved by the Home Office as being suitable for hospital, was retained by Mr. Black on the understanding that it would be sold at the purchase price to the Southport Memorial Hospital Committee, which had been established in 1918, when funds and plans had progressed further.
_	Community members accused MakerBot of asserting ownership over their designs when those designs had been contributed with the understanding that they would remain open source.
_	Dr. Himaya agreed to accept the position with the understanding that the church would essentially dissolve and reorganize as a new congregation with a new name, new ministry efforts, and a strong emphasis on evangelism.
_	Shortly after, Bashir fled the country with the understanding that the government was still hunting her.
_	During that time, however, on two occasions, the dioceses were again separated, in both cases to benefit an uncle-nephew pair, one of whom became bishop of Avellino and the other bishop of Frigento, on the understanding that, on the death of either one, the survivor would reunite the two dioceses.
_	He also promised to eliminate Canada's Goods and Services Tax, and suggested the introduction of a thirty per cent flat tax to eliminate Canada's deficit and debt (with the understanding that the rate would be reduced after such time).
_	Anaya offered the navy's support on the understanding that the navy would be allowed to occupy the Falkland Islands and South Georgia.
_	The King assented, but only on the understanding that his absence from France was to be short.
_	At the 1931 general election, Bevin was persuaded by the remaining leaders of the Labour Party to contest Gateshead, on the understanding that if successful he would remain as general secretary of the TGWU.
_	Social reproduction revolves around the understanding that rich breed rich, and the poor breed poor.
_	In addition, Gleason urged the pair to create new titles for his company under the understanding that they would share in the profits.
_	The local company built the line, using the contractor Thomas Brassey; Brassey had taken £15,000 in shares on the understanding that he would be appointed as the contractor.
_	The further discussion concerns the differences between Anglian and West Saxon, with the understanding that Kentish, other than where noted, can be derived from Anglian by front-vowel merger.
_	Marketing practices aim to create, stimulate or influence customer behaviour, which places conversions into a more strategic context and is premised on the understanding that a focus on maximising conversions can, in some circumstances, decrease the likelihood of repeat conversions.
_	This story reminds one of Chaim Weizmann, who in 1914, delivered his discovery of acetone to England only on the understanding that a Jewish national home should be established in Palestine.
_	In the Smarta denomination of Hinduism, the philosophy of Advaita expounded by Shankara allows veneration of numerous deities with the understanding that all of them are but manifestations of one impersonal divine power, Brahman.
_	Before the season began he signed a new contract on the understanding that he would leave the club if they could not achieve promotion by the end of the season.
_	One may also schematically allow the non-zero entries to lie in a group "G," with the understanding that matrix multiplication will only involve multiplying a single pair of group elements, not "adding" group elements.
_	For example, Watchorn gave his two-hundred-acre New York estate to the Atlantic Union Conference of the Seventh Day Adventist Church, with the understanding that it was to be used as a church-operated medical facility.
_	However, she expands the understanding that God had taken them away in order for her family to live a more pious life.
_	On 19 October 1864, he sent the Assembly a demand, countersigned by Constantine Kanaris, explaining that he had accepted the crown on the understanding that a new constitution would be finalized, and that if it was not he would feel himself at "perfect liberty to adopt such measures as the disappointment of my hopes may suggest".
_	In 1643, he attempted to seize Carlisle Castle for the Parliament; however, the local gentry and the militia routed the parliamentarians and pursued them to Abbey Holme, only to release then on the understanding that they would discontinue their belligerence.
_	She returned to Dallas, Texas, where friends advised her to assert falsely that she had been raped in order to obtain a legal abortion (with the understanding that Texas law allowed abortion in cases of rape and incest).
_	When he returned to England in November 1890, the Duchess initially forwarded him a monthly allowance, on the understanding that he would work steadily on his writing, but she terminated this allowance several months later, playing no further part in his life.
_	Reasons for women's low sexual desire may be due to the understanding that sexual intercourse leads to pregnancy.
_	Much like Yermak, future troops were sent with the understanding that it would be necessary to supplement their base payment with treasures and tributes gained from conquest.
_	In 1627 he received a pension of £200, and in 1630 this was raised to £500 on the understanding that he should write a history of England.
_	The imperial government took over Basutoland as a crown colony, on the understanding that Cape Colony should contribute £18,000 annually for administrative purposes.
_	The difference was that these schools taught with the understanding that education provided opportunity for upward mobility and supported the ideals of independence and democracy.
_	He was appointed as prime minister with the understanding that he would resign if the Labor Party elected someone other than him as leader at its next caucus meeting.
_	The compromise essentially stated that Southern Democrats would acknowledge Hayes as president, but only on the understanding that Republicans would meet certain demands.
_	Such sculptures are described as "Roman copies", with the understanding that these were produced, often by Greek sculptors, anywhere under Roman hegemony "say, between the dictatorship of Sulla and the removal of the Capital to Constantinople, 81 BCE to CE 330"
_	The Cabinet agreed on a proposal to seek armistice terms from Germany, with the understanding that, should Germany set forth dishonourable or excessively harsh terms, France would retain the option to continue to fight.
_	He ordered them to appear before the Earl of Argyll who was then the Lord High Chancellor of Scotland and make peace, on the understanding that should they not be peaceful that they would be fined 500 merks.
_	Following Radlov's acrimonious resignation from the Kirov in June 1934, a new agreement was signed with the Bolshoi Theatre in Moscow on the understanding that Piotrovsky would remain involved.
_	If such an economic situation were ever to reverse, or change for the worst, then the consequences which would follow could end up resulting in increased racial conflict; thus he urged Blacks to consider disintegration as a realistic possibility — to prepare for all hypothetical scenarios — with the understanding that integration was not guaranteed to last forever.
_	On the understanding that they would "bring home a new county," area mill operators George Meigs and William Renton supported the candidacies to the Territorial Legislature of two employees from their respective mills:
_	Corvisart contributed heavily to the field of pathological anatomy, by advocating for the understanding that the uniqueness of each body and its organs affect the nature of disease.
_	The first election of the new municipality of Grand Tracadie-Sheila was held on May 12, 2014, and the new municipality was officially incorporated on July 1, 2014, with the understanding that the new regional municipal council would consider another town name for the long-term.
_	A tense stand-off developed when British forces surrounded the volunteer hall and continued for a week until a negotiated agreement led to the surrender of the volunteers' arms to the then Lord Mayor of Cork Thomas Butterfield on the understanding that they would be returned at a later date.
_	When the work of revising the liturgy in the twentieth century was undertaken it was with the understanding that it was touching the nerve-centre of the Anglican ethos, since Anglican identity takes a more intangible form, deeply dependent upon the influence and binding effect of its liturgical worship.
_	He concludes by suggesting that we live our lives, our vocations, with the understanding that there is a judgment coming.
_	On leaving Westminster in 1921, Gielgud persuaded his reluctant parents to let him take drama lessons on the understanding that if he was not self-supporting by the age of twenty-five he would seek an office post.
_	The pro-treaty side was to argue that after 11 October the negotiations had been conducted on the understanding that, even though the British were not negotiating with a sovereign state, the agreement was a significant first step towards Irish sovereignty.
_	Thus when the government indicated in 1929 that it did not by application of the anticlerical provisions of the constitution intend to destroy what the government called the "identity of the Church" nor to ignore its hierarchy, the Holy See agreed to relent, allowing the resuming of public worship, with the understanding that the Church would not accept the government regulation of worship, nor cease protest against, nor to combat it.
_	Unitarian Universalists do not share a creed; rather, they are unified by their shared search for spiritual growth and by the understanding that an individual's theology is a result of that search and not a result of obedience to an authoritarian requirement.
_	The Commodore's gift was given with the understanding that McTyeire would serve as chairman of the university's Board of Trust for life.
_	They took ownership of the building in July 2013 with the understanding that they would make the necessary infrastructure improvements.
_	The development of voice categorizations were made with the understanding that the singer would be using classical vocal technique within a specified range using unamplified (no microphones) vocal production.
_	They showed their gratitude to God for sending the hare by donating money to the church on the understanding that every Easter Monday, the vicar would provide a hare pie, twelve penny loaves, and 2 barrels of beer for the poor of the village.
_	His question is full of genuine interest and sets the tone of their debate, what seems to be the understanding that their religious differences are trumped by something more important—their human connection.
_	According to Rambachan, in Advaita, this state of liberating self-knowledge includes and leads to the understanding that "the self is the self of all, the knower of self sees the self in all beings and all beings in the self."
_	Sir John Carew Pole gave the house and formal gardens into the care of the National Trust in 1961, on the understanding that the family could continue to reside there.
_	In this usage, the term "static" is intended to convey the understanding that the structural portion of the system has no internal moving parts.
_	He was appointed to the position by the country's National Transitional Council on the understanding that he would be replaced when the General National Congress was elected and took power.
_	This lower weight reflects the understanding that dense subsections of the reporting unit, like inner cities, are not considered as urban sprawl.
_	Drawing on Bourdieu’s theories of capital, language, and symbolic power, Norton argues that if learners invest in a target language, they do so with the understanding that they will acquire a wider range of symbolic and material resources, which will increase the value of their cultural capital and social power.
_	Mecklenburg was a plaintiff in concussion-related litigation against the NFL: "I didn't buy in to professional football with the understanding that I was going to have brain damage.
_	This is the understanding that LGBT history cannot and should not be analyzed through contemporary perspectives.
_	The theatre was removed two years later, on the understanding that it would be replaced; however a domed amusement arcade was put in place instead.
_	Fox now gave Power permission to seek his own roles outside the studio, on the understanding that he would fulfill his fourteen-film commitment to them in between his other projects.
_	Harrison agreed to their use in the film on the understanding that his name would not be used for publicity.
_	After leaving "Time" over monetary issues, Barlett and Steele were hired by "Vanity Fair" to be contributing editors on the understanding that they would contribute two articles in their signature long-form style each year.
_	In 1999 he was asked to succeed Elizabeth Webby as editor of the journal "Southerly" and accepted on the understanding that the editorship be shared (from 2000 until 2007 with Noel Rowe; from 2007 until the present with Elizabeth McMahon).
_	Riders go out for part two with the understanding that, if they opted for the wrong tires, they either have to wobble around like Steve Manship at Silverstone or come in for a change.
_	Ltd invested a total of £20,000 in founding TCA, buying the previous blacklist database from the Economic League and hiring one of its former employees, Ian Kerr, as manager (McAlpine also invested £10,000 in founding another Economic League spin-off, CAPRiM, on the understanding that they would not interfere with the Consulting Association).
_	Finding many, but not enough, he expanded to recruiting civilians outside of the installation, getting many men willing to join the Navy as petty officers, with the understanding that qualified men could later apply for commissions.
_	Another way of describing sociological imagination is the understanding that social outcomes are based on what we do.
_	About a week after the execution of King Charles I in 1649, he accepted on 8 February 1649, a new commission as Lord Chief Justice of the upper bench on the understanding that no change should be made to the fundamental laws of the kingdom.
_	It was largely constructed using the labor of local slaves (including women), newly freed slaves who had flocked to Nashville once it was taken by Union forces with the understanding that their status as slaves was to be revoked were they to work for the Union, and by free blacks forcibly conscripted for the work.
_	Eisenstadt's research contributed considerably to the understanding that the modern trend of a eurocentric interpretation of the cultural program developed in the west is a natural development model seen in all societies ... the European model is only one: it was merely the earliest.
_	In April 1922 the bishop traveled there and held two weeks of consultations with Martin, Roynane and another missioner, during which the Rule and Constitutions of a new congregation were hammered out, with the understanding that Martin would be the foundress.
_	First, these voice categorizations were made with the understanding that the singer would be using classical vocal technique.
_	He shared and furthered many of Teilhard de Chardin’s views, including the understanding that humanity is not at the center of the universe, but integrated into a divine whole with its own evolutionary path.
_	In 1924, the Horners agreed to let Mells Park to them for a nominal rent, on the understanding that the McKennas would rebuild the house.
_	The university leased part of it to the society, with the understanding that the university would continue to do so; the hall is now known as Rosenfeld Hall.
_	After Edwards' death, the property passed in 1877, via a 99-year lease, to the brothers John and George Cruger, with the understanding that it would revert to his heirs after the lease expired.
_	Neurocardiology is the understanding that the body is interconnected and weave in and out of other systems.
_	On several occasions, and as a courtesy to a customer, IPC arranged for the disposal of waste oil by a St. Louis waste oil hauler, Bliss Oil, with the understanding that Bliss would take the oil to a waste disposal site.
_	However, the Reds were doing so well under Johnson (they led the National League Central at the time of the 1994 Major League Baseball strike and won the division in 1995) that she instead opted to name Knight as assistant manager, with the understanding that he would succeed Johnson in 1996.
_	Locke introduced this idea as "empiricism," or the understanding that knowledge is only built on knowledge and experience.
_	Many of his villas were built in the scenic Hudson River Valley— where his style informed the vernacular "Hudson River Bracketed" that gave Edith Wharton a title for a novel —but Davis sent plans and specifications to clients as far afield as Indiana, with the understanding that construction would be undertaken by local builders.
_	Perspective owners had to pay kennel charges of one guinea per week and the greyhound would be accepted into the track kennels on the understanding that all greyhounds were subject to veterinary examination, National Greyhound Racing Club rules and company conditions.
_	The grammar portion of the text is written with the understanding that the reader would be familiar with linguistics, particularly those of Germanic languages.
_	b) lets premises on the understanding that such premises shall be used for prostitution or is grossly negligent in this respect
_	Lord Casey, the Governor-General of Australia, sent for McEwen and he was sworn in as Prime Minister, on the understanding that his commission would continue only so long as it took for the Liberals to elect a new leader.
_	Central in the analysis of frictional contact problems is the understanding that the stresses at the surface of each body are spatially varying.
_	He was described as a player whose "game was built on the understanding that no quarter was asked or given, as he let nothing stand in his way in pursuit of a goal".
_	In a deal that was made in 1948 to create a fourth judgeship position on the Bronx County bench the following year, Judge Samuel Joseph, a Republican who was up for re-election for his judge position, obtained the endorsement of both the Republican and Democratic parties in the Bronx, with the understanding that in the following year, the Democratic nominee would also get the Republican nomination.
_	All aspects of the design were focused on the speed for construction and with the understanding that the number of troops was unknown.
_	Sneyd entered into marriage with Richard Edgeworth on the understanding that they were equal partners in his work.
_	Vreeland allowed Nancy Colbath to adopt the child, with the understanding that she would be raised by Henry Wilson and his wife.
_	The only exception has been Hal Colebatch, a member of the Legislative Council who accepted the premiership in April 1919 on the understanding that an Assembly seat would be found for him, only to resign a month later when no seat could be found.
_	He took the position with the understanding that it would be temporary, and he resigned after twenty months, having overseen the organization of the new agency with an emphasis on mining geology.
_	With the understanding that the recording of the first deeds would trigger intense public scrutiny, Disney delayed the filing of paperwork until a large portion of the land was under contract.
_	These privileges were granted on the understanding that Genoese goods be subject to tariffs.
_	According to Kevin Weeks, when Bulger met with McIntyre in a South Boston house, he hoped to avoid murdering the informer and offered to send him to South America with money and the understanding that he was never to contact his family or friends again.
_	It also echoes a voice from our ancestors of resistance in the understanding that we must yield a weapon of justice (the two headed ax of Changó).
_	Each maneuver brought the armies closer to the Confederate capital of Richmond, but the city was not the main objective—the destruction of Lee's army was the goal established by Grant and President Abraham Lincoln, with the understanding that Richmond and the Confederacy would fall if Lee were defeated.
_	Marlynn's father subsequently purchased three Kentucky Fried Chicken restaurants in Waterloo, Iowa, and Gacy and his wife moved to Waterloo so he could manage the restaurants, with the understanding that they would move into Marlynn's parents' home (which was vacated for the couple).
_	Instead of imprisoning her like other defendants in the Bolotnaya Square case, the Investigative Committee of the Russian Federation released her on the understanding that she would not leave Moscow.
_	The residents claim that they bought the apartments with the understanding that they would get the Occupancy Certificates ("OC") in due course.
_	McNally had the understanding that the play would receive a public performance at the Guthrie Theater in Minneapolis.
_	This led to the understanding that aberrant phenylalanine metabolism was responsible for the observed phenotype and to the development of diagnostics measuring blood or urine phenylalanine levels.
_	Captain Wragge arranges the marriage with the understanding that he will receive a payment promised by Magdalen and have no further contact with her after the wedding.
_	"Shake" and its B-Side, "From Way Out to Way Under" were actually recorded by Sohns and a number of studio musicians, on the understanding that a Shadows of Knight reassembled by Sohns would record the follow-up album.
_	Nathaniel P. Banks was nominated for president on the 10th ballot over John C. Frémont and John McLean, with the understanding that he would withdraw from the race and endorse John C. Frémont once he had won the Republican nomination.
_	Jarred by what he witnessed and the understanding that her predicament was not unique, Gillis began to more seriously study U.S. history and its bearings on present-day socioeconomics.
_	Currently located at Marine Corps Base Camp Lejeune in North Carolina, "LSM-297" was donated to the Museum of the Marine by the now defunct Amphibious Ship Museum under the understanding that it would be put on display at the museum, and was towed to North Carolina in 2004 from Omaha, Nebraska.
_	Iona Capital’s core business operations are predicated on the understanding that superior investment performance is fully compatible with a responsible and progressive approach to ESG as markets and governments increasingly embrace the necessary transition to a sustainable economy.
_	President Roosevelt intervened to rescind the resolution, but only on the understanding that steps would be taken to put a stop to further Japanese immigration.
_	Viraswamy was an educated young man, who had been recruited in Madras on the understanding that he would be working on a post officer in the government office.
_	Cowboy Frank Patterson "made some kind of a compromise" with Captain Hurst, who persuaded the posse to withdraw, with the understanding that the mules would be returned.
_	He left additional lands to Ælfric of Abingdon, the Archbishop of Canterbury, with the understanding that Ælfric would be a friend and ally to the monks.
_	Relationships are Work: Relationship education is built on the understanding that what happens in our closest relationships impacts quality of life, fulfillment, happiness, and the ability to pursue cherished dreams and aspirations.
_	The lever delayed blowback operation is a good one, with the understanding that it tends to be pretty sensitive to the specific pressure curve of the ammo it’s designed for.
_	The exact voltage ratings should be specified in product data sheets, with the understanding that the cells should be protected by an electronic circuit that won't allow them to overcharge nor over-discharge under use.
_	The Malay nationalist Kesatuan Melayu Muda, advocates of "Melayu Raya", collaborated with the Japanese, based on the understanding that Japan would unite the Dutch East Indies, Malaya and Borneo and grant them independence.
_	Ms Ferris was then in her 70's and she agreed to start the ministry with the understanding that she would only do the work for a year.
_	The center was established in 1983 when Ira F. Brilliant, an Arizona real estate developer, donated his collection of Beethoven memorabilia to San Jose State University with the understanding that the material would be used to start a center devoted to Beethoven's life and works.
_	The Chinese government, persuaded that staging a major sporting event before a massive global audience would enhance their bid for the 2008 Olympics, initially gave its backing to the proposal, on the understanding that the fight would take place in June.
_	In 1960, the Board of Trustees established the Department of Architecture in the College of Engineering, with the understanding that the department would be granted autonomy upon accreditation.
_	Through its introduction, the details regarding indentured labor varied across import and export regions and most overseas contracts were made before the voyage with the understanding that prospective migrants were competent enough to make overseas contracts on their own account and that they preferred to have a contract before the voyage.
_	The low number of officers coming forward may have to do with the understanding that things happen in the heat of the moment that some officers would rather keep personal.
_	When the Minneapolis Central Library was torn down in 2002, the former planetarium was closed with the understanding that it would be rebuilt as part of the new library.
_	One of Finland's most famous clairvoyants, Aino Kassinen, recalled in her memoirs that she met Ryti in the 1930s in Helsinki, and got the understanding that Ryti strongly believed in people's being guided by the higher divine powers, and that he strongly believed in God, and had studied theosophy and anthroposophy.
_	Ultimately, Ellison chose author Nat Segaloff to write his biography and sat down for several hours of interviews, with the understanding that Ellison would have no veto over what would be in the book.
_	The Ngee Ann Learning Model (NLM) was developed with the understanding that Singapore’s knowledge-based economy requires well-rounded, employable individuals with both hard and soft skills.
_	However, the understanding that Grant had intended Anarky to be a vehicle for his personal views, and that the "Anarky in Gotham City" narrative describes Batman as sympathetic to his goals, if not his methods, upset Magnusson.
_	He issued this signal with the understanding that his captains would execute it in the context of signals given earlier in the day that the enemy's rear was the target of the attack.
_	As the site has suffered from looting and amateur excavations since shortly after Tiwanaku's fall, archeologists must attempt to interpret it with the understanding that materials have been jumbled and destroyed.
_	Armed with the understanding that specific, independent areas of the brain are responsible for articulation and understanding of speech, the brains abilities were finally being acknowledged as the complex and highly intricate organ that it is.
_	Later, he confronts Gus with the understanding that if he does not give Leo money, Leo will hand over the gun to the police.
_	Colonel William Burt was dispatched to Tortola to oversee the annexation on the understanding that the island would be returned to the Dutch when peace was declared.
_	City released him on the understanding that he didn’t work in England during the remaining period of his Coventry contract.
_	Theory of Mind refers to common sense understanding of the world, which includes the understanding that people – inclusive of oneself - possess varied and changing mental states like thoughts, beliefs and desires.
_	His first efforts were made in New York City and New Jersey, and although he received an offer of employment with the understanding that he could work behind a screen so that his presence would not be obvious to the other designers and corporate clients, he considered this circumstance to be unacceptable.
_	Ross then donated the manuscript to the British Museum on the understanding that it would not be made public until 1960.
_	Sadler was made chairman of the Committee, which allowed him to make his case by hearing evidence from witnesses of Sadler's selection, on the understanding that opponents of the Bill (or of some feature of it) would then have their innings.
_	They suggested a railway from Cinderford Bridge to a new harbour at Brimspill, or Purton, and it was agreed that the chairman should write to Robert Stephenson, asking him to send a surveyor to prepare plans, "on the understanding that the chief superintendence of the undertaking will be entrusted to him, Mr Stephenson".
_	On how May deals with her ex-husband Andrew becoming the Inhuman killer Lash, Wen said, "She's come to the understanding that it was something he had no control over.
_	This gave birth to the structural comparison between the starting materials, products, and the possible "stable intermediates" that led to the understanding that the most stable product is not always the one that is favored in a reaction process.
_	She resigned from her seat on the city council as part of the agreement to become mayor, which included the understanding that she would not stand in the mayoral election in November.
_	Piper and Andrews decided to build a station with the understanding that trains would stop regularly.
_	Ben Umstead of "Twitch Film" also gave the film a positive review and said that "it is the celebration of youth, and the understanding that we should cherish it while we can, for it won't always be the same."
_	The high ratio of haemorrhagic smallpox cases in this outbreak, combined with the rate of infectivity and the testimony of General Burgasov, has led to the understanding that an enhanced weaponized strain of smallpox virus was released from Aralsk-7 in 1971.
_	A report on 1 April 2005 identified 892 such persons still employed by the RS, and the information was provided to the State Prosecutor of Bosnia and Herzegovina with the understanding that the names would not be made public until official proceedings had been opened.
_	In the seventh novel, Susannah Dean, who ends up understanding ka maybe more than Roland himself, comes to the understanding that in simple terms, "ka-tet" means family.
_	The prominent Reclaiming priestess Starhawk related that a core part of goddess-centred pagan witchcraft was "the understanding that all being is interrelated, that we are all linked with the cosmos as parts of one living organism.
_	They returned in July after the speaker was re-instated with the understanding that he would quietly resign after a few sessions.
_	Gypsy allowed him in and allegedly gave him duct tape, gloves and a knife with the understanding that he would use it to murder Dee Dee; Gypsy claimed later that she did not expect him to be able to do it.
_	The same year that the park opened, the Mahoning County commissioners issued bonds to pay for the parkland, and Rogers purchased $25,000 of them, with the understanding that they would be the last ones paid.
_	Neither family approved of the match, but when William went to London to study law about 1759, he left with the understanding that Elizabeth would wait for him.
_	Barber had exploited his patent by selling tar to road builders with the understanding that they could use the patented method with Barber's tar; it granted no written license.
_	Lodge, echoing Wilson, issued 14 "Reservations" regarding the treaty; among them, the second argued that America would sign only with the understanding that:
_	The street interviews Bowden conducted indicate that people invariably support the increased funding of schools under the understanding that increased funding will improve the quality of education in the United States; Bowden, on the other hand, argues that efficiency and quality is best achieved through competition of resources which demands that efficiency and quality be achieved in order to thrive and attract "customers".
_	UN acting mediator Ralph Bunche was able to convince Syria to withdraw on the understanding that the sovereignty of the 3 Israel-Syria DMZs created (totalling ) would remain undetermined until a final peace settlement was achieved.
_	The Biosphere program was renamed as the Man in the Biosphere, to include the understanding that this is not a park without people, but rather the area has thousands of native people,some of whom tell the stories that the big rocks with petroglyphs on the Rio Platano such as Walpa Ulban Silp (Pequeña Piedra tallada) y walpan Ulban Tara (Grande Piedra tallada)mark the umbilical cord of their people, that that is where they came out of the earth to this earth.
_	In the meantime Janaki is forcefully sent to Singapore to her relatives for higher studies with the understanding that she will be married off to their son Ananthan (Saiju Kurup).
_	His Majesty the King of 'Iraq further authorises His Britannic Majesty to maintain forces upon 'Iraq territory at the above localities in accordance with the provisions of the Annexure of this Treaty on the understanding that the presence of those forces shall not constitute in any manner an occupation and will in no way prejudice the sovereign rights of 'Iraq.
_	The Musqueam Band offered in 2003 to buy the course on the understanding that it would honour the land use covenant.
_	He put his team together in just 32 days, acquiring players with the understanding that there would be no pay this year.
_	This hypothesis was later disproven by the understanding that the Galápagos, Seychelles, and Mascarene islands are all of recent volcanic origin and have never been linked to a continent by land bridges.
_	The shift in focus stemmed from the understanding that military control of vital seaborne trade was imperative for New Zealand's survival.
_	However, Wood agreed only on the understanding that Walters received equal billing, not feeling confident enough as yet to go it alone.
_	One can construct an alternating product from ⊗, with the understanding that it works in a different space.
_	Since ADS had been written on Liberty Mutual's mainframe, Christensen left with the understanding that if Liberty ever decided to use TELON it could acquire the software free of charge.
_	Von Huene and his Australian colleague Frederick Morgan sought to connect the tradition of the historical wind-makers to the modern day with the understanding that doing so creates the best instruments, and those most suited to ancient music.
_	The pivotal passage of the text is the transition from the idea that an image is able to mean something, to the understanding that this ability is tied with the formation of the subject identity.
_	This uncertainty was clarified by the subsequent excavations at Olduvai; nevertheless, the term is still in use for pre-Acheulean contexts, mainly across Eurasia, that are yet unspecified or uncertain but with the understanding that they are or will turn out to be pebble-tool.
_	The Diocese of Southern Virginia was created in 1892, with the understanding that a further division would soon occur (and the Diocese of Southwest Virginia was created after bishop Whittle's death).
_	information exchange requirements with the understanding that the added specifications
_	This time, he borrowed equipment and blank discs from the Library of Congress with the understanding that he would deposit the recordings there.
_	The British Government proposed to construct two lighthouses in the area in 1857, one on Breaksea Island and the other at Point King, on the understanding that the local government met the running costs.
_	Both Roman Catholic and Orthodox Christians venerate images and icons of Mary, given that the Second Council of Nicaea in 787 permitted their veneration with the understanding that those who venerate the image are venerating the reality of the person it represents, and the 842 Synod of Constantinople confirming the same.
_	The Protectionist Party formed the first government with the support of the Australian Labor Party, on the understanding that the Protectionists would implement a number of social reforms desired by Labor.
_	In 1500, Jakob von Baden's uncle, John II of Baden, Archbishop of Trier, had Jakob named his coadjutor archbishop, with the understanding that Jakob von Baden would succeed Johann von Baden as archbishop.
_	In 1561 Pope Paul IV deeded these holdings, along with the remains of the old convent, to the collegiate church of Montorio al Vomano, with the understanding that they would be restored.
_	The "Betts v. Brady" case narrowed the interpretation and the understanding that came about from the "Powell v. Alabama" case.
_	When receiving diplomats, who formally represent the sovereign, the receiving head of state grants certain privileges and immunities to ensure they may effectively carry out their duties, on the understanding that these are provided on a reciprocal basis.
_	Although this recording was apparently permitted by the RVW Society on the understanding that it would be a "one-off exhumation", the same orchestra and conductor gave the restored score a public performance at a Musicians' Benevolent Fund Royal Concert at the Barbican Centre in 2004.
_	Theme: Hymns which celebrate religious diversity and encourage interfaith cooperation, with the understanding that many of the world’s social problems are rooted in religious intolerance
_	In politics, a placeholder is an official appointed temporarily to a position, with the understanding that they will not seek office in their own right.
_	More simply put, concepts are the mental categories that help us classify objects, events, or ideas, building on the understanding that each object, event, or idea has a set of common relevant features.
_	Bondage occurs because of non-inquiry into self, translates Parmeshwaranand, while moksha is realized through inquiry, and with the understanding that Brahman and Atman (soul, self) are non-different.
_	The group's mission was to demonstrate current tactics to students attending the Air Corps Tactical School, with the understanding that the group would also assume the demonstration and exhibition function that was being carried out by combat units of Air Force Combat Command.
_	Sonam Rinchen states "Avidya" in the context of the twelve links, that "[Ignorance] is the opposite of the understanding that the person or other phenomena lack intrinsic existence.
_	She met her fate in the disaster, and only Lot and his family were saved during the destruction of their city, with the understanding that the cities of Sodom and Gomorrah are identified in Genesis, but "the location remains unnamed in the Qur'an"
_	The conference accepted the terms of the Mandate with reference to Palestine, on the understanding that there was inserted in the memorandum a legal undertaking by the Mandatory Power that it would not involve the surrender of the rights hitherto enjoyed by the non-Jewish communities in Palestine.
_	In order to avoid confusion between these two symbols, most texts will replace formula_10 by a plain dot, or even drop it altogether, with the understanding that it is implied from context.
_	Citing the shifting makeup of the workforce in the 1960s, the president did away with the vocational requirement, with the understanding that each department would provide practical career training as part of its curriculum.
_	There was some debate as to whether the extension from the road into Pocklington should be built, but it was decided to include provision for it in the bill to be put before Parliament, on the understanding that it would only be built if a majority of the shareholders approved.
_	Upon the Band's return to Aldershot at the end of the war, at the King's suggestion, it was reinstated with the highly prized title 'Mounted Band' because of its former associations with the Royal Horse Artillery, and on the understanding that the RHA may at any time claim entitlement to the services of the Band above all requests by other regiments.
_	Deferred reciprocity refers to giving a person gifts or favors with the understanding that they will repay this favor at another time when the initial giver is in great need.
_	King Alfonso IX granted lands to several religious orders with the understanding that they would plant vines, and many of the 40 churches that exist in the town of Toro today were built thanks to the wealth generated by the wine trade.
_	Johnson was given permission by the original song's copyright holders to write the English-language lyrics on the understanding that she receive neither official credit nor remuneration.
_	Guide Burns [Byrnes] was directed to carry out the order with the understanding that a knife was to be used.
_	In March 1987, its owner, Christ Episcopal Church in Grand Rapids deeded the church to the city, with the understanding that it would be restored and maintained to continue to qualify for the National Register.
_	Having barely seen Paulina for four years, he proposed by letter in 1867 on the understanding that she would never "by a word or even by a look" try to prevent him from volunteering for war service.
_	The option of the United States Coast Guard's (USCG) "Hamilton"-class cutters was seriously considered as an alternative to the order of HMNZS "Canterbury" in 1968, which was approved under the understanding that New Zealand would hold continued access to the UK market after Britain entered the European Economic Community and was affordable only because it was part of a British deal with the Yarrow shipyard to build seven RN, Chilean and RNZN "Leander"s at less than cost to save shipyard jobs in Scotland.
_	Peter Wood, 40, of Essex, England, purchased one such package for more than $50,000 with the understanding that he would receive training and then an employment offer.
_	The problem stems from the understanding that a democracy's legitimacy arises from the fact that it implements the will of the majority (majoritarianism).
_	The well-known eightfold path consists of the understanding that this world is fleeting and unsatisfying, and how craving keeps us tied to this fleeting world; a friendly and compassionate attitude to others; a correct way of behaving; mind-control, which means not feeding on negative thoughts, and nurturing positive thoughts; constant awareness of the feelings and responses which arise; and the practice of "dhyana", meditation.
_	Ballance's deputy, Richard Seddon, had by this time assumed leadership of the party on the understanding that a full caucus vote would later be held.
_	He argued that the rebels were not assisted in any way by the U.S. government; when this claim was proven to be false Stevenson complained that "I took this job on the understanding that I would be consulted and kept fully informed on everything.
_	As a result, Toosey agreed several years later to be interviewed by Professor Peter Davies, providing 48 hours of taped interviews on the understanding that they were not to be published until after Toosey's death.
_	In danger of being demolished with its timbers sold off and the land marketed as building plots, Peggy Pollard, alias Bill Stickers, and Brynhild Catherine Jervis-Read, alias Sister Agatha, of Ferguson's Gang, persuaded the Godwin-Austen trust to donate the watermill to the National Trust on the understanding that the Gang would raise the money for its repair and future running costs.
_	It is said that the famous sophist Protagoras took on a pupil, Euathlus, on the understanding that the student pay Protagoras for his instruction
_	He was given the library with the understanding that it would be shared as common property.
_	The managing director of local shipping company Whiteways and Ball presented the "Torquay Harbour Lifesaving Boat" to the RNLI in 1917 on the understanding that it would be kept operational even if the lifeboat station at the Ladies Bathing Cove closed.
_	The council sought permission from the family on the understanding that the school would be moved immediately for the benefit of the children, but an improved school would be established somewhere outside Old Pasadena soon thereafter.
_	One of the changes he instituted was the feudal system where he gave properties to men with the understanding that they owed him service.
_	He was initially buried in the "Baptist Corner" at the back of the burial ground, on the understanding that his remains would be moved into the family vault of his friend John Strudwick when that was next opened for a burial.
_	One of the changes he instituted was the feudal system, where he gave properties to men with the understanding that they owed him service in return.
_	Most mainstream intellectuals were content to avoid political involvement and to take on the role of scholar- specialists within their spheres of competence, with the understanding that as long as they observed the Four Cardinal Principles they would be permitted to conduct their research with minimal bureaucratic interference.
_	In the 80’s definitions began to incorporate the understanding that education is a means of empowerment for the individual, allowing the individual to make educated health decisions.
_	When news reached Tarlac of this, Angeles David was allowed to go home to Bacolor, Pampanga, with the understanding that he would return to Tarlac.
_	One 'seafaring man', Ellis Coffin left a house and a shop (now Lloyds bank) to the town on the understanding that the income derived from it should be distributed amongst the poor.
_	On 28 March, following the defeat of his armies by the French during the War of the Second Coalition, King Ferdinand IV of Naples agreed, as part of the general settlement of the war, to cede the State of the "Presidi", his rights on Elba (Porto Longone) and his claimed sovereignty over the Principality of Piombino to France on the understanding that they would be annexed to Tuscany to form the new Kingdom of Etruria.
_	Discernment is rooted in the understanding that God is ever at work in one's life, "inviting, directing, guiding, and drawing" one "into the fullness of life."
_	He was elected lieutenant governor in 1962, then succeeded Donald S. Russell in 1965 when Russell resigned with the understanding that McNair would appoint him to a then-vacant United States Senate seat.
_	The fact that the guerrillas were primarily Malayan-Chinese Communists meant that the British attempt to quell the uprising was supported by the Muslim Malay majority, on the understanding that once the insurgency had been quelled, independence would be granted.
_	From 1816 to the 1980s the British Guinea was no longer used a coin but prices for luxury items and professional services were often quoted in guineas, on the understanding that a guinea was equal to 21 shillings.
_	MacInnes was left £160,000 and the estate on the understanding that he would use Head's coat of arms and to use the surname "Head".
_	American Indians—primarily Delawares and Shawnees—made this agreement with the understanding that the British military would leave the area after the war.
_	(.) This research led to the understanding that the effects of therapies, designed to reduce hypertension, on blood pressure need to be distinguished from other effects on atherosclerosis.
_	This led to the understanding that the African outbreaks were effectively the same disease as the yellow fever that ravaged the Americas.
_	Dane said that he feared violence and social upheaval if the Constitution were not ratified, and he supported ratification with the understanding that there would be later amendments, which eventually came to be known as the United States Bill of Rights.
_	The Rupert's Land Act 1868 of the United Kingdom Parliament authorized the sale of Rupert’s Land to Canada with the understanding that “‘Rupert's Land’ shall include the whole of the Lands and Territories held or claimed to be held by the” Hudson’s Bay Company.
_	He left in 2001 to play for the summer in Singapore with Sengkang Marine, under the understanding that he would be signed by Carlisle United on his return.
_	Smith states that the virtue of "asteya" arises out of the understanding that all misappropriation is an expression of craving and a feeling of lack of compassion for other beings.
_	On Asche's return to London in 1911, Edward Knoblock wrote the play "Kismet" for him, with the understanding that Asche could revise it.
_	Charles has written to ministers on the understanding that his remarks are private.
_	The two MPs urged the crew to return to work, on the understanding that an investigation of their complaints would be made.
_	Europeans, in the form of French and Scots-Irish traders from Detroit and elsewhere, did not return until the following spring, with the understanding that they would trade more fairly with the Native Americans.
_	The understanding of "Truth" is derived from the understanding that Spirit is all there is, and that it cannot be other than perfect.
_	Hoapili agreed to release the men on the understanding that Clark would land the women at Lahaina.
_	I would say we spend a great deal of time and attention on things Chinese with the understanding that in the long run we have to have a good working relationship with 1.3 billion people."
_	After the recapture of Buda, the situation became untenable, and on 17 January 1688 Ilona had no choice but to surrender the castle, with the understanding that the defenders would receive amnesty from the Emperor, and that the Rákóczi estates would remain in her children's name.
_	A close friend of Berezovsky, Nikolai Glushkov, was arrested while seriously ill, and Berezovsky gave up the shares and transferred them to Roman Abramovich's Sibneft with the understanding that Glushkov would then be released.
_	The school was financed and built by George Merrick, founder of Coral Gables, with the understanding that the Dade County School Board would repay him $10,000 for the land and $25,000 for the school building.
_	However, Hoxhaism as a trend ultimately came to the understanding that socialism had never existed in China at all.
_	He acted as a guide at the 1949 International Phytogeographic Excursion where he met W. H. Pearsall, who before leaving offered him a place as a lecturer at University College London, with the understanding that he would be shortly made a Reader should everything work out.
_	Other opponents whom Gersen encounters readily agree to inform on their employer merely on the understanding that Gersen will kill them by shooting rather than by cluthe.
_	However wiser counsel prevailed, and the town accepted the inevitable and settled for a branch line, withdrawing their Parliamentary opposition on the understanding that their branch line would open on the same day as the main line.
_	The designer can opt to allow runahead to skip over instructions that are not present in the instruction cache with the understanding that the quality of any prefetches generated will be reduced since the effect of the missing instructions is unknown.
_	The Missouri General Assembly created Caldwell County in December 1836, with the understanding that it would be dedicated to Mormon settlers.
_	Charity accompanied them with the understanding that she would benefit financially from Tom's earnings.
_	The Council extended the mandate of UNOMIL on the understanding that it will review the situation in Liberia by 18 May 1994 on whether or not the Council of State of the Liberian National Transitional Government has been fully installed and there had been substantive progress in the peace talks.
_	Central to the understanding that developed (and was promoted by the authorities) of the "levée" is the idea that the new political rights given to the mass of the French people also created new obligations to the state.
_	Each type of trade item is given its own GTIN, with the understanding that there is a potential need to retrieve predefined information from such items; this product or service may be priced, ordered, or invoiced at any point in the supply chain.
_	Both boys come away from their talk with the understanding that, despite their socioeconomic differences, greasers and Socs all have their moments of humanity and vulnerability.
_	As a matter of market practice, this issue is dealt with on the understanding that institutions are responsible for their own internal authorisation matters and that any person who is held out as being able to enter into OTC derivative transactions has the apparent authority to do so.
_	Greenberg agreed, with the understanding that he would continue anchoring SportsCenter on a regular basis.
_	About 1,500 of them had sailed from Tripoli, on the understanding that they were to join the rest of their units, at the time based in Sicily and soon to return to the United Kingdom in preparation for Operation "Overlord", the Allied invasion of Normandy.
_	Three other Justices agreed with the decision in full while Justice Antonin Scalia agreed with the understanding that Daniels, under different circumstances, could receive special review of prior convictions.
_	Antiochus made peace with the Pharaoh by divorcing Laodice and marrying the daughter of Ptolemy II, Berenice, with the understanding that any children born from their union would inherit the Seleucid throne.
_	Complicated negotiations followed, in which the Beeston Cut was dropped from the bill, on the understanding that the Trent Navigation would then apply to build it, and the Trent Canal bill was withdrawn when the Trent Navigation pledged to pursue a bill to improve the river.
_	They obtained funding from their two universities, the National Science Foundation, and from Fred Hoyle, who offered a contribution with the understanding that aspiring British infrared astronomers would be trained at Minnesota.
_	Their willingness to retire was probably made with the understanding that their favorite choice, Li Peng, would be appointed to the Politburo Standing Committee as well as to the future premiership.
_	Even in the early days, significant risks were accepted in the understanding that the large open operation was the only option.
_	District 1 city councilperson Patsy Kinsey, also a Democrat, was named interim mayor the same day with the understanding that she would not stand in the mayoral election in November.
_	They are allowed special access to certain events with the understanding that the information and footage will then be shared with the rest of the White House press corps.
_	When Ashanti got a record deal, he let her out of the contract she signed with him, with the understanding that he'd get to produce some songs for her and earn royalties.
_	Subsequently, Miss Griffith-Jones transferred the land to the Diocese on the understanding that a small civilian church would be built on it.
_	Based on the understanding that considering the world through a human rights lens is key to empowering citizens to respond to the ills in our society and our world – from issues like discrimination and bullying to poverty, war and genocide – the John Humphrey Centre is dedicated to human rights education in Edmonton and Beyond through innovative, experiential and transformative programming and events that foster a sense of dignity, responsibility and justice."
_	Thus, the underlying regression model in the kernel machine setting is essentially a linear regression model with the understanding that instead of the original set of covariates, the predictors are now given by the vector (potentially infinite-dimensional) of feature elements obtained by transforming the actual covariates using the feature map.
_	Subsequently, she transferred the land to the Anglican Diocese on the understanding that a small church would be built on it.
_	The Institute sees this as a contribution to the understanding that is engendered by the Good Friday Agreement.
_	This coincides with the understanding that Paul de Limbourg was employed by the Duke de Berry around the year 1409.
_	Tresham had no money to spare, his father's debts having reduced his inheritance, although he paid a small sum to Thomas Wintour, on the understanding that the latter was to travel to the Low Countries.
_	On May 25, 1738, after listening to a reading of Martin Luther's preface to Romans, John came to the understanding that his good works could not save him and he could rest in God's grace for salvation.
_	It is based on the understanding that besides military action, aggressors can also attack the country by wrecking its economic systems, tearing its social fabric apart, targeting Singaporeans' beliefs and commitment to defence, and its ability to recover from disasters, both natural and man-made.
_	In this radical change, the individual must relocate ethically, socially and politically while men must reformulate their values, with the understanding that they do not own the world but rather share it with other natural beings.
_	They were given a number of historic craft on the understanding that they would be preserved.
_	In 1856, Anthony agreed to become the New York State agent for the American Anti-Slavery Society with the understanding that she would also continue her advocacy of women's rights.
_	Currently insurers provide flood coverage on the understanding that government invests a certain amount of funds on flood defences, however the spending on flood defences has slipped below the levels seen in 2008.
_	Louis replied that he intended to gibbet the murderer, and the messenger, who was discovered to be Hayraddin, was sentenced to death, the quarrel between the duke and the king being at the same time adjusted, on the understanding that the Duke of Orléans should marry Lady Isabelle.
_	Then if "V" = "V" for each "i", the resulting direct sum can be written in exponential notation as "V", or simply "V" with the understanding that the direct sum is the default.
_	Construction company Sir Robert McAlpine Ltd invested £10,000 in founding CAPRiM, on the understanding that they would not interfere with The Consulting Association.
_	As he was very short in comparison with many of his classmates, Blair's acceptance into the school was on the understanding that he had to grow significantly during his first term or he would receive injections of growth-inducing hormones.
_	Foley agrees to meet Coyle later in the day, with the understanding that if Coyle doesn't show, he opted not to rat on the bank robbers.
_	While a map may display a graphical bar scale, the scale must be used with the understanding that it will be accurate on only some lines of the map.
_	The show was scheduled for a summer run, with the understanding that if there were enough viewers, it would continue into the 1957–58 television season.
_	I committed to this program with the understanding that people would have their own opinions about what I have done, who I am, and what I represent."
_	The prince, along with his family and followers, relocated to Mrohaung, with the understanding that the king of Arakan would shelter him and provide ships for the prince to undergo pilgrimages to Mecca.
_	His appointment was accepted by Johor chiefs based on the understanding that the Bendaharas would succeed to the throne if the Sultan died without heirs.
_	Schiit Audio announced that it will not be supporting MQA due to, amongst other reasons, the understanding that “…supporting MQA means handing over the entire recording industry to an external standards organization.
_	Brennan's tenure can only be properly framed with the understanding that in a time of zero scholarship limitations in college football, Notre Dame's administration inexplicably began a process of deemphasizing football, severely cutting scholarships and hindering Brennan from building a roster of any meaningful depth.
_	The idea behind True Colors is that it does not pigeonhole people into one personality type over another with the understanding that one's personality might make adjustments based on his or her environment or associations.
_	The founding of the Massachusetts Bay Colony in 1629 by a group of Puritans led by John Winthrop came with the understanding that the enterprise was to be "based in the new world rather than in London."
_	He further said the US approved the vote with the understanding that all references to Jerusalem were to be removed.
_	The artifacts were loaned based on the understanding that they would be returned to Iran.
_	Upon hearing of the Hungarian mobilization, Tiso was presented with the choice of either declaring independence with the understanding that the new state would be in the German sphere of influence, or seeing all of Slovakia absorbed into Hungary.
_	This was on the understanding that the Dutch would dislodge the Portuguese who were controlling the coastal regions of Sri Lanka.
_	Some tests, specifically, are based upon the understanding that when comparing the two, clitics resemble affixes, while words resemble syntactic phrases.
_	The painting was subsequently owned by Joseph Duveen, who sold it to Jules Bache in 1926 for $1.125 million, with the understanding that it was a genuine Velázquez.
_	Warner Bros. had agreed to finance the filming of "The Last Waltz" with the understanding that Dylan would be involved in the film and soundtrack.
_	He purchased many of Baxter’s plates and printed them using Baxter’s presses which he had lent him on the understanding that George Baxter Jr. took up the management of them and that George Baxter himself supervised the work.
_	Raffles prepares himself and his tools for the job, but on the understanding that Bunny will lead.
_	This breakthrough resulted in the understanding that the Bernoulli process is unique and universal; in a certain sense, it is the single most random process possible; nothing is 'more' random than the Bernoulli process (although one must be careful with this informal statement; certainly, systems that are mixing are, in a certain sense, 'stronger' than the Bernoulli process, which is merely ergodic but not mixing.
_	Abbott's proposal to take marriage equality to a non-binding plebiscite in 2017 may have encouraged conservative Liberals to support Turnbull in the spill on the understanding that Turnbull would honour that commitment.
_	Anderson and McCormack also have developed the understanding that decreasing cultural homophobia positively impacts the lives of bisexual men and bisexual women.
_	Investigation led to the understanding that platelet and blood pressure response were dependent on the sn-2 propionyl analog.
_	In 1395, after a treaty with the Mecklenburg's, Albert is released with the understanding that he will turn Stockholm over to Margaret in three years.
_	He therefore offered them to the government on the understanding that they should form the foundation of such necessary aids to research in the Royal Botanic Gardens, Kew.
_	After a series of interviews with King George III, Paoli was given a pension by the crown with the understanding that if he ever returned to Corsica in a position of authority he would support British interests against the French.
_	These settlements were made on the understanding that they would all keep the peace in a manner satisfactory to Rome.
_	When Grant became president in 1869, he appointed Washburne to succeed William H. Seward as Secretary of State, with the understanding that he would hold the post only briefly and then serve as minister to France.
_	Klinkhammer and Shepp rebuilt a new home for Bemis in the same spot as the one that burned down, with the understanding that they would inherit this from her in exchange for their labor and for looking after her in her old age.
_	Subsequently, the organisation developed a coded warning system, used until the 1960s, whereby a patrolman would always salute the driver of a passing car which showed a visible AA Badge unless there was a speed trap nearby, on the understanding that their officers could not be prosecuted for failing to salute.
_	In order to satisfy the First Law imperative to protect humans, it prevents them from dying (which it defines as permanent cessation of thought processes), though in order to satisfy the Second Law imperative to fulfil human desires, it allows limited violations of the First Law with the understanding that some humans do not consider certain forms of discomfort to be "harm".
_	This state, according to Rambachan, includes and leads to the understanding that "the self is the self of all, the knower of self sees the self in all beings and all beings in the self."
_	He refused the offer on the understanding that it was a government civil service position in which he may, as a result, be "muzzled" from talking to the media without official permission.
_	Although the protectorate had been proclaimed on the understanding that British South Africa Company would contribute to the costs of its administration, Johnson, resisted the company's demand that Crown lands where sovereignty had been ceded, which formed over 20% of the land of the protectorate, should be transferred to its control and that Johnson should also facilitate the transfer of lands remaining in African hands, amounting to over 40% of total land, to it (the remaining 15% was in European ownership).
_	The funding of the $33 billion line was to come mostly from the Vietnamese government, with the help of Japanese aid (on the understanding that Japanese firms would engineer the bulk of the project).
_	While she acknowledges video’s convenience, she downplays any larger significance: "What's missing in all this talk of digital technologies is the understanding that ... they're not ends in themselves."
_	"When a president talks about his business elite as chickens sitting on eggs... what is the nature of the understanding that they have? …
_	Rather, the pact was designed for a "joint war against France and Britain", although the Italian hierarchy held the understanding that such a war would not take place for several years.
_	In the story, it is mentioned that Oofy Prosser agreed to become Algernon Aubrey Little's godfather with the understanding that, having provided a christening gift, Oofy would not be expected to give Algernon Aubrey any future gifts.
_	This reflects Wodehouse's real agreement to become godfather to Frances Donaldson's daughter Rose on the understanding that after the obligatory christening gift, there would be no expectation of future presents.
_	In order to establish the aquarium in Jerusalem, the zoo management began a comprehensive study of the subject with the understanding that the aquarium to be built is the first in Israel.
_	Upon the dissolution of Kirkland, its endowment was transferred to the Hamilton endowment, with existing restrictions intact, with the understanding that all funds were to be applied "to support women and their needs and interests at Hamilton."
_	Harrington agreed on the understanding that he was to be regarded as completely independent of party.
_	In 1971, Daisy Plummer and family gave the house with all its furnishings to the Rochester Art Center with the understanding that it would be operated as a Center for the Arts.
_	This volunteer, which was one of those having access to the tools that allow the deletion of pages, was forced to delete the article while in the DCRI offices, on the understanding that he would have been held in custody and prosecuted if he did not comply.
_	They can be reduced by adding height speakers, which tend to smoothen the effect, or tuned to a subjective minimum by introducing staggered delays to the speakers, with the understanding that this may adversely affect low-frequency localisation if overdone.
_	Recognition of fictional characters as works eligible for copyright protection has come about with the understanding that characters can be separated from the original works they were embodied in and acquire a new life by featuring in subsequent works.
_	The support Louise received from the French envoy was given on the understanding that she should serve the interests of her native sovereign.
_	At a time before accurate diagnosis and treatment of mental illness was possible, Duggan was institutionalized on the understanding that he was "hopelessly insane."
_	It is the understanding that even good things are no longer good when they supplant God as one's center.
_	WHAD applied for 900 kHz again in 1929, under the understanding that it would share time with WLBL.
_	Mudgett was subsequently released with the understanding that he would provide bail in the morning.
_	But, patroonships had the right to trade anywhere from Newfoundland to Florida, on the understanding that traders were to stop at Manhattan to possibly trade first with the Dutch.
_	In May 1931, Clark was granted a leave of absence from his coaching responsibilities at Colorado College to allow him to play for the Portsmouth Spartans in the National Football League (NFL), with the understanding that he would return to coach the school's basketball team when the Spartans' season was over.
_	The introduction of the term "homosexual" and the understanding that same-sex sexual desire existed changed the meanings of same-sex intimate friendships.
_	In order to assist this process, many teams chose to name larger probable squads in November or December, with the understanding that the final squad would be picked from within these players.
_	In other regions, detainees are sentenced to on the understanding that they will be considered for parole after serving specific number of years.
_	At the heart of biography work is the understanding that each life story is a unique revelation of intention and deep wisdom.
_	The most important difference is that traditionally, the subscribers would be among the first to get access and would do so with the understanding that the work would likely always be a "rare" good; thus, there was some status in owning a copy, as well as the prestige of being among the patrons.
_	Meteorological organisations had allowed the university to use this data on the understanding that it would be kept private, largely due to its commercial value.
_	The song was received positively by the crowd, and Kamins decided that he should get Madonna a record deal, on the understanding that he would get to produce the single.
_	Fernandez quickly confessed, with the understanding that they would not be extradited to New York; Michigan had no death penalty, but New York did.
_	The reason for this interest is that states of a quantum system are represented by vectors in a Hilbert space formula_191—but with the understanding that two states differing by a constant are actually the same physical state.
_	They asserted that voters had approved the facility with the understanding that the new stadium was intended for soccer as well as football.
_	In 1980 she gave the island to the Royal Society for the Protection of Birds (RSPB) on the understanding that it would be managed for conservation.
_	Since 1991, a ceasefire has been in place, accepted by both parties with the understanding that the UN would organize a referendum on independence.
_	On June 11, 2001, Winograd's family relocated from the San Francisco Bay Area to Ithaca, New York, where he became Executive Director of the Tompkins County SPCA, on the understanding that the organization would become no kill.
_	Darsie had been Alan Fairford's favourite schoolfellow, and, to please his son, Mr Fairford had consented that Darsie, who received an ample allowance on the understanding that he was to make no inquiries respecting his family until he completed his twenty-fifth year, should live with them.
_	However, these cases were settled by the Tokyo Round Code on Subsidies and Countervailing Duties (predecessor to today's SCM), and the GATT Council decided in 1981 to adopt the panel reports subject to the understanding that the terms of the settlement would apply.
_	With the understanding that private homeowners could not afford the expensive repairs needed to protect their property (such as installing Gabion walls), Murphy strongly promoted a new erosion control policy wherein the City would take responsibility for preserving the drainage areas.
_	The basis of Performance Medicine in improving athletic performance lies in the understanding that the functions of the immune system, nervous system, hormonal system, and digestive system govern adaptation to training.
_	The first mile was paid for by Denver with the understanding that the State Highway Commission would do the rest.
_	The chief returns Smith to Jamestown with the understanding that the English are to leave the following spring, once their boats have returned.
_	Matthew 23:3 has the reading τηρειν τηρειται και ποιειται in basic agreement with Majority Text (and practically with D) against the United Bible Society's ποιήσατε καὶ τηρεῖτε (on the understanding that αι is an allophonic variation for ε).
_	In 2014, another study was carried out by a team of researchers at Edinburgh University, Scotland, motivated by the understanding that both height and intelligence test scores are predictors of better health outcomes and mortality.
_	The Board works with the Council and Administration on relevant issues, and may delegate specific tasks on the understanding thatthe Board maintains ultimate control over and responsibility for these functions.
_	Yohannes agreed to British requests to allow these Egyptian soldiers to evacuate through his lands, with the understanding that the British Empire would then support his claims on important ports like Massawa on the Red Sea to import weapons and ammunition, in the event that Egypt was forced to withdraw from them.
_	For instance, Cornwall, Albrecht, Cunningham and Pitcher (1986) identify six dimensions of religiosity based on the understanding that there are at least three components to religious behavior: knowing (cognition in the mind), feeling (effect to the spirit), and doing (behavior of the body).
_	The Catholic Church teaches that all Catholics must practice chastity according to their states of life, and Catholics with homosexual tendencies must practice chastity in the understanding that homosexual acts are "intrinsically disordered" and "contrary to the natural law."
_	Leopold takes Zenocia to Lisbon, and places her in the service of Hippolita, with the understanding that Zenocia will advance his suit to Hippolita.
_	Farrington was hired on the understanding that his tenure would be temporary due to his other musical and academic commitments.
_	However, the earliest recorded owner of the island of Alcatraz is Julian Workman, to whom it was given by Mexican governor Pio Pico in June 1846, with the understanding that Workman would build a lighthouse on it.
_	Hopwood, a Disciples of Christ minister and educator, came to the school with the understanding that it would become a liberal arts college to train leaders for Disciples of Christ churches and the communities of Appalachia.
_	In 1862 he succeeded William Cunningham as principal of New College with the understanding that he should still retain his position as minister of St George's.
_	Due to losses and the amount of debt it had taken on, 80% of ownership in Skyworth Mobile was sold for the nominal cost of one yuan and one Hong Kong Dollar to creditors Shenzhen Baoyi and Shine Success in 2008 with the understanding that they would inject more cash into the enterprise.
_	Although Viceroy Linlithgow appealed for imports from mid-December 1942, he did so on the understanding that the military would be given preference over civilians.
_	Between the lines, is the understanding that these ideas extend well beyond the subject of astrophysics.
_	Medical investigations let to the understanding that it was caused by "Ancylostoma duodenale" (favoured by high temperatures and humidity) and to "major advances in parasitology, by way of research into the aetiology, epidemiology and treatment of ancylostomiasis".
_	The song was sold with the understanding that Connor's version could only be released within North America and European regions and Australia and SM Entertainment could only release the song in Asian regions of the world .
_	Experiments have reported results that specifically support the understanding that there are fractionally-charged quasiparticles in an electron gas under FQHE conditions.
_	When Heydrich joined the SS, it was with the understanding that he would be a primary assistant to Heinrich Himmler and also Himmler's "right hand man" when it came to SS activities in southern Germany.
_	He approached Secretary Henry Morgenthau, Jr. and the Commissioner of the Federal Bureau of Narcotics Harry J. Anslinger that he tell the story of the Bureau's international work in cooperation with the United States Customs Service, United States Coast Guard and the Treasury with the understanding that the essential facts remain in focus.
_	Clubs would hire the player in a created position of responsibility within their administration, with the understanding that there were no actual duties required beyond playing for the sports team.
_	Students and school level data are also provided to the appropriate school system on the understanding that they can be used to target specific supports and resources to schools that need them most.
_	With the understanding that she would have visitation rights, Thompson agreed that Donald Kowalski would be named Sharon Kowalski's guardian.
_	Garbo made no immediate protest, and Green never violated the understanding that the recordings would not be exploited in any way during or after her lifetime.
_	Many journal implementations (such as the JBD2 layer in ext4) bracket every change logged with a checksum, on the understanding that a crash would leave a partially written change with a missing (or mismatched) checksum that can simply be ignored when replaying the journal at next remount.
_	After two and a half years of applying, New York University agreed to admit him on a provisional basis with the understanding that he would receive no special assistance.
_	Camps was initially to be let free because, given the precarious stability achieved in 1983, the democratic government of President Raúl Alfonsín had focused on the nine commanders of the juntas, who were tried and sentenced on the understanding that they were to take the blame for all the crimes committed under their rule.
_	The marquess brought the matter before the superiors of the Anglo-Benedictine Congregation in 1874, promising substantial pecuniary help in the establishment of a house in Scotland, with the understanding that when two other monasteries should have been founded they should all form a separate Scottish congregation.
_	"And to them he entrusted the training of his sons, with the understanding that the best they could do for him was to teach them in such a way that they could be immediately recognized as his very own."
_	After two years of study there, Claver wrote these words in the notebook he kept throughout his life: "I must dedicate myself to the service of God until death, on the understanding that I am like a slave."
_	But he committed to attending the University of Virginia, with whom he signed on scholarship with the understanding that at least for his freshman year he would only play baseball.
_	In 2007, Bart appointed Tim Gray to become his successor as editor with the understanding that he would stay on as columnist, blogger and consultant.
_	... based on the understanding that employment is a human relationship involving issues of mutual trust, confidence and fair dealing, and is not simply a contractual, economic exchange.
_	Brennan's tenure can only be properly framed with the understanding that in a time of zero scholarship limitations in college football, Notre Dame's administration inexplicably began a process of deemphasizing football, severely cutting scholarships and hindering Brennan from building a roster of any meaningful depth.
_	The Society was permitted to return to the College in March 1868, on the understanding that it would "avoid discussions as to Tenant Right, Repeal of the Union, or such like subjects."
_	Nathaniel P. Banks was nominated for president on the 10th ballot over John C. Frémont and John McLean, with the understanding that he would withdraw from the race and endorse John C. Frémont once he had won the Republican nomination.
_	The craft might be constructed for experimental purposes on the understanding that the DNC held no responsibility.
_	While McAleer never publicly discussed the disagreement that spurred his retirement, he supposedly relayed his version of events to Frank B. Ward, a sports reporter with "The Youngstown Daily Vindicator", with the understanding that the details remain confidential until McAleer's death.
_	The episode ends with Stella and Rob heading into a nearby town with the understanding that Taggart would call upon Stella for possible courtship.
_	Before his death, Patrick Lynch arranged for his friend, William G. Deal, to take title of Catherine, William and John, with the understanding that this was a legality to protect the family, who continued to work at Tacony plantation.
_	Dick Advocaat took over from Michels on the understanding that he himself would be replaced by Johan Cruyff the following year, although Advocaat actually stayed in charge for over two years.
_	This may be a "limited edition", with a fixed number of impressions produced on the understanding that no further impressions (copies) will be produced later, or an "open edition" limited only by the number that can be sold or produced before the plate wears.
_	At the same time, Mexican actress Silvia Pinal was eager to work with Buñuel and talked her producer-husband Gustavo Alatriste into providing additional funding for the project with the understanding that the director, who Pinal described as "a man worshiped and idolized", would be given "absolute freedom" in carrying out the work.
_	The land was ceded to the U.S. with the understanding that the proceeds made in the sale of the land to white settlers would go to the Chickasaw.
_	This means each actor involved in communication takes the other as accountable for what they have said, which implies that good reasons could be given by all to justify the validity of the understanding that is being achieved.
_	The Declaration is based on the understanding that a diversity of local initiatives are required to address social, environmental and economic challenges.
_	Fisk transferred the management of the Linux Gazette to SSC (under Phil Hughes) in 1996 in order to pursue medical studies, on the understanding that the publication would continue to be open, free, and non-commercial.
_	This debate ended with the victory of the Tiberian system and with the understanding that the Babylonian system reflected a foreign influence on the Hebrew language.
_	In 1985, a committee called the "Council for the 100th Anniversary of the Korean Church" was asked by Horace Grant Underwood III to register the cemetery on behalf of the Seoul Union Church with the understanding that the Seoul Union Church would be the unofficial caretakers.
_	An important aspect of Szeiler’s approach to the theatre is his use of time, based on the understanding that the usual rhythm of theatrical production (2–3 months of preparation followed by 2 hour evening performances) serves more to confirm the social status quo than helping to raise questions.
_	At the same time, the India Office agreed to share the cost of building and erecting the memorial with Brighton Corporation (the forerunner of the present Brighton and Hove City Council), on the understanding that the Corporation would be responsible for the town centre memorial.
_	Darkseid eventually frees Henshaw with the understanding that Henshaw is to leave Apokolips and never return.
_	The land was purchased with the understanding that the union and the General Conference approve the location.
_	This approach entails strict adherence to the way of Muhammad, in the understanding that this wont, or "sunnah", proposes a complete devotional spirituality adequate to those without access to a master of the Sufi way.
_	Some wished to push for an end only to the slave trade, on the understanding that eventually the existing slaves would die and with them, slavery itself; whereas others wanted a complete and immediate abolition of the institution of slavery.
_	After the Glorious Revolution, Ironside was rewarded for his resistance by being appointed bishop of Bristol; the diocese was poor, and Ironside was consecrated, 13 October 1689, on the understanding that he should be translated to a more lucrative see when opportunity offered.
_	Thought on where in the Solar System life might occur, was limited historically by the understanding that life relies ultimately on light and warmth from the Sun and, therefore, is restricted to the surfaces of planets.
_	For example, a government may put a building project 'out to tender'; that is, publish an invitation for other parties to make a proposal for the building's construction, on the understanding that any competition for the relevant government contract must be conducted in response to the tender, no parties having the unfair advantage of separate, prior, closed-door negotiations for the contract.
_	An important element of the competition is the understanding that each topic is interrelated, and understanding human effects on the environment and how human activities connect with ecosystem functions.
_	On the understanding that he was born in 1898 rather than earlier or later, sources suggest that in 1915, 17-year-old Broonzy was married and working as a sharecropper.
_	Thankfully, Emma was brought onto the show with the understanding that she was only going to be in a certain number of episodes and she knew that she was going to die from the very beginning.
_	Around the time Diana left Gateway City, Helena had finally made amends with Cassie and granted her blessing to continue as Wonder Girl with the understanding that she’d be well trained in combat by Artemis.
_	In an interview with "The New York Observer", he elaborated that what drew him to the project was "the understanding that [Anderson] had already entered into that world, [he] wasn't observing it [he'd] entered into it and indeed [he'd] populated it with characters who [he] felt had lives of their own".
_	C was therefore chosen, augmented with some selective chemical strikes occurring where they might prove to be most effective, with the understanding that if the advance of Warsaw Pact forces was halted by Western resistance (led by NATO), nuclear weapons could be used to regain the initiative on the battlefield.
_	Reid, like Boehner several days before, was initially opposed to the idea, but was eventually convinced to go along with it, with the understanding that the sequester was intended as an enforcement tool rather than a true budget proposal.
_	A culture of law incorporates a social contract: members of society give up some aspects of their freedom to defend themselves and retaliate for injuries, on the understanding that society will apprehend and punish transgressors.
_	Lagrange had purchased the painting for $17 million in 2007, on the understanding that it would be included in a supplement to the Pollock catalogue raisonné.
_	Some authors use infix notation: , with the understanding that this does not carry the usual meaning of and for some binary relation < . emphasizes the cyclic nature by repeating an element: .
_	Fratianno accepted the proposal with the understanding that he would carry the majority of the responsibility.
_	In 1955 the area was deeded to the State of California with the understanding that the state would reconstruct the historic buildings and interpret the settlement of the northern California coast.
_	Even though the majority of the partners want to fire Jimmy for cause, Cliff decides to give him a second chance with the understanding that he'll be under a great deal of scrutiny going forward.
_	If the applied E field is uniform and oriented along the length of the conductor as shown in the figure, then defining the voltage V in the usual convention of being opposite in direction to the field (see figure), and with the understanding that the voltage V is measured differentially across the length of the conductor allowing us to drop the Δ symbol, the above vector equation reduces to the scalar equation:
_	Therefore belief in a higher power is unnecessary (and for Sartre, unlikely) when one relates to the world under the understanding that humans have no original purpose or meaning to their creation.
_	More interesting is the understanding that the sums over the energies of standing waves should be formally understood as sums over the eigenvalues of a Hamiltonian.
_	They had sailed from Tripoli, on the understanding that they were to join the rest of their units, which were then based in Sicily.
_	The network brass, lawyers, and the FBI agree to his demands, with the understanding that Langford will be released once the show airs.
_	On August 13, 1868, Jones was appointed by Gov. Reuben E. Fenton as Register of New York City (the local recorder of deeds) to fill the vacancy caused by the death of Charles G. Halpine, remaining in this office until the end of the year with the understanding that the fees of the office be paid over to Halpine's widow.
_	It was founded by Ed Holmes (Bishop Joey of the First Church of the Last Laugh) in the late 1970s with the understanding that one of the unifying bonds in society is stupidity.
_	As of 2004, Kenya has shown a willingness to undertake biomass energy issues with the understanding that consumption is associated with indoor air pollution and environmental degradation.
_	The British agreed to this request with the understanding that Haji Sahib would return to tribal territory once he had laid the foundation stone.
_	Due to difficulties observing reactions at the molecular level, indirect methods are used which greatly limits the scope of the understanding that can be gained by studying these processes essential to life.
_	In his will he left the house and land to his wife on the understanding that on her death it would pass to the people of the town.
_	This stems from the understanding that it would interfere with that person's free will and thus constitute "harm".
_	As such, Locsin sustains the understanding that being technological competent is being caring.
_	UN/CEFACT’s work on electronic business is driven by the understanding that goods cannot move faster than the processes and information that accompany them.
_	When the Admiralty purchased "Pitt", it apparently was on the understanding that Lieutenant William Fitton, formerly of "Abergavenny", would command her.
_	Roy Mason, the President of the Board of Trade, gave the Government's preliminary approval to BOAC's proposed takeover of BUA, on the understanding that there were no realistic prospects of a merger with another independent airline as recommended in the Edwards report.
_	His appointment was accepted by Johor chiefs based on the understanding that the Bendaharas would succeed to the throne if the Sultan died without heirs.
_	The waiver, which expired on December 31, 2004, was granted with the understanding that TWC would "replace the Star IIIs in 2003/2004".
_	In 1972, the Westgates donated the property to the city of East Jordan, with the understanding that it would be used for public purposes.
_	Later he began to use serial techniques, and to experiment with various tonal concepts (atonal, aleatoric, graphic notation), but always on the understanding that music has a deeper significance which transcends absolute art, which can open up a path for a human being to find a way to himself (Schidlowsky: "Art itself has not only one meaning.
_	On the DVD commentary for "World War Three", producer Phil Collinson explained that they had hired an actor to play the dead body on the understanding that the man was a Tony Blair impersonator.
_	Later in the century the patronage came to be shared between Basset and the Duke of Leeds, though in the last years before Reform Basset's son (who became Lord de Dunstanville) was allowed to exercise patronage alone on the understanding that he did not interfere in the Duke's other Cornish borough, Helston.
_	They incorporated under licence of the Board of Trade in 1919 and received a grant of £5000 to operate an office premises, with the understanding that the universities of the Empire would fund its maintenance.
_	Pathe offered to distribute on the understanding that everyone would be paid ten pounds a week.
_	A tenet of the collective was the understanding that it would achieve its goal and then disband, which it did.
_	Learning by teaching (German short form: LdL) is a method which allows pupils and students to prepare and teach lessons or parts of lessons, with the understanding that a student's own learning is enhanced through the teaching process.
_	Poland offered to elect Henri, Duke of Anjou, Queen Catherine de' Medici's fourth son, to the throne of Poland with the understanding that France would ameliorate the Huguenots.
_	In January 1914, McGuire was assigned to coach Detroit's young pitchers during spring training with the understanding that he would then leave the club to assume "his regular duties as chief of scouts."
_	In 1984 she and Allen tried to have a biological child together; Allen agreed to this on the understanding that he need not be involved in the child's care.
_	Viraswamy was an educated young man, who had been recruited in Madras on the understanding that he would be working on a post officer in the government office.
_	On the death of his father in 1742, Bustill's new owner was his father's widow Grace Bustill, who later sold him to a local baker, Thomas Prior (sometimes spelled Pryor), another Quaker, with the understanding that Bustill would be taken on as an apprentice so he could earn the money to buy his own freedom.
_	Study of this unique genitalia and aggressive behavior in the female hyena has led to the understanding that more aggressive females are better able to compete for resources, including food and mating partners.
_	Thus it was left to the Greeks to drive out the Ottomans from these territories, with the understanding that the French army would only intervene if the Greeks found themselves in trouble.
_	The refugees sought permission from the Shanghai Municipal Police to enter the city, which was granted with the understanding that they would emigrate to the United States after six months.
_	Their work led to the understanding that both proteins are necessary for influenza A and B virus infection and replication.
_	In the early 1870s, Charles Flower gave several acres of riverside land to the local council on the understanding that a permanent theatre be built in honour of Shakespeare's memory, and by 1879 the first Shakespeare Memorial Theatre had been completed.
_	The charges were dropped on the understanding that Starr would leave the community.
_	When working with a good publisher, the "spirit of the law" is usually adhered to regarding milestone completion... in other words if the milestone is 90% complete the milestone is usually paid with the understanding that it will be 100% complete by the next due milestone.
_	Through a series of confidence tricks on the rich, they defy the Secret Peace, an unspoken agreement between the criminal underground and the Duke’s government which allows for the existence of organized crime with the understanding that the peerage and the servants of justice are off limits.
_	Campbell agreed to do it with the understanding that the film have a Broadway theatre-style, musical number.
_	The co-operation was based on the understanding that Japan would unite the Dutch East Indies, Malaya and Borneo and grant them independence.
_	According to this view, it is through touching and handling objects that infants develop object permanence, the understanding that objects are solid, permanent, and continue to exist when out of sight.
_	GSPM was founded in 1987 as an independent graduate school chartered by the New York State Board of Regents, with the understanding that proper politics requires training.
_	In "Spin", Brian Josephs praised how the group "worked with the understanding that black music at its finest conversed with ancestry while pointing toward future possibilities in resistance against the racist forces that run parallel."
_	Thousands of live bees were used during production, with the understanding that the bees would not sting without a queen present.
_	Non-synchronous transmissions are engineered with the understanding that a trained operator will be shifting gears in a known coordination of timing.
_	Persons with the mental capacity to make end-of-life decisions may refuse treatment with the understanding that it may shorten their life.
_	The parable shares the theme of other passages where "Jesus counsels the disposition of possessions (and hospitality) on behalf of the poor with the understanding that, while mammon will vanish, eternal treasure will have thus been secured."
_	Offseason negotiations with Simoni had culminated in his signing coming with the understanding that this Giro would be the final race of his career.
_	According to Eller, "a deep distrust of men's ability to adhere to" future matriarchal requirements may invoke a need "to retain at least some degree of female hegemony to insure against a return to patriarchal control", "feminists ... [having] the understanding that female dominance is better for society—and better for men—than the present world order", as is equalitarianism.
_	Ettridge used his own money for his legal defense, on the understanding that One Nation would repay him, but he states that he has never been repaid.
_	Recall scores were still provided in copy testing reports with the understanding that persuasion was the measure that mattered (Honomichl).
_	The Village of Steger was incorporated in 1896 with 324 residents, at which time John Steger agreed to pay $400 toward incorporation costs with the understanding that the town would change its name to Steger, and he subsequently served two terms as the village's board president.
_	This was ultimately assented to by the secretary of state, James Gillespie Blaine, on the understanding that certain specific
_	By spring 1909, they were engaged with the understanding that Gena would be leaving for one year study in Berlin.
_	He returned to the United States with the understanding that he could return to China as translator as his health permitted.
_	Galland accepted on the understanding that Gollob had no jurisdiction over him or his unit.
_	With the chances of successful prosecution looking unlikely, Hoover chose to give Bentley's information to certain U.S. Congressmen with the understanding that the accused spies would be questioned before congressional committees, and the publicized suspicion and accusations would be sufficient to ruin their careers.
_	"CRAFT grew out of the understanding that although individuals who truly need help with substance use problems often are strongly opposed to treatment.
_	In June 1961 the Chamber of Commerce and the Community League sponsored a postcard election with the understanding that all who cast votes would be willing to accept the outcome.
_	In 1964 he was offered a post at the Philadelphia Museum of Art, on the understanding that he would create a constructivist book.
_	Their decision was motivated by the understanding that FGC is harmful to the health of girls and women, violates their human rights, and is not in accordance with their religious and cultural values.
_	To cope with this cashflow problem, Object Desktop users who had switched from OS/2 to Windows were asked to purchase Windows subscriptions in advance of the actual software, on the understanding that their subscription period would only begin when the software was reasonably complete (which ended up as December 1999).
_	Pledged delegates are elected or chosen at the state or local level, with the understanding that they will support a particular candidate at the convention.
_	The two stores were opened in 2004 and later purchased by Dortch with the understanding that both would have to be moved.
_	This was introduced to the program on the suggestion of Dr Fidel Castro and based on the understanding that numbers are more familiar in everyday life to people who are illiterate.
_	A rumour was widely circulated at this time that the Chinese authorities, realising that they were powerless to prevent Taiwan and the Pescadores falling into the hands of Japan, had offered to cede them temporarily to Britain, presumably on the understanding that they would be returned at a later date.
_	Pope John XV agreed, with the understanding that Adalbert was free to leave Prague if he continued to encounter entrenched resistance.
_	Initially still reluctant, the museum's trustees decided in January 1982 that the museum would take over the site, on the understanding that the government would make the necessary resources available.
_	Denis signed the first Portuguese commercial agreement with England in 1308, and secured a contract in 1317 for the services of the Genoese merchant sailor Manuel Pessanha (Portuguese form of the Italian "Pezagno") as hereditary admiral of his fleet, with the understanding that Pessanha and his successors should provide twenty Genoese captains to command the king's galleys, thus effectively founding the Portuguese navy.
_	The insured person has full freedom of choice among the recognised healthcare providers competent to treat their condition (in his region) on the understanding that the costs are covered by the insurance up to the level of the official tariff.
_	One of the conditions of this alliance was that the rulers of Jodhpur and Jaipur should regain the privilege of marriage with the ruling Sesodia dynasty of Mewar, on the understanding that the offspring of Sisodia princesses should succeed to the throne over any other offspring.
_	The usual form of this agreement is that the solicitor will take a law case on the understanding that if lost, no payment is made.
_	Scott was initially unable to go with his wife, so she said goodbye to him, on the understanding that he would join her as soon as he could get a job transfer.
_	An interpretation of the New Testament is the understanding that there will be two resurrections.
_	Godfrey became the starting quarterback in the third game of the season against Buffalo, but with the understanding that he would still be splitting time with Rob Calabrese.
_	H. V. Morgan of Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, seeking a way to contribute to the U.S. war effort during World War I, contracted with the Herreshoff Manufacturing Company at Bristol, Rhode Island, for a steel-hulled motorboat built to a naval patrol boat design with the understanding that the U.S. Navy would purchase her after her completion.
_	The establishment of the group was finally approved in August 1939, with the understanding that the group would also assume the demonstration and exhibition function that was being carried out by combat units of Air Force Combat Command.
_	In other words, as the drafter of the Fiscal Agency Agreement, Argentina could have easily avoided the situation it found itself in by writing a different "pari passu" clause, omitting the transferability clause, including anti-assignment clauses (e.g., a clause providing that assignees could only recover the amount actually paid rather than face value of the debt), or writing the contract under the law of a different jurisdiction altogether, with the understanding that rational investors would have demanded higher interest rates in exchange for any of these things.
_	He arranges his own "capture" at the hands of Michael, with the understanding that Michael and Sonya will head up his organization while Michael continues the façade of working for the CIA.
_	It was impossible to secure suitable rooms for the size of the school, and for this reason, for a time, the school was limited to nearly one-half, consequently the patrons decided to build a model building, with the understanding that Rust should hire the building and carry on her school.
_	Saltykov presented the young officer at court on the understanding that Zubov would then help Saltykov in his feud with Catherine's long-standing favourite, Prince Potemkin.
_	The growing internationalization of the European Higher Education Area (EHEA) involves not only research and teaching, but also involves the understanding that excellent social and economic living conditions for all students is a precondition for successful learning.
_	The assembly and executive were eventually established in December 1999 on the understanding that decommissioning would begin immediately, but were suspended within two months due to lack of progress, before being re-established in May 2000 as Provisional IRA decommissioning eventually began.
_	He eventually obtained it only on the understanding that he never join in what was then known as a "Bullingdon blind", a euphemistic phrase for an evening of drink and song.
_	However this was on the understanding that Kemp would be open to challenges under the then normal process.
_	Shortly after he begins his journey to Texas with his trail hand Nadine Groot (Walter Brennan), Dunson learns that his love interest Fen (Coleen Gray), whom he had told to stay behind with the California-bound wagon train with the understanding that he would send for her later, was killed in an Indian attack.
_	Moved by the understanding that purity of German blood is the essential condition for the continued existence of the German people, and inspired by the inflexible determination to ensure the existence of the German nation for all time, the Reichstag has unanimously adopted the following law, which is promulgated herewith:
_	The tunnel was purchased by the University of Southampton for a minimal fee in 1979 on the understanding that they would cover the cost of transport and recommissioning at its new site on the Highfield Campus.
_	One paramount criticism of critical mass theory is its attention to numbers, and the understanding that quota women are to represent women collectively.
_	Harm reduction programs operate under the understanding that certain levels of drug use are inevitable and focus on minimizing adverse effects associated with drug use rather than stopping the behavior itself.
_	Only 13 of the children survived, and the understanding that Bleichrodt could not have known which passengers were on board the liner made little difference to his perceived culpability."
_	To simplify matters, the referents of "wa" and "ga" in this section are called the "topic" and "subject" respectively, with the understanding that if either is absent, the grammatical topic and subject may coincide.
_	Later work by Daisy Roulland-Dussoix and Werner Arber in 1962 and many other subsequent workers led to the understanding that restriction was due to attack and breakdown of the modified bacteriophage’s DNA by specific enzymes of the recipient bacteria.
_	In 2006 Barlett and Steele left "Time" and were hired by Vanity Fair to be contributing editors on the understanding that they would contribute two articles each year.
_	The latter ship was apparently named with the understanding that it was a Seneca word meaning "fearless".
_	The company agreed to loan its employees money to buy the stock on the understanding that they could repay the loans in installments subtracted from their paychecks.
_	Rather, with the understanding that each individual has a contribution to make to the construction of a more just and peaceful social order, these processes must be arranged in a way that permits each to play his or her rightful role as a productive member of society.
_	Horsfield, who lived in Kent, had signed to Watford on the understanding that he wouldn't be asked to move home so as to not interrupt his children's schooling.
_	Whilst found guilty, and usually expecting a death sentence, not only was Kinloch sentenced to life imprisonment instead, but two days after the judgement (17 July 1795) the accused was released into the care of a doctor (William Farquharson) on the understanding that Kinloch be kept in a secure environment (the doctor's own house).
_	Elizabeth Wydra, chief counsel of the Constitutional Accountability Center (a progressive think tank), argues that both supporters and opponents of the Citizenship Clause in 1866 shared the understanding that it would automatically grant citizenship to all persons born in the United States (except children of foreign ministers and invading armies)—an interpretation shared by Texas Solicitor General James C. Ho. Richard Aynes, dean of the University of Akron School of Law, takes a different view, proposing that the Citizenship Clause had "consequences which were unintended by the framers".
_	The council voted with the understanding that the current football practice field on land owned by the Central Illinois Regional Airport was in a Federal Aviation Agency restricted flight path zone and the school would have to move to another location in 2015.
_	The same four options were presented in 2018 by the federal government during its announcement of funds, on the understanding that a preliminary business case to be completed in September that year would recommend one of the options.
_	Desperate and hoping Louis has similar talents, Nessus recruits Louis with the understanding that his memory would be altered before his return to Known Space, he would be saved from the Civil War on Wunderland, well compensated and cured of his addiction.
_	With the permission of the land owners, surveys of the swamp are ongoing, with the understanding that, if the swamp habitat is compromised, the endemic Louisiana species will be wiped away.
_	At bachelor, master and doctorate level, tuition waivers are also made available, on the understanding that the scholarship recipients (known as 1848 scholars) will give back to the institution by assisting faculty or joining its outreach projects in Dublin city and beyond.
_	The Marines contacted Agriculture Department officials in Washington, D.C. who agreed to allow her off the ship after her blood was drawn for lab tests, with the understanding that if she had glanders or dourine, she would be destroyed or sent back to Japan.
_	He was accepted in the group as a senior in high school with the understanding that he would begin attending the University in the fall of 2004.
_	Examples are a "dine and dash" customer in a restaurant where the meal is supplied on the understanding that the bill will be paid before the diner leaves; a taxi passenger who runs off without paying the fare at the end of the journey; and a motorist who fills up with petrol at a garage and drives off when the attendant is distracted.
_	In 1968, the Republican Kirk "ran" with the understanding that he would complement a ticket headed by either Richard M. Nixon or Nelson A. Rockefeller.
_	In the intervening months the divided republican leaders unable to agree on a single leader, decided to compromise and in October offered Bolívar the military command, with the understanding that a separate civilian government would be formed.
_	With a committee of 30 potential subscribers, they agreed to seek a preliminary charter for a Greenville and Columbia Railroad, with the understanding that they raise at least $300,000 in subscriptions within a year.
_	Palevsky had pledged $1,000,000 to MOCA with the understanding that he would head the Architectural Committee.
_	More often than not, ACF will work closely with other environmental groups - large or small - on the understanding that more can be achieved through co-operation.
_	In the transcript (of Gentileschi's testimony at the trial, based on records preserved in an archive in Rome), Gentileschi describes the rape in graphic detail and states that Tassi continued to have sex with her... with the understanding that he would protect her honor by eventually wedding her...
_	Marie and Knut get married with the understanding that it will be an equal partnership.
_	WDAF turned its interests in "The Air Adventures of Jimmie Allen" at this point to Comer, with the understanding that locally the show must go on WDAF exclusively.
_	He went to the Cape of Good Hope in 1780, nominally as a gunner's mate for the Dutch East India Company, but almost certainly sponsored by the Treasurer-General, Jacob Temminck with the understanding that he would strengthen Temminck's collection.
_	During the second year of life, new emotions begin to emerge when children gain the understanding that they themselves are entities distinct from other people and begin to develop a sense of self.
_	They shared the understanding that Ilbe should be criticized by public argument, not by legal action.
_	Implicit in Britain's offer was the understanding that the Swan River Colony would not become a regular penal settlement, in which Britain retained responsibility for managing and funding the penal system.
_	Cheaper versions of durable goods are often marketed as staples with the understanding that they will wear out sooner than more expensive goods, but they are so cheap that the cost of regular replacement is easily affordable.
_	On July 28, 2010, the Council was awarded a $10,000 grant by the Port of Pittsburgh Commission on the understanding that it will be used to develop blueways and build bike and canoe racks at points in Rochester, Monaca, Bridgewater, and Ohioville.
_	Hibbert offered to release "Radio Free Europe" and "Sitting Still" as a one-off 7" vinyl single with the understanding that he would own the publishing rights for both songs; the band agreed to his terms.
_	Nic Shiubhlaigh wrote: "It was pointed out that the old Irish National Theatre Society had been founded in 1902 on the understanding that its independence as a national movement was to be secured only through the efforts of its members.
_	Even though women are still put down compared to men in certain situations or jobs the world has evolved to better the understanding that women are just as capable as men.
_	When Sallie died, she left $7,000 to Dickinson, with the understanding that upon her death, the remainder would be left to George.
_	France ceded to Canada perpetual use of a portion of land on Vimy Ridge on the understanding that Canada use the land to establish a battlefield park and memorial.
_	Castile take Tarifa from the Marinids on the understanding that the town would be traded to Granada, but Sancho (now Sancho IV) reneged on the promise.
_	After being detained and questioned, Burbridge and Davidson were released with the understanding that federal prosecutors would be reviewing the case and might yet file charges.
_	Cakobau, again in a difficult position, signed a document to cede the islands to Britain with the understanding that it would protect him from both the extortion of the US and the incursions of the Tongans.
_	The conference accepted the terms of the Mandate with reference to Palestine, on the understanding that there was inserted in the process-verbal a legal undertaking by the Mandatory Power that it would not involve the surrender of the rights hitherto enjoyed by the non-Jewish communities in Palestine.
_	In instances such as these, the board sets Adequate Intakes (AIs), with the understanding that at some later date, AIs will be replaced by more exact information.
_	Thankfully, Emma was brought onto the show with the understanding that she was only going to be in a certain number of episodes and she knew that she was going to die from the very beginning.
_	Subsequently, Cleo begs for him to return and he does so on the understanding that she will go along with what he wants.
_	The British war effort had received popular support within India and the act received support on the understanding that the measures enacted were necessary in the war-situation.
_	Then they combined with the Democrats and, on February 25, elected Call New York State Treasurer to fill Kennedy's unexpired term (98 votes for Call, 96 votes for the Republican candidate William Archer) with the understanding that the Democratic officials, including Deputy Treasurer George W. Batten would continue at their posts in the Treasury.
_	Bryan accepted, on the understanding that Darrow would in turn submit to questioning by Bryan.
_	Martin accepted the job on the understanding that he would decide which races the colt competed in.
_	Higgins sold the script with the understanding that he would direct the film but he was told he wasn't ready, after tests he shot proved unsatisfactory to the studio heads.
_	Although the protectorate had been proclaimed on the understanding that British South Africa Company would contribute to the costs of its administration, Johnson, refused to act as the company's agent and resisted its demand that the Crown lands forming about 20% of the protectorate should be transferred to company control and that Johnson should also facilitate the transfer of African lands, about 40% of total land, to it
_	With the understanding that the rise of the Soviet Union created a long-term threat, Huntington concluded that the liberal society of the United States would fail to create adequate military forces to ensure security over the long term.
_	The name is commonly interpreted as a theophoric name referring to the god Marduk with the understanding that it means "[servant/follower/devotee] of Marduk" in Aramaic.
_	Other works are displayed on long-term loan, many on the understanding that they will be donated to the gallery in due course.
_	An Education Commission was selected by the state convention to administer the schools, with the understanding that both would be succeeded by a more centrally located institution as soon as a suitable campus could be selected.
_	Massimo soon left town while Jackie became involved again with Eric but he left her to marry Stephanie as their daughter Felicia's dying wish with the understanding that after Felicia died Eric would marry Jackie.
_	A postal ballot of IOC members decided in February that SANOC had made sufficient progress in to be invited to the 1968 Games, on the understanding that remaining discrimination would be ended by the 1972 Games.
_	Frere accepted the position, on a salary double that of his predecessor, and on the understanding that successful implementation of confederation would result in him being appointed the first British Governor-General of a federated southern African dominion.
_	Mott sees this as a temporary but valuable break with social and professional convention—on the understanding that money, while ultimately necessary, distorts the relations between art and imagination, artist and public.
_	The demolition was well advanced when Sir Robert McDougal bought it for the Trust, on the understanding that the remaining parts (the entrance porch and hall, the Great Hall and the service wing) be used as an International Youth Hostel.
_	Due to the cost associated with purchasing two specialized aircraft, the air force selected Model 464-17 with the understanding that it could be adapted for nuclear strikes.
_	She is to be his nursemaid, with the understanding that she will be well cared for only as long as Martin senior lives.
_	The Central Vermont and the New Haven Railroad (which had bought the Shore Line in 1870) bought the east end of the Parade from New London for the unusually low price of $15,000, with the understanding that the railroads would build a structure more suitable for the bustling city.
_	He donated the house to Northwestern University in 1944 with the understanding that it be used as the home of the Evanston Historical Society, now known as the Evanston History Center.
_	He summons Vernon-Smith - whose millionaire father provides him with an over-generous allowance – and asks him to buy the provisions at the school shop, on the understanding that he will reimburse him the next day.
_	It was initially released in August 1987, with the understanding that Atkinson would give HyperCard to Apple only if the company promised to release it for free on all Macs.
_	George Harrison of the Beatles, a friend of Howard, was given a 10 per cent shareholding, on the understanding that his name could be used to attract publicity, and disc jockey Alan Freeman was also a stakeholder.
_	Chickasaw did separate from the Mobile County school system, effective in 2013, with the understanding that the elementary Chickasaw School of Mathematics and Science would be relocated from Chickasaw within four years.
_	In Vanuatu a "collective work" is a work created by 2 or more individuals at the initiative and under the direction of another person on the understanding that (a) the work will be disclosed by that other person under that person’s own name; and (b) the identity of the contributing individuals will not be indicated.
_	In 1927 Sugden was invited to deliver the annual Fernley lecture in England, and early in 1928 he was given leave of absence with the understanding that he would retire at the end of the year.
_	Amtrak introduced the route on the understanding that Ohio and New York would assume two-thirds of the cost of the train.
_	As a result, the electors who appeared on ballots were nominated by the state chapters of national parties with the understanding that they would cast their votes for their party's candidate if elected.
_	In 1872, he seriously considered tenanting the estate as a co-operative concern managed by labourers, on the understanding that the farm be sold after a ten-year period and the difference between the values determine the final division of profits.
_	The witches’ father recruits the captain as a special courier for the Empress, with the understanding that Goth accompany him because the witches have foreseen it.
_	Dr. Jaquith has allowed Charlotte to keep Tina there with the understanding that her relationship with Jerry will remain platonic.
_	An intensely witty and ingenious rogue in the best picaresque tradition, he contrives to spin everyone around his finger throughout the narrative and ends by getting Severino to order his side-kick to shoot him dead so that he can meet his revered saint in heaven for some minutes on the understanding that a miraculous harmonica which João has ingeniously convinced him possesses the power of bringing the dead back to life—in this case Chicó rigged up with a little balloon of blood—will effect his speedy resurrection.
_	These facilities shall cover the use of the roads, railways, waterways, ports and aerodromes of 'Iraq, and His Britannic Majesty's ships shall have general permission to visit the Shatt-al-Arab on the understanding that His Majesty the King of 'Iraq is given prior notification of visits to 'Iraq ports.
_	Lope's boss at "Globo" said that Lopes was working on a story about sexual exploitation at the baile funk, with the understanding that Lopes would have tried to obtain footage at the baile funk had he not been accosted relatively early in the night.
_	Leave yourself always to be guided and directed by the understanding that comes from above, and that ought to hold the reins.<br>
_	Foundational to Nero's argument is the understanding that men have the authority to exchange women among one another in order to form a "homosocial contract".
_	With the understanding that there was a great need for more skilled doctors in Utah, she wanted to make a difference and help relieve suffering and pain whenever possible.
_	But, in his critique, he had claimed that causality is a category of the understanding that can only be applied to phenomena.
_	When Albert Ogilvie died suddenly in 1939, 68-year-old Edmund Dwyer-Gray was elected Labor leader (and thus premier) with the understanding that he would retire after six months in office.
_	Some witnesses said that Lennon and Harrison's departure was in reaction to the Maharishi's alleged sexual impropriety towards some of his female students; others cited the arrival of Lutes, accompanied by a film crew to film the planned documentary, after he had signed a contract with Four Star Television on the understanding that the Beatles would appear in the production.
_	He used color film from Ansco on the understanding that if the results were unsatisfactory the company could have the film back.
_	This component relates to the understanding that letters are different from each other, knowing their names and sounds, and recognizing letters everywhere.
_	The sale was completed on 16 March 1886, on the understanding that the £600 price would be distributed to the shareholders.
_	Chests of opium were sold in auctions in Calcutta with the understanding that the independent purchasers would then smuggle it into China.
_	Two candidates were "nominated by the Nukufetau community with a strong Opposition backing", with the understanding that one or the other would withdraw.
_	As an example, scientific "truths" are considered objective, but are held tentatively, with the understanding that more careful evidence and/or wider experience might change matters.
_	This notation is based on the understanding that whenever a term in an expression contains a repeated index letter, the default interpretation is that the product is summed over all permitted values of the index.
_	In 1747 the Admiralty restored an element of merit selection to this process by introducing the concept of "yellow admirals" (formally known as granting an officer the position of 'Rear-Admiral without distinction of squadron'), being captains promoted to flag rank on the understanding that they would immediately retire on half-pay.
_	Fuhrman was working as a consultant for McKinny, under the understanding that he would be paid $10,000 if a movie were produced.
_	In his 15 years at the helm of Hampshire, Prince worked to broaden the public's awareness of the value and role of liberal arts education, reinforcing the understanding that the liberal arts are about developing an attitude of mind, not simply conveying a body of knowledge.
_	In order to 'preserve the peace of the county', Pryse then withdrew on the understanding that Powell would support his candidature when a vacancy arose in Cardigan Boroughs.
_	Beginning with the December 4, 1890, issue, "The Dawn" was relinquished as the Society's periodical and became the private property of Bliss, with the understanding that a regular page would be devoted to the progress of the SCS.
_	American Indians, primarily Delawares and Shawnee, made this agreement with the understanding that the British military would leave the area after the war.
_	The regiment formally entered British service, with the understanding that the British would enroll them at the same rate as regular British soldiers and give them the back pay owed by the VOC.
_	Upon Hones' request, Harrigan permitted him to borrow his prototype with the understanding that they were entering into a business arrangement.
_	U.S. Navy vessels using the Army Pier do so with the understanding that the pier might have to be vacated with little notice when fuel handling evolutions are scheduled or at the request of the U.S. Army Harbor Master.
_	We made a deal from the very beginning — everybody sort of shook hands with the understanding that there were going to be no boundaries on this thing.
_	He appears to be propositioning the orderly; when his advances are effectively rebuffed he dismisses the orderly from the room, with the understanding that he will not press the issue.
_	It was a financially successful venture and in March 1898 Marks floated the company on the stock market, with the understanding that he would continue as editor.
_	Its lacked sufficient land to support its growing population and many farming families took up Governor Lawrence’s offer, with the understanding that they could maintain religious freedom and elected representation.
_	In 1978, no longer able to subsidize the artistic, educational, and scientific activity on the island, and eschewing lucrative offers of resort development, Mrs. West and her brother's children chose to sell the island to the State of Georgia as a Heritage Preserve with the understanding that Ossabaw would "be used for natural, scientific and cultural study, research and education, and environmentally sound preservation, conservation and management of the Island's ecosystem."
_	Their grants were originally obtained from the Darbar on the understanding that they kept the peace among the Bhils and other wild hill tribes.
_	Judging the business of catering to be beneath them, the family only gave their support to Montague on the understanding that the family name would not be used.
_	Paul Sumner resigned with the understanding that he would be known as the "Co-Founder of Upper Deck", something that the company's owner and CEO, Richard McWilliam, recognized until McWilliam's death in 2013, of alcohol poisoning.
_	This theory correlates with the understanding that macroband rituals of the Archaic period were “ad hoc,” meaning that they were not associated with dates or times but performed when there was the largest amount of people possibly present.
_	Finally, on the evening of 19 February 1802, a mob assembled and raided the castle of La Sarraz, seizing and burning the archives listing the taxes due for the surrounding area, on the understanding that no taxes could be levied without the documents establishing what was due and by whom.
_	It also emphasizes the distinctive nature of the roles women play in the maintenance and development of their societies, with the understanding that purely the integration of women into development efforts would serve to reinforce the existing structures of inequality present in societies overrun by patriarchal interests.
_	When a landowner left England to fight in the Crusades, he conveyed ownership of his lands in his absence to manage the estate and pay and receive feudal dues, on the understanding that the ownership would be conveyed back on his return.
_	In 1737, the Duchy was given to Stanisław Leszczyński, the former king of Poland, who had lost his throne as a result of the War of the Polish Succession, with the understanding that it would fall to the French crown on his death.
_	This led to the understanding that stimulation of the 5-HT receptors could regulate manic-depressive conditions in a manner similar to mood stabilizers.
_	The C-in-C, Admiral David Beatty, concurred; he had only consented to the design on the understanding that they would be employed at Harwich or Dover, while the Grand Fleet got W-class ships with six 21-inch torpedo tubes.
_	Subsequently, the organisation developed a coded warning system which was used until the 1960s whereby a patrolman would always salute the driver of a passing car which showed a visible AA Badge unless there was a speed trap nearby, on the understanding that their officers could not be prosecuted for failing to salute.
_	A cornerstone of this theoretical framework is the understanding that individual differences in executive functions reflect both unity (i.e., common EF skills) and diversity of each component (e.g., shifting-specific).
_	When USS "Rogers Blood" was decommissioned, her ship's bell was loaned to Manchester Central High School by the U.S. Department of the Navy with the understanding that it would be kept on permanent display at the school in a place of prominence.
_	MacInnes was left £160,000 and the estate on the understanding that he would use Head's coat of arms and the surname "Head".
_	He had taken his perpetual vows as a scholastic on 15 August 1865 on the understanding that he would be allowed to study for the priesthood.
_	In 1902 Andrew Carnegie donated $60,000 for a new granite building with the understanding that the city would fund staff, books, and materials.
_	(The Twin Courier met FAA requirements marginally and was certificated to meet immediate needs for service in Vietnam, on the understanding that the design would not be marketed commercially.
_	In partial satisfaction of the requirements of the McKinney–Vento Homeless Assistance Act, when the Long Beach Naval Shipyard was closed, the BRAC deeded the Cabrillo and Savannah Navy Housing sites to the City of Long Beach, with the understanding that the property would then be transferred to Century Housing for development of housing to assist the homeless, and to the California State University, Long Beach Foundation (CSULB Foundation)
_	In 1816, Pryse Pryse of Gogerddan withdrew from a contest for the Cardiganshire county constituency on the understanding that he would receive support s a candidate for the boroughs seat at the next election.
_	That same month of December 2009, the NHL discussed the purchase of the Coyotes with True North Sports and Entertainment (TNSE), owners of the Winnipeg-based Manitoba Moose, as a back-up plan to move the team to Winnipeg with the understanding that the NHL would make all possible efforts to keep the team in Glendale.
_	Research in this area is focused on how humans develop the understanding that eye gaze indicates that the observer may be psychologically connected to the referent.
_	Accounts say that James surrendered with the understanding that he would not be extradited to Northfield, Minnesota.
_	The initial purpose of the plan was to have all accepted students enroll with the understanding that they would spend three months, June to August, at the Camp so that their suitability to continue at New College could be determined.
_	This ended with the 1558 Elizabethan Settlement, which developed the understanding that the church was to be "both Catholic and Reformed".
_	Beauregard is abducted by an old enemy, a Tong leader who calls a truce on the understanding that Beauregard will collaborate in finding the killer.
_	It was reported at the time that Carlisle dropped out with the understanding that Cleveland, once nominated, would appoint him to his Cabinet.
_	J.J. and Myrtle (Funk) Oller eldest child, Rello Oller (1895-1992), never married and in 1990 she leased the house to the Society for U.S. $1.00 a year with the understanding that on her death the property would inure to the Society.
_	This reasoning was reached through the understanding that slate was previously used among Inuit and was replaced by copper at a later time than the advent of when indigenous communities began to use it.
_	Though baby farmers were paid in the understanding that care would be provided, the term "baby farmer" was used as an insult, and improper treatment was usually implied.
_	Do 24s were delivered to Spain with the understanding that they would assist downed airmen of both sides.
_	The SD, which organized the Einsatzgruppen, conducted itself in accordance with the understanding that a fundamental order, sometimes called the Führer Order ("Führerbefehl") existed to kill the Jews.
_	The 18 players who signed new contracts in the summer did so on the understanding that Ryder would be the club's owner, and so when told that they had to sign revised contracts that offered less security they sought the advice of the Professional Footballers' Association – they technically remained free agents, free to join another club, until either they agreed to the revised contracts or until Ryder completed his takeover.
_	Part of the teaching of "mutuality" is the understanding that the way that teachings and transmission are "drawn out" or generated from all teachers (including Bonder) is through their personal interactions with students and fellow teachers.
_	After visiting, he confessed his inability, on account of his ignorance of Gaelic, to carry out his duties; but on the understanding that he was not to be in charge of Gaelic-speaking churches, he accepted a renewal.
_	His goal was to bring people around to the understanding that humans "are only a part of nature, a portion of a vast ecosystem."
_	In 1891, the British Central Africa Protectorate was proclaimed on the understanding that the BSAC would contribute to the costs of its administration.
_	He did agree, however, to make the published full score "less bulky" by presenting the amateur forces of recorders, ripieno strings and percussion in the form of short score, on the understanding that full scores for those groups would be available to hire for rehearsal and performance purposes.
_	They are unified by their shared search for spiritual growth and by the understanding that an individual's theology is a result of that search and not obedience to an authoritarian requirement.
_	Even more sensational was the claim by Genovese underboss Willie Moretti, who ran gambling rings in Bergen County, that he had paid $286,000 to a New Jersey State House aide with the understanding that $190,000 of it would go to Governor Driscoll for protection from the state.
_	Originally discovered by John Cairns, it led to the understanding that (in this case) bidirectional DNA replication could take place.
_	On 9 March 1580 he became administrator of the Diocese of Toul, with the understanding that he would become its bishop upon reaching the canonical age of 27.
_	Object permanence is the understanding that objects continue to exist even when they cannot be perceived (seen, heard, touched, smelled or sensed in any way).
_	A 2007 review of "Villa of Mysteries" for the Spanish newspaper El Pais emphasized that it is “not a work of philology or history” but rather a “very Jungian” volume that seems to interpret not just a particular set of frescoes in a particular city but to expand its analysis to all of Roman culture on the understanding that what happened in Pompeii also happened elsewhere in the Empire.
_	He returned that night with Gen. Ángeles and a train-load of arms, ammunition and some men, and with the understanding that General Ángeles would be placed in command of the capital army.
_	Soon the two made a deal, however, with Pacheco elevating Arce to the vice-presidency with the understanding that he (Pacheco) would support Arce in the 1888 elections.
_	Treaties are agreements between two sovereign governments, and, therefore, the treaties made were made under the understanding that the tribes had equal sovereignty to the sovereignty of the colonial governments.
_	These attacks undoubtedly took their toll, and it is believed he exchanged the Recordership for the position of Chief Justice on the understanding that the more senior position would in practice be less onerous than the Recordership.
_	Even though the majority of the partners want to fire Jimmy for cause, Cliff decides to give him a second chance with the understanding that he'll be under a great deal of scrutiny going forward.
_	Yale settled the federal complaint in June 2012, acknowledging "inadequacies" but not facing "disciplinary action with the understanding that it keeps in place policy changes instituted after the complaint was filed.
_	He put his team together in just 32 days, acquiring players with the understanding that there would be no pay this year.
_	F-Gen was developed to create a larger number of supported games and applications for the Novint Falcon with the understanding that the control and forces for many interactions in games/apps could be implemented without source code access.
_	In 1925, the city sold municipal bonds with the understanding that some of the funds would build a library, but the funding was put to other uses.
_	He remains the only premier of Western Australia to have governed from the Legislative Council, having done so on the understanding that an Assembly seat would be found for him.
_	He initially had reservations, being surprised that Serj Tankian of System of a Down was not asked to write the song, as Tankian was working on the movie itself, and had been quite outspoken about the genocide in the past, though with introspection and discussions with the production staff, he came to the understanding that he was a good combination of being neither too close, nor too far removed from the subject.
_	In such cases, interface-capturing techniques, which do not normally require costly mesh update steps, could be used with the understanding that the interface will not be represented as accurately as we would have with an interface-tracking technique.
_	Nick Cristiano of "The Philadelphia Inquirer" gave the album a three and a half star rating and wrote, "The only real misfire is "I Found It in You," the kind of generic power ballad that throws the power and beauty of the rest of Call Me Crazy into even greater relief" Dave Heaton of "PopMatters" gave the album a rating of 7 and wrote, "Call Me Crazy is best when Womack conveys the understanding that we’re all sinners, when musically she doesn’t try too hard to isolate herself from the sins.
_	Ferraro, along with colleagues from Deutsche Bank and Citibank, had prepared the latest debt swap proposal 2009 “without compensation,” but with the understanding that they would eventually receive the customary commissions.
_	Frith also composed the suite in a way that the music could be improvised: "The determining factor was the understanding that Rova wanted material which they could transform through improvisation.
_	With the understanding that as the overstaffing increases, the amount of individual responsibility decreases, we can see other sorts of group dynamic processes that could take effect such as social loafing.
_	This idea was later discredited and dropped within NLP by the early 1980s, in favor of the understanding that most people use all of their senses (whether consciously or unconsciously), and that whilst one system may seem to dominate, this is often contextualized - globally there is a balance that dynamically varies according to circumstance and mood.
_	When a gang of Jed Clayton's men meet the mayor in the town saloon to extort supplies from the town (an arrangement that the mayor allows on the understanding that the gang will do no harm to the town or its citizens), Boss and Amos kill one gang member and arrest two more - with one prisoner being killed as he attempts to escape town assisted by the mayor.
_	Equivalent definitions will be introduced only for the right-hand version, with the understanding that the left-hand analogues are also true.
_	From the very beginning Brady determined to accumulate as many war views as possible, with the understanding that in the not too distant future a photomechanical means of reproduction would be possible.
_	An assembly of chiefs was held near the Mission House at Hihifo, to discuss the matter; and in the end Tubou yielded on the understanding that, if he abandoned the lotu, he should be elevated to the royal dignity of Tui Kanokubolu, which made him supreme in the land.
_	As the case proceeded, the Army allowed Watkins to reenlist for another 6 years with the understanding that he would be separated from the military if the District Court's decision was not upheld.
_	The recommendation of the Secretary-General that ONUMOZ should chair the Joint Commission for the Formation of the Mozambican Defence Force was approved, urging co-operation by RENAMO and on the understanding that it would not entail any obligation on the part of the United Nations for training or establishing the new armed forces.
_	The lower layer improved on Roman practice in that it was based on the understanding that the purpose of this layer (the sub-base or base course) is to transfer the weight of the road and its traffic to the ground, while protecting the ground from deformation by spreading the weight evenly.
_	Following negotiations with the Social Democratic and Labour Party (SDLP) and secret talks with British civil servants, the IRA ultimately called a ceasefire in 1994 on the understanding that Sinn Féin would be included in political talks for a settlement.
_	By his own admission, Esdaile had never seen a mesmeric act; but, given the level of pain of this specific patient, and the understanding that he had gained from what he had read, it occurred to him that mesmerism might be of great value:
_	Ware began with an agreement with France to build joint British and French cemeteries under the understanding that these would be maintained by the French government.
_	The feature of these like-minded theological accounts that has garnered the most attention is the understanding that in sharing the one power of God, the Father and Son must share the same nature.
_	Such values shape organizational cultures and ground CSR as an economic and moral initiative, founded on the understanding that an organization aspires to be a ‘good corporate citizen’.
_	The Citizens' Memorial Hall Committee purchased land for the hall in 1919 in Ruthven Street for ₤500, on the understanding that the Town Council acquired adjoining land at the corner of Herries Street.
_	He offered his collection of 300 artworks, described as "one of the most important collections of contemporary Australian art" on the understanding that an art museum would be built to house both his and Hinton's collections.
_	Mr. Tonsler had his older students stay after school to study more advanced texts with the understanding that the books were to be hidden whenever the white Superintendent appeared for an inspection.
_	A player can concede with the understanding that the opponent will share the prize equally with him or her.
_	In order to expedite the eventual order, the NFA project office started negotiating contracts with both companies with the understanding that one would be selected once a final decision had been made.
_	He was instrumental in getting government backing for its completion on the understanding that the FR and the WHR would be jointly managed from Porthmadog, with maintenance undertaken at Boston Lodge and with other economies of scale.
_	This was done at the University's expense, and on the understanding that the two telescopes were on mutual loan.
_	Others, including the Vilna Gaon, have the understanding that the Talmud's timeframe for dawn was referring specifically to an equinox day in Mesopotamia, and is therefore teaching that dawn should be calculated daily as commencing when the sun is 16.1 degrees below the horizon.
_	For example, the understanding that deviant behaviour like stealing may be learned behaviour resulting from reinforcers like hunger satisfaction that are unrelated to criminal behaviour can aid the development of social controls that address this underlying issue rather than merely the resultant behaviour.
_	He sponsored him with about £10,000 to fund his development in the game, on the understanding that the cash would be repaid.
_	This threat was never carried out with the understanding that all future television deals would be negotiated collectively.
_	Pierce allowed his supporters to lobby for him, with the understanding that his name would not be entered at the convention unless it was clear none of the front-runners could win.
_	Since Nez Percés custom dictated that no single chief spoke for all others, when Joseph and others (including Toohoolhoolzote and Looking Glass) refused to sign the treaty, it was done so with the understanding that the U.S. Government was still bound by their original agreement, and that only Lawyer's band would be bound by the new treaty that only they signed.
_	McEwen was sworn in as Prime Minister on the understanding that his commission would continue only so long as it took for the Liberals to elect a new leader.
_	The public allows the police to use force on the understanding that someone will be held to account if something goes wrong.
_	Under the terms of this new bond Lord Mansfield agreed to advance half the sum to William France on the understanding that it would be refunded if Chippendale defaulted.
_	Discussions took place and Mr Chris Cadbury, who was President of the Association reluctantly agreed on the understanding that they became a Community Association.
_	According to McGonigal, "[t]he old understanding of stress as an unhelpful relic of our animal instincts is being replaced by the understanding that stress actually makes us socially smart – it's what allows us to be fully human."
_	"Bayʿah" is sometimes taken under a written pact given on behalf of the subjects by leading members of the tribe with the understanding that as long as the leader abides by certain requirements towards his people, they are to maintain their allegiance to him.
_	When Geoff is forced to ground the Kid because of failing eyesight, he is short on pilots and offers to hire MacPherson on the understanding that he will fly the most dangerous assignments.
_	Control of the seminary then passed to the synod, having been relinquished by the Trinity congregation, with the understanding that the school be moved to St. Louis.
_	He was a member of the aristocratic Immedinger family and was granted his see on the understanding that his property would pass to the diocese on his death.
_	They were also booked to play Reading Festival on the understanding that they would change their name.
_	For the convenience of the residents, a register was kept of their individual postage accounts on the understanding that all postage due would be regularly settled every month.
_	In 1912 a successful miner called Billy O’Connell purchased the establishment and obtained a hotel licence on the understanding that the main road would pass the building.
_	Mark Curtis writes that the UK also reportedly provided military assistance on the ‘neutralisation of the rebel airstrips’, with the understanding that their destruction would put them out of use for daylight humanitarian relief flights.
_	Thus, when the gender binaries of male and female in the U.S. constitute half of the entire workforce respectively, the females that receive unequal treatment have the ability to speak out against the cause with the understanding that a high proportion of the public backs them.
_	The disciple is asked to enter into a series of vows and commitments that ensure the maintenance of the spiritual link with the understanding that to break this link is a serious downfall.
_	On January 18 the CU voted down a motion seeking to the curb of advertisements for alcohol with the understanding that this issue was already part of the formation negotiations.
_	(Landsmanshaftn frequently admitted only men as members, with the understanding that their wives and children were covered by their membership and received equivalent benefits, or had a ladies' auxiliary group for women).
_	In 1869, the daimyo of Satsuma and Chōshū agreed to make a formal declaration of returning their land and population registers to the emperor, with the understanding that he would then confirm their holdings as governors.
_	The general court, where Cotton Mather played an active role, could have made Phips free with the understanding that Cotton Mather would add him to the rolls of the North church.
_	The French scientist Jean-Antoine Chaptal popularized the understanding that Champagne sparkled because it was sealed in a bottle before fermentation was complete.
_	Object permanence is the understanding that an object continues to exist, even when one cannot see it or touch it.
_	In rare circumstances, standards covered by a patent may be adopted, but only on the understanding that the patent owner will not enforce such patent rights or, at a minimum, that the patent owner will provide a reasonable and non-discriminatory license to the patented technology.
_	With the belief that injustice anywhere is a threat to justice everywhere, and the understanding that women’s issues are linked to many broader problems of social justice, Salam believes that human rights for all are indivisible and she works hard to give active support to the common cause of equity for all, especially those who suffer discrimination and deprivation.
_	McMahon returned to Mississippi State in 1994 to serve as Associate Head Coach under legendary MSU Head Coach Ron Polk with the understanding that he would become the head coach when Polk retired.
_	Audience reception is important within critical media literacy because it offers the understanding that the audience will take in various forms of media and make meaning of them.
_	Stalin, who touched on it in replying to the debate on the Central Committee's political activity, declared in favour of Lenin appearing in court, on the understanding that Lenin's personal safety would be guaranteed and the trial conducted on democratic lines.
_	In 987 they entered into secret negotiations with their former enemy, Skleros, on the understanding that the empire would be partitioned if they succeeded in their revolt against the emperors.
_	Holub had "buried his 28th gang member" before he implemented the Homeboyz plan, with the understanding that "nothing stops a bullet like a job."
_	If platlet transfusions are needed urgently, incompatible platelets may be used, with the understanding that they may be less effective and that the administration of any blood product carries risk.
_	In July 1846, Colonel Jonathan D. Stevenson of New York was asked to raise a volunteer regiment of ten companies of 77 men each to go to California with the understanding that they would muster out and stay in California.
_	While fighting the bankruptcy challenge in court Rudy launched a lawsuit against the legal team with the understanding that any settlement would go to pay the debtors who lost money due to PlanetHospital's surrogacy disaster.
_	As part of DC's "One Year Later" storyline, Bullock has returned to the GCPD, with the understanding that he is not allowed a single mistake.
_	The Minnesota banks were sold to First Bank System while the Chicago bank was sold to a lawyer with the understanding that Banc One wanted the Chicago bank back as soon as the Illinois banking laws would permit ownership by Ohio-based companies, which eventually became December 1990.
_	This form of noise is called additive noise, with the understanding that the noise can be negative or positive at different instants of time.
_	The announcement of the removal of the offline mode on 14 November 2014 was met by a number of complaints from customers, with some saying they had backed the game on the understanding that it would feature offline play and others that there had been no prior warning of removal during the whole of the preceding development period.
_	The suggestion was controversial, since local residents argued that the mansion was sold at a reduced price on the understanding that it would be open to the public.
_	Linzee claimed that he had been given inaccurate information on the strength of the fortifications by Corsican informants and that he had only ordered the attack on the understanding that it would be supported by an attack from the land by the Corsican irregular forces which never materialised.
_	The British and French agreed to abide by the request, with the British reply undertaking to "confine bombardment to strictly military objectives upon the understanding that these same rules of warfare will be scrupulously observed by all their opponents".
_	With the understanding that a user will not always
_	This time the priory was restored only on the understanding that it would pay the Crown 55 marks per annum.
_	Lady Montgomery, who was alleged to have signaled the murderers by placing a white 'napkin' on a window sill, is said to have escaped and lived with her retainer Robert Kerr at Pearce Bank (now High Peacockbank) for several years until the 'hue and cry' died down at which point she returned to the castle and was not molested on the understanding that she did not 'show her face' outside of the grounds.
_	It was agreed that Sibylla would be crowned only after she had divorced Guy; in return she insisted on choosing her new husband for herself, with the understanding that the husband she chose would become king.
_	Although the scope of ATS is not limited to violations of international law recognized in the 18th century, with respect to recognizing contemporary international norms, the court's opinion stated that "the judicial power should be exercised on the understanding that the door is still ajar subject to vigilant doorkeeping."
_	The Chinese legal code has no explicit provision for exile, but often dissidents are released on the grounds that they need to be treated for a medical condition in another country, and with the understanding that they will be reincarcerated if they return to China.
_	Shares were put on sale to finance this project and many people from Benrath bought these shares on the understanding that Benrath would have a station on the new line.
_	When Saiad Sultan fell out with his brother, the ruler of Muscat, and asked for help, Mir Noori Naseer Khan handed over Gwadar, as part of his share of revenues, to Saiad Sultan for his maintenance with the understanding that the area be returned to Kalat, when Saiad Sultan acquires the throne.
_	In other countries the law and the courts may apply a different approach allowing, for example, the design of a useful device to be registered (as a whole) as an industrial design on the understanding that, in case of unauthorized copying, only the non-functional features may be claimed under design law whereas any technical features could only be claimed if covered by a valid patent.
_	IgNAR is believed to have never had an associated light chain, contrary to the understanding that the heavy-chain-only antibodies in camelids may have lost its light chain partner through evolution.
_	Euler had pioneered the use of complex exponents in solutions of ordinary differential equations, on the understanding that the "real part" of the solution was the relevant part.
_	In 1978, the United States International Communication Agency (USICA) absorbed the bureau with the understanding that USICA was in charge of United States public diplomacy.
_	He returned to the Chatswood party in the early hours of the morning but left again, with the understanding that Dr. Bogle would drive Mrs. Chandler home.
_	The Pentagon in 1994 also allowed the West German Leopard 2 to be tested again the American winner at Aberdeen with the understanding that the better tank would be adopted by both countries.
_	Later in life, he had difficulty keeping up with the physical demands of his work and Robert Young assumed his duties without pay with the understanding that he would be granted the post after Raby died.
_	Holmes, who was once involved in a shotgun standoff with police after an incidence of acute paranoid psychosis, was traded for on the understanding that his personal problems were behind him.
_	First the Lyrans and Klingons attack the Kzinti Hegemony, then the Hydrans attack them, with the understanding that they are the next target of the Lyran-Klingon Coalition.
_	The monument was designed by New York artist Deborah Jackson, with the understanding that the design had to be approved by both the Secretary of the Army and the United States Commission of Fine Arts (which met in June 2011) after which time fabrication of the monument plaque began.
_	Donors lack the understanding that effort should be focused on broader measures that affect general well being of the population, and substantial change will take generations to achieve.
_	Based on the understanding that performing arts are audience-oriented and must continuously adapt to the socio-cultural landscape of their patronage.
_	The Mahoning County commissioners issued bonds to pay for the parkland, and Rogers purchased $25,000 of them, with the understanding that they would be the last ones paid.
_	Articles of partnership is a voluntary contract between/among two or more persons to place their capital, labor, and skills into business, with the understanding that there will be a sharing of the profits and losses between/among partners.
_	For example, the United Kingdom ratified the convention on the understanding that it would be applied with reference to "racial groups" within the meaning of Section 3(1) of the Race Relations Act 1976.
_	The group action may be expressed by Möbius transformations, (also called linear fractional transformations), with the understanding that when the denominator of the linear fractional transformation is 0, the image is ∞.
_	One of the major uses of CLV is customer segmentation, which starts with the understanding that not all customers are equally important.
_	Guilt can also be remedied through intellectualisation or cognition (the understanding that the source of the guilty feelings was illogical or irrelevant).
_	Members of the Dylan family, with the exception of Jakob Dylan, were interviewed by Sounes on the understanding that they would not be named and only be identified as "a member of the Dylan family."
_	The curtain falls as they drink a toast to the absent parents, recognizing the understanding that they have yet to develop.
_	He was first induced formally to resign his claims to the throne, on the understanding that he was to be compensated with the crown of Bosnia.
_	He was relegated the office of Governor of Manu'a for the term of life and the understanding that the Tui Manu'a title would follow him to the grave.
_	In 1990, the congregation established a policy which allowed individual Sisters to consider non-violent civil resistance, with the understanding that they were acting as private individuals and without any financial support by the congregation.
_	Where an author suggests that, "[P]aperwork is a necessary evil, despised but handled with the understanding that a mistake – even a trivial one – could be costly."
_	He had, however, scarcely reached England before a change of government led to the offer of another term, on the understanding that he abandon schemes for the federation of South Africa and, in future obey his instructions.
_	The proposed village population was too small to meet incorporation requirements, so area farmers were included in the village with the understanding that, once incorporation was successful, their farms would be disconnected.
_	A reading of this document can result in the understanding that the IAEA is able to prevent the WHO from conducting research or work on some areas, as seen hereafter.
_	After the "Great Disappointment" when Christ did not come, those who awaited Christ further studied the prophecies and reached the understanding that the event reached in time prophecy was actually the cleansing of the "heavenly" sanctuary.
_	In 1996, the Linux magazine, "Linux Gazette", which was at the time managed by creator John M. Fisk, was transferred to SSC (under Phil Hughes) on the understanding that the publication would continue to be open, free and non-commercial.
_	The monks of Ealing accept clerical and lay men as guests in the monastery, on the understanding that guests will attend morning mass and evening vespers with the monks.
_	Metalinguistic awareness refers to the understanding that language is a system of communication, bound to rules, and forms the basis for the ability to discuss different ways to use language (Baten, Hofman, & Loeys, 2011).
_	Despite this, Jerusha encourages him, and he finally proposes and she accepts, with the understanding that they will both be going on mission to Hawaii.
_	She also has a brief romance with film director Luke Scott, who offers the part of Anita Pallenberg in a film about the early history of The Rolling Stones, with the understanding that the schedule would be compatible with her primary TV job.
_	In medicine, heroic treatment or course of therapy is one which possesses a high risk of causing further damage to a patient's health, but is undertaken as a last resort with the understanding that any lesser treatment will surely result in failure.
_	These were then distributed to the press on the understanding that they would be returned within forty-eight hours.
_	Sometimes, particularly in general or informal discussions (such as below), one may drop reference to the basepoint, with the understanding that the definition is good up to conjugation.
_	"Coven" was largely funded by Mark's uncle Bill Borchardt's savings with the understanding that Mark must sell 3,000 copies in order for Bill to make his money back.
_	Ten days later, Progressive Homer D. Call was elected by the Progressive and Democratic members of the New York State Legislature to fill Kennedy's unexpired term with the understanding that Batten and all other Democratic officials continue on their posts at the Treasury.
_	In April 1922 the bishop traveled there and held two weeks of consultations with Martin, Roynane and another missioner, during which the Rule and Constitutions of a new congregation were hammered out, with the understanding that Martin would be the foundress.
_	He was given the private server location and password for the unfinished HarvardConnection website and code, with the understanding that he would finish the programming necessary for launch.
_	Tremaine died on October 12, 1941, and O'Leary was appointed on October 17 with the understanding that he was nominated to run on the Democratic and American Labor tickets at a special election for Comptroller in November, but on October 27 the New York Court of Appeals ruled that no such special election is to be held and O'Leary continued in office until the end of 1942.
_	Any customer who opted to keep theirs was required to sign a waiver with the understanding that no more software would be written for the system and absolved Mattel of any future responsibility for technical support.
_	His mother's ancestor John Evelyn had given the Royal Navy his sixteen-acre (6.5 ha) estate Sayes Court in Deptford, South London to build their dockyards with the understanding that, if the Navy ever discontinued use of the site, the land would revert to his heirs.
_	The building was built and paid for by the Scouts, and turned over to the city with the understanding that the Scouts would be allowed to remain in it rent-free "in perpetuity."
_	The episode ends with Stella and Rob heading into a nearby town with the understanding that Taggart would call upon Stella for possible courtship, even though Crawford was fifteen years Forbes' senior.
_	They were then sent to Westminster School, with the understanding that their religion was not to be interfered with.
_	For example, sharing your medical data with your doctor under the understanding that it will be used to improve your health is ethically sound, even when the doctor reveals that data to another doctor.
_	Jones' original bill requested $400,000, but at the request of the Governor and Treasury officials, he changed his request to $250,000, with the understanding that any additional money would be provided during the next legislative session.
_	The French and the British agreed to abide by the request, with the provision that this was "upon the understanding that these same rules of warfare will be scrupulously observed by all of their opponents".
_	In 1967, Nina Popova, another alumna of Ballet Russe de Monte Carlo, was selected as the Foundation’s next Artistic Director with the understanding that she was to create a company of professional dancers.
_	Moreover, the Supreme Court, when judging the Special Appeal 109631-9, has also entered the understanding that when recognized to apply the Article 50 of the Civil Code to the decisions issued by the original court they may not be reviewed by that court, according to the prohibition imposed by Precedent 5 and 7 of that court.
_	In "Plyler v. Doe" (1982), where the Court held that aliens illegally present in a state are "within its jurisdiction" and may thus raise equal protection claims the Court explicated the meaning of the phrase "within its jurisdiction" as follows: "[U]se of the phrase "within its jurisdiction" confirms the understanding that the Fourteenth Amendment's protection extends to anyone, citizen or stranger, who is subject to the laws of a State, and reaches into every corner of a State's territory."
_	Because the Gulf of Mexico is a large marine ecosystem where there are no political boundaries to waters and biota, HRI encourages a tri-national responsibility between the United States, Mexico and Cuba in preserving the Gulf’s ecosystem; ensuring its economic and ecological sustainability; and promoting the understanding that people and the environment are inexorably linked.
_	After Bob's death in 1997, Bob's son donated it to a tractor enthusiast to have during his lifetime with the understanding that it would be returned to Bob's son when the man died.
_	Since any two affine spaces of the same dimension are isomorphic, in some situations it is appropriate to identify them with formula_1, with the understanding that only affinely-invariant notions are ultimately meaningful.
_	The unveiling of the 25 at Zandvoort in 1962 was a shock for the competition, and particularly for teams like Brabham and UDT/Laystall who had recently purchased 24s from Lotus, with the understanding that they would be "mechanically identical" to the works cars - Chapman reserved the right to alter the bodywork of the cars.
_	Using one of the Black Panther Party’s principles, Phat Beets gives away this produce with the understanding that individuals in the community, “cannot achieve their fullest potential for self determination and revolution without first eating a healthy meal.
_	Of the Harvard Classics, the FTC stated that while the company marketed that one or several volumes were offered free or for $1 each "with the understanding that additional volumes priced at $3.98 would be shipped periodically for free examination", many volumes would be shipped in a bulk shipment.
_	The Athletic Club purchased the site from the 4th Marquess of Bute, apart from a strip of land adjoining Westgate Street, for GB£30,000 on the understanding that the site should be preserved for recreational purposes only.
_	King Albert of Sweden ceded Gotland to the Order as a pledge (similar to a fiefdom), with the understanding that they would eliminate the pirating Victual Brothers from this strategic island base in the Baltic Sea.
_	Casey was released on the understanding that he would leave for Australia and not return to Ireland.
_	Dropping the Feynman notation now (with the understanding that formula_34still doesn't operate on v = ẋ), we can put the equation into the convenient Euler–Lagrange form
_	The interchanging of Ashuri with Hebrew prompts the understanding that Ashuri, Hebrew, and Lashon Hakodesh are one and the same language.
_	Erasmus points out in this presentation that the Treaties 8 and 11 were agreements entered into on the understanding that they recognized the right of the Dene to govern themselves and from which the Dene nation could live separately but in peaceful coexistence with the non Dene people.
_	The TMB issued a copy of the complaint to Roberts with the understanding that it would only be used to investigate criminal activity by Arafiles.
_	I had an Irish friend who considered himself a bit of a film producer and I considered myself a film writer and director and producer, so I went to the bank and talked them into giving us the money to make Glass, on the understanding that we would be able to recoup the money...
_	Anderson did not integrate Hoke's division with his attack plan and left him with the understanding that he was not to assault until the First Corps' attack was well underway, because the Union defenders were disorganized as well.
_	St. Laurent agreed to go to Ottawa out of a sense of duty, but only on the understanding that his foray into politics was temporary and that he would return to Quebec at the conclusion of the war.
_	He wrote a second article about two documents found by the historian, Margaret Condon, who had not published them in the 1980s, in part due to the understanding that Ruddock had a book in progress on the topic.
_	As part of the Compromise of 1877, in which Southern Democrats would acknowledge Republican Rutherford B. Hayes as president, had the understanding that Republicans would meet certain demands.
_	They were received into the monastery for the purpose of receiving formation and the rule of the Order, with the understanding that a new order was being formed.
_	The technicians worked for less money with the understanding that the film would also be sold for less money.
_	Sam then promises nothing of the sort will occur again and is provisionally re-hired on the understanding that this is his last chance as Rebecca uses a seductive baseball metaphor-pun about having two outs, two strikes and "no balls".
_	During the 1870s the School of Arts received an annual grant from the Government on the understanding that "the institution should tend to the intellectual advancement of the people".
_	Mr Webster contracted to rent a room to Mr Chandler, for the purpose of witnessing Edward VII's coronation, with the understanding that the money for the room would be paid before the procession.
_	The Royal Society of Medicine's GP section was established in 1950, following a case put to its council by Dr G M Kerr and Dr Geoffrey Barber and granted on the understanding that it would deal with matters of education only and not politics.
_	For technical divers, the recommended maximum depths are greater on the understanding that they will use less narcotic gas mixtures.
_	The Bishop relents, allowing them to stay for the period of the option with the understanding that if they cannot raise the additional money within that time they must all leave, but later remarks to his monsignor assistant that he feels unstoppable forces at work.
_	On the evening of 2 October, the increase in the working day was included in the government proclamation, whilst the "Ermächtigungsgesetz" would be limited to "financial and economic" issues - with the understanding that the latter would encompass "social" measures.
_	It has been agreed that a core trust fund to be allocated by the Plenary will be established to receive voluntary contributions from governments, as well as from United Nations bodies, the Global Environment Facility, other intergovernmental organizations and other stakeholders such as the private sector and foundations, on the understanding that such funding will come without conditionalities, will not orient the work of the Platform and cannot be earmarked for specific activities.
_	But the Ambassador in Paris for the Czechoslovak government-in-exile reached agreement with the French Government that Czechoslovak volunteers could join the French Foreign Legion for a five-year term, on the understanding that if war broke out they would be released to form a Czechoslovak army in exile.
_	They agree to help him on Narn with the understanding that he will reveal the truth and prevent his conflict from affecting Babylon 5 more.
_	Foreign Minister Tzipi Livni was placed third on the Kadima list, with the understanding that she would be the senior Vice Premier if Kadima formed the next government.
_	Currently located at Marine Corps Base Camp Lejeune in North Carolina, "LSM-45" was donated to the Museum of the Marine by the now defunct Amphibious Ship Museum under the understanding that it would be put on display at the museum, and was towed to North Carolina in 2004 from Omaha, Nebraska.
_	Tonbridge Angels FC was then formed and allowed to complete the fixture list on the understanding that relegation would result at the end of the 1975–76 season, wherever the club finished.
_	Nevertheless, Desjardins was able to form an alliance with Schreyer (himself a centrist New Democrat), on the understanding that he would be able to continue to work in favour of denominational school funding on the government side.
_	He credits his success to God, with the understanding that, however far it takes him, he will always be able to remember his time in the spotlight.
_	As a result, L. Cornelius Scipio, consul for 190, was given Greece as his province, with the understanding that he should cross into Asia as he deemed necessary.
_	Eventually she is allowed to leave and live in Paris on the understanding that she will only return for weddings and funerals.
_	One of the basic tenets of the Treaty of Waitangi (1840), between the British Crown and various Māori chiefs, was the understanding that the Crown would protect the Māori from attempts to defraud them of their land.
_	These cases were settled, however, by the Tokyo Round Code on Subsidies and Countervailing Duties, predecessor to today's Subsidies and Countervailing Measures (SCM), and the GATT Council decided in 1981 to adopt the panel reports subject to the understanding that the terms of the settlement would apply.
_	Central to men's studies is the understanding that "gender" does not mean "female," the same way "race" does not mean "black."
_	The Devil built the bridge on the understanding that he would receive the soul of the first living creature to cross over it.
_	The points of "n"-dimensional projective space can be identified with lines through the origin in -dimensional space, and can be represented non-uniquely by nonzero vectors in R, with the understanding that and , for any non-zero scalar , represent the same point.
_	The plot, which was owned by Miss Anne Griffith-Jones (1890–1973), was transferred to the Diocese on the understanding that a church would be built on it.
_	A Deed of Covenant stated that the bequest was made on the understanding that it be renamed the Howard Davis Farm and that it should be used as an experimental center for the development and study of agriculture and for the instruction in this science of young Jersey people and other interested parties.
_	In Columbus's time, the techniques of celestial navigation, which use the position of the sun and the stars in the sky, together with the understanding that the Earth is a sphere, had long been in use by astronomers and were beginning to be implemented by mariners.
_	By unselfishly releasing the anger he has held about his father's stories, Will gains the understanding that all we are our stories and that his father's stories gave him a reality and substance and a dimension that was as real, genuine, and deep as the day-to-day experiences that Will sought out.
_	But when he seeks redemption by rescuing an enslaved Indian girl from a vicious criminal and his gang of outlaws, he's pushed into further violence, and the understanding that he may be no better than the worst of them.
_	[...] when these practices do occur, it is done on the understanding that there is enough food and water supplied.
_	Thus, he quietly allowed his supporters to lobby for him, with the understanding that his name would not be entered at the convention unless it was clear none of the front-runners could win.
_	Shortly after the accession of Alexander III in 1881, he was appointed Minister of the Interior on the understanding that he would carry out a nationalist, reactionary policy.
_	Upon returning to Buxar, Eyre found that 154 men from the 5th Regiment of Foot had arrived in his absence and he convinced their commander, Captain L'Estrange, to join him with the understanding that Eyre bore full responsibility.
_	The agreement granted communion in both kinds to all who desired it, but with the understanding that Christ was entirely present in each kind.
_	To further attract residents, the Boroumand brothers gifted over 4 million square meters (4,000 acres) of land in close proximity to the city to the Daneshgah Sanati Esfahan, Isfahan University of Technology (IUT), and gifted another 4 million square meters (4,000 acres) of land in the city to the Iranian government with the understanding that the government would build a manufacturing facility there (a helicopter manufacturing plant which was to have been built there prior to the Iranian Revolution, is now home to the Iran Aircraft Manufacturing Industrial Company (HESA.))
_	In 1569 he went to Florence, where he was fortunate in securing the patronage and support of Duke Cosimo I, who gave him a residence at the Medici Palace and the Villa Topaia on the understanding that he should write his "Istorie Florentine", the work by which he is best known.
_	The case was settled on September 25, 2009, with Amazon agreeing to pay $150,000 divided between the two plaintiffs, on the understanding that the law firm representing them, Kamber Edelson, "...will donate its portion of that fee to a charitable organization...".
_	Brent Council later granted planning permission on the understanding that the Twin Towers would be preserved, however the final designs for the new stadium reverted to the originals without the Twin Towers in place.
_	The rationale is developed on the understanding that persons who lack the use of reason, like infants, need the assistance of others to participate in the sacraments of the Church.
_	As a result Alon grew up with the understanding that Zionism literally saved his family from destruction.
_	Under the plan, the government will consider how to incrementally revise taxation through to 2050, on the understanding that "environmental taxes and levies can create incentives for ecological economic activity" and that "environmentally related taxes and levies can cost-efficiently trigger climate-friendly economic behavior".
_	Prevention of occupational fatalities depends on the understanding that worker safety is not only the responsibility of the worker, but is the primary responsibility of the employer.
_	the understanding that it is essential to go beyond a restrictive definition of
_	On July 8, 2017, after news reports stated that Trump Jr. knew the meeting was political, he admitted in a tweet that he had agreed to the meeting with the understanding that he would receive information damaging to Hillary Clinton, and that he was conducting opposition research.
_	The mission aims discussed are that "in principle all religions are one" and that the understanding that "peace is indivisible" and achievable by individuals and that "disgruntled individuals and dissatisfied nations can never promote lasting peace in the world."
_	In competition law, exclusive dealing refers to an arrangement whereby a retailer or wholesaler is ‘tied’ to purchase from a supplier on the understanding that no other distributor will be appointed or receive supplies in a given area.
_	Particularly important was the understanding that the agent spreading malaria was the mosquitoes (active at night) rather than miasmata.
_	By mid-November the change had been noticed by the Mint, and Spreckels sent confirmation and a go-ahead to make dies for the dime, on the understanding that a revised authorization would be needed from Honolulu before production of dimes could begin.
_	The academician notes that when a child first comprehends the function of a mirror, they begin to develop the understanding that their perception of themselves is not self-contained, and learn partly they are what they see in the mirror.
_	In 2015, members of the Phil were asked by the President, to collect copies of The University Times after the newspaper printed details of confidential correspondence that had been supplied to the newspaper in the understanding that it would not be referred to in an article.
_	He received the appointment with the understanding that he would resign in favor of Jacob Radcliff, and in return was appointed as Naval Officer of the Port of New York, a much more lucrative federal position, in which he served until his death.
_	With the understanding that the state and city police of Alabama would offer assistance.
_	Also, it provides the understanding that resources held by a firm and the business strategy will have a profound impact on generating competitive advantage.
_	During the Mormon Exodus to Utah, she agrees to become one of Young's wives, with the understanding that their marriage will never be consummated.
_	A music newspaper editorial in 1917 in England encouraged orchestras to allow women to play the "lighter instruments", with the understanding that these women performers would relinquish their positions to men once WW I was over.
_	On the way to Berlin, he believed it was possible to restore the understanding that prevailed between the Austria and Prussia and allowed both states to dominate the German Confederation after 1815.
_	Schott named former Reds third baseman Ray Knight (who had played for Johnson on the Mets championship team) as bench coach, with the understanding that he would take over as manager in 1996.
_	Since he had received Montreuil's communication, the Scots had been out of favour with him, and on 23 March, upon the arrival of the bad news of the defeat of the last Royalist field army at the Battle of Stow-on-the-Wold, he despatched a request to the English Parliament for permission to return to Westminster, on the understanding that an act of oblivion was to be passed and all sequestrations to be reversed.
_	In 1968, Paige assumed the position of deputy sheriff in Jackson County, Missouri, with the understanding that he need not bother to actually come to work in the sheriff's office.
_	Limited female involvement was permitted later on the understanding that these would be in traditional female support roles and not in any way seen as combatants.
_	For evangelicals who read the New Testament as an inerrant history of the primitive church, the understanding that to be a Christian is to be persecuted is obvious, if not inescapable”
_	Parents for example, are to be respected and supported with the understanding that they are to have provided care and affection to oneself.
_	At an Ashfield Council meeting on 28 May 2013 the council passed a motion that a permanent outline of a rainbow be painted in Summer Hill Square, with the understanding that this may be periodically 'chalked in' by children, families and community members.
_	For instance, Stoics and Manilius agree on the divinity of the universe, the argument from design, the assumption that the supreme god is both the creator of the universe and the active force within it, the interconnectedness of everything, the understanding that humans are intimately connected to the cosmos, the importance of considering the heavens, and the belief in an inescapable fate that rules over all.
_	However, local agitation and the urgent need to put the idea into practice after eleven years of debate pressurised the government to allow the school to begin functioning, but on the understanding that it would later be moved to Accra, though no such move ever took place.
_	1. FC Köln, United paid £75,000 compensation to resolve the row – teammate Mark McGhee had also signed a contract with Hamburger SV on the understanding that Strachan would also be playing in Germany.
_	A secret trust is a trust which arises when property is left to a person (the legatee) under a will on the understanding that they will hold the property as trustee for the benefit of beneficiaries who are not named in the will.
_	Eventually, the Governor of Western Australia agreed to hold informal Legislative Council elections, in the understanding that he would nominate those elected.
_	It was passed with Social Democratic and Labour Party (SDLP) support, on the understanding that no immediate action would be taken.
_	In 1981, it was decided to pile the riverbank where "Maud" lay, and she was given to millwright Vincent Pargeter, and his wife Linda, on the understanding that the boat would be restored.
_	The first Sikh free migrants came to Fiji as part of the group of seventy Punjabis who were lured into coming to New Caledonia, in 1904, on the understanding that high wages were paid there.
_	January 1897. Act II opens with Professors Radleigh, Anderson and Collins offering Mr Banks tenure at Trinity College on the understanding that he desists teaching the women at Girton.
_	What also must be considered when looking at the idea of noise is the understanding that the more the sender and receiver have in common, the less likely it will be for noise to have an effect on the encoding of the message.
_	My intention was to create a work of art which would transcend the visible, which cannot be perceived except in stages, with the understanding that it is a partial revelation and not the perpetuation of the existing.
_	But a person's state of mind has to be detached from this world, with the understanding that this world is a temporary abode and their soul has to remain untouched by pain, pleasure, greed, emotional attachment, praise, slander and above all, egotistical pride.
_	The second area, "Developing and advancing the artist’s professional career, involves encouraging artists to assume a proactive approach to advancing their careers, based on the understanding that great artistic talent is a prerequisite but in itself does not suffice for developing a prominent local and/or international career.
_	It is said that the Earl agreed to the railway being built on his land on the understanding that all trains would stop at the station thus affording easy access to Eggesford House for visiting guests.
_	Henley agreed to the appointment with the understanding that he would serve until the end of the court's term, on May 21, as he could not afford to be away from his private practice longer than that.
_	The base was decommissioned on 29 October 1969 and the air station was officially closed in July 1970 with the understanding that the Navy could retain thirteen buildings for non-flying Naval Reserve aviation programs as Naval Air Reserve Center Olathe.
_	Milutinović was given permission to return shortly afterwards on the understanding that their relationship would be on the young man's terms.
_	Her family had reluctantly allowed her to pursue an art career on the understanding that she earn a living at it.
_	Thereafter, Berman dropped plans to oppose Perry with the understanding that the governor would support two of Berman's immigration bills and two other measures as well to protect states rights.
_	Skinners was maintained as a day school until 1894 when the governors allowed borders to be taken on the understanding that the total number would not exceed 50.
_	After just three weeks on the job, she bought the studio, with the understanding that the previous owner would stay on for a year to teach her the trade.
_	password for the unfinished HarvardConnection website and code, with the understanding that he would finish the programming necessary for launch.
_	On 20 March 1921, while he was addressing a gathering of farmers and labourers at a school in Tavua, he was requested to accompany a police party to Lautoka, on the understanding that the Government wanted to have discussions with him.
_	This research led to the understanding that: a "good judge", a "good target", a "good trait", and "good information" will lead to a more accurate personal judgement.
_	The underlying cause of sudden cardiac death is unclear, despite the understanding that heart disease causes arrhythmias, which in turn produce sudden cardiac death.
_	The British war effort had received popular support within India and the act received support on the understanding that the measures enacted were necessary in the war-situation.
_	Georgia Governor Ellis Arnall gave him a full pardon with the understanding that he would speak out against crime and in favor of prison reform.
_	This subfield is founded on the understanding that, in the words of Iranian-American philosopher Seyyed Hossein Nasr, "the environmental crisis is fundamentally a crisis of values," and that religions, being a primary source of values in any culture, are thus implicated in the decisions humans make regarding the environment.
_	Marketers have come to the understanding that "consumers are more prone to believe in other individuals" who they trust (Sepp, Liljander, & Gummerus, 2011).
_	He is admitted to the hospital for the mentally ill where he gains the understanding that the people around him there are not any crazier than those who live in freedom.
_	However, as Francis Paul Prucha has pointed out, “President Bush signed the bill . . . ‘on the understanding that the Council will serve only in an advisory capacity.’”
_	Kamins offered to get her a record deal with the understanding that he would produce the single.
_	The marriage takes place contrary to the understanding that it is Nalini (daughter of Kunjammama) who is to marry him.
_	The universal qualification for suffrage (£25) was sufficiently low to ensure that most owners of any form of property or land could vote; and there was a determination on the part of the Government not to raise it, on the understanding that rising levels of wealth would eventually render it obsolete.
_	The historical and geographical context of the Declaration, known as the Charter of Algiers, clearly links the general principles of the Declaration for the liberation struggles—which Resolution 1514 (XV) of the United Nations of 14 December 1960 had already put under the protection of international law—with the understanding that the right to self-determination could not be proclaimed as fulfilled and that it did not involve only the political phase of decolonization.
_	Evolutionary Operation (EVOP) is based on the understanding that every production lot has the ability to contribute valuable information on the effect of process variables on a particular product characteristic or feature.
_	The debates taking place in the EU and the OECD on promoting PCD have also fostered the understanding that PCD should be enhanced at different levels.
_	A large point of contention in this amnesty proclamation was the understanding that the Huks would be able to retain their arms, provided that they were duly registered with the government, as opposed to surrendering them.
_	He hoped to be free from court duties and upon the death of Abbot Itherius of Saint Martin at Tours, Charlemagne put Marmoutier Abbey into Alcuin's care, with the understanding that he should be available if the king ever needed his counsel.
_	The Yankees signed him as an international free agent with the understanding that he would try catching.
_	Her interest in the field of psycho-oncology arose in part from discussions with her husband about the patients he treated, and the understanding that arose from those discussions that little was known about the experiences of people with cancer and that little was being done to help people with cancer manage the experience.
_	Gopi is the only son of a widowed mother, and in strained circumstances, is put through medical college by his rich uncle on the understanding that Gopi marries his daughter Sumithra.
_	Surgical removal of the tumor is the typical treatment provided, with the understanding that additional removal procedures will most likely be required as the lymphangioma grows.
_	Based on this position, Tanox proceeded with a phase II clinical trial of TNX-901 on peanut allergy, with the understanding that this indication was important and urgent, but was not on the top agenda of clinical testing planned by the steering committee.
_	In instances such as this, the Board sets Adequate Intakes (AIs), with the understanding that at some later date, AIs will be replaced by more exact information.
_	After his job at the union he was noticed by Robert Morant who employed him as a temporary legal assistant to the Board of Education on the understanding that the job would become permanent, which it did in 1907.
_	"I was left with the understanding that it was religiously incumbent on me to assist in defending Muslims whose land had been invaded."
_	The producers, Bluth, Goldman, Pomeroy, and the executive producers at Aurora mortgaged their homes collectively for $700,000 to complete the film, with the understanding that their investment would be the first to be repaid.
_	CINE's original name, the Committee on International Non-Theatrical Events, was chosen to create the acronym CINE, after which it was then changed to Council on International Non-Theatrical Events, with the understanding that in daily use it is simply referred to as CINE.
_	The Filthy Lucre {Paul Main,Gavin Campbell and Robert Goodge} ] remix was produced without the band's involvement but with the understanding that the 'Yolngu' side of the music was preserved.
_	Once it is known whether a representation is projective, formula applies to all group elements and all representations, including the projective ones — with the understanding that the representative of a group element will depend on which element in the Lie algebra (the in ) is used to represent the group element in the standard representation.
_	The establishment of the center was due to the understanding that treatment of sex offenders and the prevention of sex crimes are a vital social need, and that in order to protect society and provide alternative coping patterns for criminals, a solution within the community is necessary.
_	The Czechoslovak Ambassador in Paris reached agreement with the French Government that Czechoslovak volunteers could join the French Foreign Legion for a five-year term, on the understanding that if war broke out they would be released to form a Czechoslovak army in exile.
_	The earliest recorded owner of the island of Alcatraz is Julian Workman, to whom it was given by Mexican governor Pio Pico in June 1846, with the understanding that Workman would build a lighthouse on it.
_	Phonemic awareness, not phonics, is the understanding that our spoken sounds work together to make words.
_	The loss of this verandah, while an important element of this particular building, has had only a minor impact on the understanding that the building provides of the Italianate Style.
_	The Soviet Union was invited with the understanding that it would likely refuse.
_	He was loaned to Detroit with the understanding that the Naps could reclaim him on one day's notice.
_	He was also composing music on the understanding that he was to provide the picture's soundtrack, though this would not come to fruition.
_	Philip argued in vain that his plans had been drawn up with the consent of Rome, that his expedition was in support of papal authority that he only undertook on the understanding that he would gain a plenary indulgence; he had spent a fortune preparing for the expedition.
_	They stated the Corporation received permission to build the road with the understanding that no expense would be incurred by the inhabitants of Hubbardston when traveling to Barre.
_	The Catholic members had all agreed to the new taxes on the understanding that their Graces - by now a list of 51 reforms - would be passed in the second session from 4 November to 14 December.
_	Law received a nominal salary, on the understanding that he would gain a "commercial education" from working there that would serve him well as a businessman.
_	Rather, the pact was designed for a "joint war against France and Britain", although the Italian hierarchy held the understanding that such a war would not take place for several years.
_	Under U.S. patent law, when a patent owner sells supplies to customers with the understanding that they will use the supplies to practice the patent, the customers get an implied license to use the patent. "
_	The first Holmes-based episode was produced with the understanding that Sherlock Holmes was public domain, but a protest from the Doyle estate indicated otherwise (and, it is rumoured, prevented a plan for Data-as-Holmes to become a recurring character).
_	There, she is courted by Edmund, a local pastor, and they soon get married under the understanding that Helene is still pure.
_	They passed the enquiry to The Authority Schools Committee, who authorised LWT, Grampian Television and HTV to broadcast another test run of "Sesame Street", under the understanding that its permission "should not be construed as educational endorsement of "Sesame Street" for British children".
_	Although Duke Huan was the crown prince, he was then a little boy and his older half-brother Duke Yin ascended the throne with the understanding that he would rule as a regent until Duke Huan grew up.
_	JW agrees on the understanding that no one will get hurt.
_	with the understanding that formula_9 is undefined for formula_18 and formula_13 is undefined if formula_20.
_	The Republican Angier Goodwin added a note below his signature: "In signing this report, I do so with strong reservations and dissent from many of its findings and conclusions and with the understanding that I may file a supplementary statement to follow".
_	Eventually sold to a development company from Kentucky for $1 with the understanding that the building was to be completely renovated, a newly remodeled Seagle Building reopened in 1983 with modern wiring, plumbing, telephone and cable jacks, a fire sprinkler system, an emergency diesel generator, an added internal concrete stairway providing two fire escapes for every floor, and many other improvements.
_	American Indians—primarily the Six Nations, Delawares and Shawnees—made this agreement with the understanding that the British would leave the area after their war with the French.
_	He did so only with the understanding that Congress (controlled by his party) would proclaim as temporary president someone who would do his bidding.
_	On April 1, 2006, EGI participated in the demonstration in Bilbao called by parties and unions abertzale and that the PNV not joined the understanding that she hides behind the goal of shaping a pole that independence is an alternative political and social "Jeltzale training.
_	His deputy, Frank Forde, was sworn in as interim prime minister the following day, with the understanding that he would resign if the Labor Party did not elect him as leader.
_	The theories are said to be built on the understanding that the Hebrew word "yom" is also used to refer to a time period, with a beginning and an end and not necessarily that of a 24-hour day.
_	For such sets, he introduced the #H#V notation, where #H denotes the horizontal and #V the vertical resolution, with the understanding that they will be constant for all source positions on the sphere.
_	He undertook basic training and national service on the understanding that he would be given an opportunity to enter the Air Force as an instructor at the end of his four-year service.
_	Accounts say that Frank surrendered with the understanding that he would not be extradited to Northfield, Minnesota.
_	Together, Jonas and the Giver come to the understanding that the time for change is now, that the Community has lost its way and must have its memories returned.
_	Adams mortgaged his house in order to purchase the mill in 1823 for $20,000, and placed George on salary to continue to manage the mill, with the understanding that George would later buy back half the mills from Adams.
_	Leeson, who left the series at the end of Season 16, returned for Season 18 on the understanding that K9 would be written out toward the end of the season.
_	[...] when these practices do occur, it is done on the understanding that there is enough food and water supplied.
_	urban development is based on the understanding that if
_	“Trauma-informed” is based on the understanding that the impact of violent experiences and damaging relationships affects not only the survivor’s physical, mental, emotional, and economic wellbeing, but the spiritual as well.
_	J. A. Jungmann and K. Stasiak wrote, in "New Catholic Encyclopedia", that "the Second Vatican Council's call for a greater spirit of ecumenism among churches and ecclesial communities reflects the understanding that Baptism is the effecting and the sign of the fundamental unity of all Christians."
